		The sun rises over the mountains of Iran as the crew of the aircraft carrier, Independence, begins another day.  A rescue helicopter eases into the air, circling the carrier, ready for any emergency as the daily cycle of flight operations gets underway.  The ship carries eighty planes, a combination of fighters, bombers and reconnaissance aircraft—the equivalent of a small air force.  As the day progresses, these planes will be launched into the air by steam catapults, to patrol the skies over Kuwait.  The carrier's mission is to maintain a presence in the Persian Gulf and enforce the ceasefire with Iraq. 		This aircraft carrier is a visible expression of U.S. global influence, and a potent weapon.  It travels hundreds of miles in a single day. And with airborne radar planes and satellites, it can monitor flights across the Middle East.  Carriers are a key to U.S. military policy.		Leaving her Japanese home port for what should have been a routine six-month patrol, Independence visited ports in Australia, then traveled seven thousand miles across the Pacific and Indian Oceans, through the Straits of Hormuz, to take up station in the confined waters of the Persian or Arabian Gulf.  Independence is one of the largest warships afloat, combining men and equipment into a massive complex machine.  		Commissioned in 1959, the ship is older than most of the people on board.  Five thousand men live beneath the flight deck in eight cramped and artificially lit decks.  There are three miles of corridors, and over two thousand separate compartments.  Parts of the ship will be unfamiliar to some of the crew, even after six months.  The senior officers have little contact with enlisted men.  For them, the Master Chief, the most senior non-commissioned officer on board, is the key figure.  		The men sleep and work around the clock, with little time or room for recreation.  There are three TV channels that show news, sports, and movies.  		Space is so limited that only senior officers have any real privacy. Even the flight crews share cramped cabins with up to seven other people.  It is a relentlessly masculine environment.  But by summer, 1994, women will begin serving alongside men on U.S. aircraft carriers.  		For six months at a stretch, men live in these conditions so that the ship can sail, and the planes continue to fly.  		Accompanied by the thud of planes landing on the deck above, pilots get instructions for the day. Monitors constantly show what is happening on the flight deck.		Among their colleagues, pilots are known by their radio call sign, a single name that stays with them throughout their career.  		Like the carrier itself, the pilots are here for one thing only—to fly airplanes.  		From the squadron ready rooms, the pilots walk out into the noise and bustle of the flight deck. In a few minutes' time, they will be catapulted into the air, reaching a speed of a hundred and fifty miles an hour in just under three seconds. They say that it concentrates the mind wonderfully.  One plane has been lost on this cruise.  Nobody wants to be the next one.  The cycle of launch and recovery begins with planes lined up at the bow, where they are fueled, and guns and rockets are loaded.  Then, the planes are towed back amid ships and lined up for one of the four catapults.  		The movement of planes on the flight deck is controlled by the handler.  In his office under the bridge, the position of every plane is plotted by hand.  A plane can be launched every forty-five seconds.  The handler's job is to make sure it happens.  		There are strict rules on the flight deck. Everyone wears a colored shirt to identify their jobs.  Green for mechanics, red for munitions, yellow for the catapult crew.  Over a hundred signals must be memorized to make communication possible.  Engine mechanics signal pilots to start their jet engines.  Cockpits are closed, and once the engines are running, the planes' surfaces are given a final check.  Hand signals warn others that there is possible danger from hot jet exhaust.  The ship picks up speed, and the twenty-knot wind blows over the flight deck, giving the heavy planes the best possible wind speed for take-off.  Under their own power, the planes must now maneuver over the greasy flight deck, worn smooth by oil and the rubber from constant landings and take-offs.  Hand signals direct the pilot around the flight deck.  Only one person on the deck is in control of the plane at any one time.  And a strict routine is maintained as the plane is moved up to be launched.  The plane's front wheel is hooked up to the catapult.  And an engineer gives a final check.  As he runs clear, he gives the pilot the signal to go to full power.  The launch crew stand amid the noise and heat of the furnace-like jet exhaust.  The launch officers signal to the catapult officer, who presses the button.  Steam from the ship's boilers drives the piston forward, hurtling the plane into the air.  The planes speed by within feet of the handlers.  If anyone makes a mistake, many others will pay with their lives.  The pilots know they must achieve a speed of a hundred and fifty miles an hour.  		When things go wrong, the handler makes last-minute adjustments to the launch sequence, keeping track of twenty planes and several hundred men.  A cargo plane's wing doesn't close properly.  And men rush to close it, just feet from the blades of the spinning propellers.  		Then, a forward catapult breaks down.  A repair crew is sent to get it working again.  		In the middle of the launch sequence, planes have to be pushed to alternate catapults, adding to the confusion and the danger.  		But the launch proceeds, and all twelve planes are hurled into the air in a welter of heat and noise.  		Afterwards, the handler demands an explanation for the failures that have delayed the launch.		It is not the first time the catapult has failed. 		The handler wants it fixed.  		The handler's crew retires to the cramped ready room behind his office for a brief rest.  The noise of the flight deck creates its own fatigue and their work shift can sometimes be very long. 		The Air Boss is responsible for all the planes in the air within a twenty-five mile radius.  While planes are launched, others are circling the carrier waiting to land.  The Air Boss keeps a log of the fuel carried in each plane.  Returning from a patrol, planes are running low on fuel, and they need to have enough left for three landing attempts.  Every few days, the deck must be washed down to clear it of the rubber slicks and grease.  And this has to be done in as little as half an hour between the launch and recovery cycles.  It's the only opportunity for many of the men to get a taste of sunlight and fresh air. As the first plane starts its approach, pilots confront another unique element of carrier operations.  		A hook attached to the tail of the plane catches one of four cables stretched across the after deck.  A twenty ton airplane landing at a hundred and twenty miles an hour is brought to a halt in two hundred feet.  Each wire is used exactly one hundred times before it is replaced.  If a cable should break, it would whip through metal and flesh like a knife through butter. Landing here is essentially a controlled crash.  To maintained safety standards, officers assess every landing. There are grades from zero to four. 		Usually, pilots fly twice a day, because taking off and landing on a ship requires constant practice.  Military flying means flying to the limit, and then being prepared for that limit to be broken.  The pilots on the Independence start their training at bases like Miramar Air Station in San Diego.  And training continues throughout their flying career.  Pilots are taken through simulated ditching and survival techniques, and have to re-qualify every four years.  There is no age limit.  You can keep flying as long as you pass the physical.  		It costs five million dollars to train a pilot. Five hundred flying hours are required before landing on a carrier for the first time.  And each hour of military flying takes eight to ten hours of maintenance.  The investment in a carrier pilot is enormous, and continues throughout his career. Top Gun, the Navy's combat training school, is housed at Miramar. After four hundred hours of carrier flying, crew are eligible to train here.  Four men from the independence qualify.  Montana and Lulu, Rat and Bird.  The Top Gun course lasts six weeks, and every day, pilots are trained against a group of instructors, simulating the latest tactics and weapons to be found around the world, so that they can confront any air force and know what to expect.  		At seven in the morning, the pilots assemble. Three weeks into the course, they are engaged in a major exercise.  And Lt. Mike Lewis, Lulu, is leading the briefing.  		The country that Lulu calls Orange is a real country with a real air force.  But Top Gun won't reveal it in public.  		While the students work out their game plan, the Top Gun instructors called Bandits meet separately.  They fly A4s and F16s in the way that Russian planes would be flown with a foreign air force appropriate to the exercise. Their knowledge and experience updated with the latest intelligence makes it certain that they will outwit the pilots.  		After the briefing, the pilots are keyed up discussing what they expect to do as they put on their special G-suits.  They are designed to protect them from the physical effects of sudden aerial maneuvers—the very tight turns they need to make in dog fights, for example.  		At nine o'clock, Montana and Lulu are in the lead as the students take off and group up before flying towards their target.  The Top Gun instructors take off and fly straight to where they will act as defenders.  By 9
45, twenty-two planes are in the air for this simulated attack on an enemy port.  Superficially, the exercise is simple.  As attackers, the students fly low over land, trying to avoid radar and surface to air missile sites.  Then, after thirty minutes, the pilots will confront the Top Gun staff, defending the target.  Montana flies at very low altitude, using mountains and valleys as cover from probing radar beams.  When he hears the cockpit siren warning of a missile being aimed at him, he throws the plane into sharp turns to confuse its tracking devices.  At times like this, the G-forces can become severe.  While the students are struggling to avoid these surface to air missiles, Top Gun instructors are assuming position up range, waiting for the students to appear. Finally, the two forces converge. Planes roll in the sky as pilots maneuver for the best position to use their weapons.  They turn towards each other, hoping to fire their missiles first while desperately trying to prevent hostile planes closing in behind them.  In pursuit of an A4, Montana maneuvers his F14 into a perfect position to fire his weapons.  In the real world, the A4 would have been shot down.  But an F16 has Montana in view.  Montana realizes a plane is behind him, and pulls a hard turn to get out of the sights of the chasing plane.  But it is too late, and the fight for Montana is over.  As the pilots head for home, they are physically drained by their flying, and realize they might not be as good as they thought they were.  		As acting group leader, it is Lulu's job to piece together what happened during the exercise.  The dog fights take place over vast areas of sky. And Lulu needs to hear from everyone what happened, and what went wrong. This prepares Lulu for his debriefing with the instructors.  		However demanding the exercise, or humiliating the debriefing, the pilots are wholly engaged in what they do, to a degree that few people ever experience.  		While the course at Top Gun continues, tensions remain high in the Persian Gulf.  In order to provide a safe haven for Iraq's Shiite population, U.S. planes will patrol the skies, monitoring the situation on the ground. They are ordered to shoot down any Iraqi planes that fly in prohibited air space.  Renewed conflict with Iraq seems certain.  On Independence, the flight operations take on a new urgency.  In the evening, after operation planning meetings, helicopters take senior officers back to land, or to other ships in the battle group.  In the armory, buried deep below deck, bombs and missiles are fused, primed and sent up to the flight deck as the Independence moves to near-war readiness.  The patrol is no longer routine.  And the aircraft carrier is now fulfilling its purpose, projecting military strength.  Enforcing the no-fly zone calls for operations around the clock.  And moments of sleep are grabbed when the chance arises.  Returning from Top Gun, the F14 crews are thrown into action immediately.  The mood on the ship has changed dramatically. 		Aerial combat is now a real possibility.  Guns are strapped on. Radio beacons and Arabic leaflets are carried in case they get shot down. 		Montana's and Lulu's mission is to provide protection for aircraft taking reconnaissance photos over the southern part of Iraq.  Flying over the Iraqi coast, Montana knows that during the Gulf War, thirty-six planes were shot down by Iraqi missiles.  The rules of engagement are clear—any Iraqi plane in this airspace can be attacked and shot down.  So, too, might Montana's.  He needs to refuel during the mission.  And at this point, he fears that a missile's radar has locked onto his plane at a time when he is most exposed and vulnerable.  		This mission ends without further incident.  But subsequently, Iraqi planes do challenge the no-fly zone and are shot down.  Although returning safely, Montana and Lulu report a series of mechanical problems with their plane that could also have proved fatal.  		The long cruise and the constant alert are beginning to wear down both men and machines.  		The Independence is a conventional powered carrier, and needs continual refuelling.  Every few days, a tanker cruises alongside, and thousands of gallons of fuel oil and kerosene flow into the carrier's bunkers. 		Music is part of this ritual.  This contact with the outside world drives home the isolation of life on the carrier.  This is the human cost of maintaining this massive ship on patrol. Confined with five thousand others, men are lonely for home.  For six months, their only contact with friends, lovers, and families has been by the mail.  At the end of a long cruise, they long for it to be over.  One of the greatest dangers that they face now is the loss of morale, and a failure to concentrate on the job at hand. 		The six months that they were at sea, the crew of Independence conducted 8,752 launches and arrested landings.  In the twenty-three days that the Independence operated in support of operations over Iraq, there were 1,349 missions, an average of 58 a day. Tonight on NOVA, a two-hour adventure to recover the relics of wars long past. First, in Greenland, a deserted but intact B-29 bomber has been waiting for rescue for more than fifty years. Can this team fly the Kee Bird home? A daunting challenge becomes a life and death struggle. Then, World War I. Britannic, twin sister of the ill-fated Titanic, is made safer and commissioned as a hospital ship. Today, she lies somewhere in the Mediterranean. Can a modern-day team determine what made this unsinkable ship sink? It's a two-hour NOVA special
 "B-29 Frozen in Time" followed by "Titanic's  Lost Sister."  Tonight on NOVA the power, the magic, the chemistry of explosives.  From the secret experiments of early alchemists to the lethal legacy of Los Alamos. Explore the way we blow things up.  Kaboom!  In the back of this van there's enough explosive power to blow apart an entire building.  It's part of a test to understand the nature of explosions.  A task that has become increasingly important in a world haunted by the threat of terrorists bombs.  Today Ground Zero is a test range of the New Mexico Technical Institute where explosive scientists have been conducting trials for the FBI.  Remote cameras, installed behind blast-proof slabs of steel, will capture what happens when the van blows up.  The explosion will be filmed at several thousand frames per second through a mirror.  Metal fragments are expected to be thrown thousands of yards, so everyone on the site must take shelter in an underground bunker.  When an explosive detonates, there is a rapid rearrangement of atoms which sets off a powerful train of events.  A supersonic shock wave ripples across the sand. It rises above the New Mexico skyline.  The initial shockwave shatters everything in millionths of a second. The airblast which follows spreads debris over a mile. Finally, half a second after detonation, a rock shatters the mirror.  The devastation is frightening, even in this barren landscape.  So, how can a simple rearrangement of atoms unleash enough energy to scatter fragments over two miles?  Few people know the secrets of explosive power better than Sidney Alford, an internationally-renowned explosive engineer.  Like a modern-day alchemist, he can persuade the most innocent household ingredients to unlock their chemical bonds to reveal explosive potential.  His cottage in England is littered with less innocent remnants of his clandestine explosive operations around the world. But this will be a controlled, backyard explosion, reduced to the simplest elements.  To create a simple explosion requires three essential ingredients
 a means of ignition, a fuel source, and oxygen to support the rapid combustion, which, if confined, will produce an explosion.  The first explosive mixtures were discovered by accident.  In the ninth century, Chinese alchemists produced a thick toffee made from honey, saltpeter and sulphur.  They hoped that by eating the substance, they might live forever. In fact, it nearly killed them.  The mixture burst into flames and burnt down the alchemists' hut.  They had unwittingly prepared a crude form of gunpowder.  An ancient Chinese manuscript urges readers not to repeat the experiment.  Eleven centuries later, Christopher Cullen, an ancient Chinese history scholar, ignores the warning and invites Sidney Alford to help him try out the forbidden recipe.  Sidney Alford was skeptical of success.  Honey contains water, which he thought might dampen any pyrotechnic prospects.  Being prudent, our intrepid alchemists decided to brew a small test batch.  Alchemists playing with fire.  Some things never change.  From these early experiments, the Chinese developed gunpowder for use in rockets and firebombs.  These were the world's first pyrotechnic weapons.  They were also used to make the first fireworks.  Fireworks hold an irresistible attraction.   The Reverend Ron Lancaster enjoys mesmerizing children with his demonstrations.  In an unlikely trinity, the Reverend Lancaster used to combine God, fire, and brimstone, until he stopped teaching chemistry to concentrate on fireworks, an interest he shared with his school friends.  The Reverend Lancaster now has his own fireworks factory, and with his son Mark, who also has black powder in his blood, he is preparing for one of the biggest fireworks displays ever to be seen in London.  It will celebrate the end of the Second World War.  This is one of your specials, is it Ron (inaudible)?  The explosions that engulf the London sky celebrate the end of a conflict that saw an escalation of explosive power, culminating with the atom bomb.  Indeed, the tarnished history of explosives has been dominated by dangerous experiments that many perpetrators vainly hoped would never be repeated.  The man who lit the fuse of European warfare was an English friar who perfected more explosive blends of gunpowder.  At a Franciscan monastery in Oxford, Roger Bacon spent several years investigating the magical properties of gunpowder.  Medieval travellers from the east probably brought the basic recipe to Europe.  Gunpowder consists of three ingredients.  The most important is the white powder called saltpeter. Its modern name is potassium nitrate.  It contains chemically-bound oxygen that supports rapid burning of the two fuels, sulphur and charcoal.  Properly refined and mixed, they form an explosive mixture originally called "black powder."  Making black powder burn was easy.  Making it explode, much harder. The secret lay in the quality of the saltpeter.  Because saltpeter naturally appears in soil, it is often contaminated.  Roger Bacon found a way of purifying the brown sludge by concentrating the mixture and crystallizing out the white powder.  Many of the things Roger Bacon tried in 1242, Sidney Alford repeated as a schoolboy in 1942.  By increasing the ratio of saltpeter to charcoal and confining the powder in a paper tube, he discovered an extraordinary property.  Bacon had made his first bang.  Roger Bacon was a scholar who laid the foundations for modern science.  He always wrote up his experiments, but his black powder investigations frightened him.  He foresaw the dangers if this formulation fell into the wrong hands and decided to encode the recipe in an anagram in the Latin text.  The passage ends with the words, "And so thou wilt call up thunder and destruction if thou know the art."  Nothing so dangerous could remain secret. He knew that the more the powder was confined, the bigger the explosion.  Roger Bacon didn't understand the chemistry, but what happens when gunpowder ignites is a violent transformation of solid ingredients into a rapidly-expanding mixture of hot gasses.  If trapped inside a container, they will also cause an explosion.  Enough oomph to blast the helmet fifty feet into the air, and enough oomph to change the course of European history.  For nearly a thousand years, gunpowder ruled the world.  Because it will only explode when confined, it's called a low explosive.  But there's a different type of explosive that will unleash its fury in the open without confinement.  This unstable oil has fuel and oxygen chemically combined in one molecule.  Its name is nitroglycerine.  It's a high explosive which can be triggered by a hammer blow.  The first high explosives were discovered by accident in the nineteenth century when chemists began adding nitric acid to organic compounds to make new medicines.  The Italian scientist, Esconio Suprero, started experiments with organic glycerine.  He created a new oxygen-rich compound
 nitroglycerine.  He did not realize how dangerous this liquid was until his lab exploded.  Many chemists have been mauled by this beast.  It held an irresistible fascination.  Breaking the bonds between nitrogen and oxygen, the so-called nitro groups, creates the gasses which release the explosive energy.  Some chemical bonds are so unstable they can be triggered by the touch of a feather.  In this laboratory, scientists study the anatomy of an explosion using the ultimate in slow motion photography.  To capture a moment of detonation on film requires a camera that can run at a million frames per second.  As the shock wave travels through the explosive, it triggers a series of chemical bond ruptures which release enormous amounts of energy. When the chemical reaction accelerates, it drives the shock wave at supersonic speed.  The incredible power of high explosives can be demonstrated on a three-inch-thick slab of steel with a simple weapon that Sidney Alford has developed.  This metal cone will be compressed by the explosion into a projectile.  The warhead of this armor-piercing shell is full of high explosive. Back at the New Mexico test range, they investigate the characteristics of different explosives.  In this case, they want to see if the shell can be accidentally detonated by a stray fragment from a bomb blast.  To avoid accidents, most modern explosives are designed to be difficult to set off, but they need to be tested to make sure.  Using a sled track, the engineers will fire a lump of metal on the end of a rocket to simulate debris hitting the warhead at high velocity.  The target warhead contains special explosives that should not go off under these conditions.  It fails the test.  The unpredictability of high explosives has always been a problem since investigations first began.  The father of high explosives was Alfred Nobel, the Swedish industrialist.  In the 1850s, gunpowder was the only available explosive, so the commercial potential for something more powerful, like nitroglycerine, was clear.  But its tendency to explode without warning made it too dangerous to handle.  Nobel realized that unless nitroglycerine could be detonated reliably, it had no future.  He experimented with the idea of using a small gunpowder charge to act as a detonator.  These prototypes were like firecrackers with a long fuse.  It was a significant breakthrough.  Without the invention of the detonator, handling high explosives would have remained a perilous act.  Although nitroglycerine was now much safer to set off, it remained hazardous to manufacture.  Alfred Nobel and his family began producing nitroglycerine by the bucketful.  He was tempting fate.  In 1864, a violent explosion destroyed the laboratory, killing his younger brother Emil.  Alfred was devastated but refused to halt work on the treacherous liquid.  In the next ten years, he built dozens of nitroglycerine factories. Few survive today.  Most have blown up.  This one in Norway is a working museum.  Inside the reaction vessel, cooling coils kept the chemistry under control, but if the temperature rose by even a few degrees, it was time to run.  To help avoid accidents, open pipes and gravity controlled the flow of nitroglycerin.  Pumping was out of the question.  Friction between moving metal parts would have been fatal.  Raw nitroglycerine does not like being moved.  In the 1860s, it was killing so many people that it was giving Nobel a bad name.  Nitroglycerine was banned in America.  We had to find a way of making it less reactive and tried absorbing it with inert powders.  One of the most successful was a porous white clay called kieselguhr, which could absorb four times its own weight of nitroglycerine.  This was Nobel's most famous invention
  dynamite.  It was used for rock blasting everywhere and made him one of the richest men in the world.  Even though Nobel's business empire was huge, he never stopped experimenting.  One night, he was awakened by a sore cut on his finger.  He dressed it with a protective film of nitrated cotton, a preparation called newskin (?).  This gave him the idea of mixing a similar solution with nitroglycerine.  The result was blasting gelatin, which retained the power of nitroglycerine and was as safe as dynamite.  Blasting gel is still used today. Demolition engineer Mark Loizeaux is setting charges inside a large apartment complex scheduled for destruction in Dundee, Scotland.  On this job, Mark is helped by his daughter Stacey.  They set up their firing post several hundred yards from the building.  The Loizeaux family has masterminded some of the world's most spectacular demolition jobs, like the Dunes Hotel in Los Vegas, which was accompanied by a cascade of pyrotechnic effects.  Three generations of Loizeaux have dynamite in their blood.  And how old were you then?  Now, the Loizeaux family is in Hungary preparing to destroy old Soviet scud missile launchers.  NATO top brass will be coming to witness the decommissioning, so they are planning to turn it into an explosive event.  They are using whatever explosives are locally available, in this case the plastic explosive Semtex.  So, one small chapter of the arms race will soon come to an end. The man who made the race possible was Alfred Nobel, the inventor of dynamite. The nature of warfare was transformed by his ideas.  Nobel was quick to realize that if his high explosives were used in weapons instead of gunpowder, there would be enormous advantages.  By mixing nitrocellulose with nitroglycerine, Nobel was able to produce a smokeless powder.  He called it ballastite, and it's still used today.  Nobel saw the opportunity for making new weapons that would use his smokeless munitions, and he bought the Swedish gun manufacturer, Bofors. However much he loathed the stigma, he was now an arms merchant.  Yet he claimed to be a pacifist.  Eight years before he died, Alfred's obituary was mistakenly printed in a French newspaper which described him as "The Merchant of Death."  He was haunted by his reputation.  He resolved to leave a legacy that would never be forgotten
 the Nobel Peace Prize.  Further awards would honor excellence in literature, science, and medicine.  This was how he wanted to be remembered. He became obsessed with his own death.  He endured terrible headaches from working with nitroglycerine.  Yet, ironically, later in life, he had to take it as a medicine for his heart disease.  Nobel had built an empire founded on an unstable molecule which would kill millions of people.  He was a lonely man, tortured by his own success.  His conscience would never be clear. Millions of tons of high explosives were fired in the First World War.  It was a stark equation.  One ton of munitions for each human life lost.  Over the century, the roll call of high explosives lengthened
  TNT, Amitol, Torpex, Semtex, each growing in chemical complexity and power.  In the New Mexico dawn of 1945, Nobel's ghost was aroused.  Bacon and Nobel would have recognized Robert Oppenheimer's symptoms, that irresistible urge to witness a new form of explosive power.  This time, it was a bigger bang in a bigger backyard.  But the dream was the same
 a belief that the experiment was so dangerous it need never be attempted again.  After the bombs had been dropped on Japan, the scientists returned to re-stage the first test for the cameras.  The outtakes from this atomic melodrama are painful to watch.  The pathos of the script, all too obvious to Oppenheimer.  Twenty years later, the script had changed.  In the nuclear standoff which followed, there were times when the end of the world did seem close.  Yet, the cold war was a war of words, a war which never happened. Now, the old weapons are lined up, linked together by shock tube and Semtex, awaiting annihilation.  Can it be that simple?  Is that the end?  The search for the ultimate explosion will not stop, and one day, there'll be another experiment that we'll wish had never been attempted. 	Approaching a terrorist bomb requires a special kind of courage. This soldier is a member of an elite corps of the British army which disarms terrorist bombs.  It is the busiest bomb squad in the world.  Since the Irish Republican Army began using bombs in 1972, this unit has been called to over 30,000 incidents in Northern Ireland and mainland Britain.  The IRA's bombing campaign instigated a deadly game of cat-and-mouse that has led to highly sophisticated counter-terrorist tactics.  But ultimately, it is a war of nerves
 one man against the bomb.  This final approach is often described as the Long Walk.  Eventually, he is so close to the bomb, his body armor cannot save him.  Beyond this point, only his training and experience will protect him.		In this exercise, a small homemade bomb has accidentally gone off in the bedroom of a bomb-maker's house.  The bomb disposal technician must ensure there's no risk of other devices detonating.  There is a constant fear of booby-traps.  These soldiers learn to live with the unpredictable danger—Hence, their nickname, Felix, after the cat with nine lives.  These buildings have seen some of the most fiendish plots to catch the bomb disposal man off-guard. Situated deep inside an army base, the location of this specially built town is secret.  It is part of the Felix training center, where soldiers learn to outwit the terrorist.		To get inside the mind of the enemy, they must learn the secrets of a long list of lethal devices.  This is a terrorist bomb factory staffed by the British army.  These men are manufacturing do-it-yourself bombs to exact terrorist specifications.  The semtex blocks and detonators contain no explosive, but the circuits are real, so they can test the skills of the people who must defuse them.  They are taught never to underestimate the cold-blooded precision of IRA bombs.  In 1984, the IRA planted a huge bomb at the Grand Hotel in Brighton on the south coast of England.  It had been left months before and was timed to go off when the Conservative Party Conference was in town.  Five people died, and many more suffered terrible injuries.  Seven years later, 10 Downing Street was the target. The IRA launched a mortar bomb at the Prime Minister's residence, striking at the heart of government. 	It was the climax of a violent campaign that had brought terror to the streets of London from Northern Ireland.  Since the 70s, more than 3,000 people had been killed.  The catalyst for the bombing campaign was the British army's violent suppression of a Civil Rights march in 1972. Northern Ireland was on the verge of civil war. Protestants wanted to remain under British rule. Catholics supported a united Ireland.  On this day, what started as a peaceful demonstration turned into a riot.  Thirteen Catholic civilians were shot dead by the British army.  It became known as Bloody Sunday.  The Provisional IRA vowed revenge.  They sealed off the Catholic areas and recruited angry teenagers.  It was easy for a schoolboy to become an IRA recruit. 	Shane O'Doherty has spent most of his adult life in prison for his bombing activities.  He is one of the few convicted IRA bombers to have written letters of apology to his victims while serving his sentence.  He now renounces violence, but he carries with him chilling memories of his acts of terror. 	There have been many technical advances in the size and complexity of improvised bombs, as one of the army's chief counter-terrorist officers recalls. 	It was a game the bomb disposal men didn't always win.  Twenty lost their lives tackling IRA bombs. Many more have been maimed and injured.  It's hard to understand what motivates a bomber. Shane O'Doherty had his first experience when he was 15.  Two IRA men asked him to hide a bomb they had failed to plant.  They showed him how to use it. 	The IRA started to booby-trap bombs with anti-handling devices.  If the package was moved, a tilt switch would trigger the electrical circuit and set off the bomb.  The army became adept at using a hook and line to pull suspect parcels away from buildings.  They then placed a small amount of explosive next to the package.  It provided enough force to blow the bomb's circuit apart, but not enough to set off the main charge. 	The IRA started targeting the bomb disposal man himself.  But these booby-trap devices were much more dangerous to plant.  The best way of delivering such a bomb was in a car.  The army needed to react quickly to this new threat.  Some of the first experiments to defeat the car bomb used foam to try to dampen the blast. 	An inventive Colonel, who was thinking about the car bomb problem in his back yard, came up with an original approach.  He had developed an unusual way of cutting grass by tethering his lawn mower to a stake.  In a flash of inspiration, he imagined using long ropes to steer a remote-controlled tow-hook towards a suspect car bomb.  The operator would be far enough away to escape any blast if the bomb was accidentally triggered.  The first prototype was built from garden machinery, and was nicknamed "Wheelbarrow." 	The rope was attached to a truck, which towed the suspicious car to a safe place where the bomb could be destroyed. 	The Mark Two Wheelbarrows had a remotely controlled arm, which meant it could tackle a car bomb where it was parked.  Peter Gurney, a former chief of the London Bomb Squad, was one of the first people to try it out in Belfast. 	It delivered an explosive charge that was designed to disrupt the car bomb components without detonating the bomb.  The tube of explosive was called candle. 	This is what came to be known as a controlled explosion. 	The early models all had long umbilical cords to control their movement.  Sometimes, these would become jammed in doorways.  So, they fired a metal spike into the floor to hold the door open. This was the first Wheelbarrow to have a television camera enabling the operator to hunt for the bomb.  It also had tank tracks which could climb stairs.  But the long umbilical, which contained wires for steering and setting off the explosive, could be dangerous, as Peter Gurney found out when he was dealing with a suspicious car in Belfast. 	Behind the cover of their armored vehicle, Gurney's men attached the explosive candle to the robot arm.  Unknown to them, the bare wires inside the damaged umbilical were touching, so when Gurney flicked the switch to move the robot, he set off the explosive charge.  They were standing just a few feet away from the explosion. Gurney escaped lightly.  His two colleagues were more seriously injured.  With the robot wrecked, Gurney risked his life by placing the explosive candle in the suspect car.  Being this close to a car bomb is always a last resort.  Today, robots are usually radio-controlled.  In this army exercise, there is the added complication that the bomb the soldiers are trying to locate is radio-controlled, too.  So, to avoid triggering the device with radio signals, the robot trails a wire for firing the weapons that will blow apart the bomb.  Some aspects of this scenario are off limits to cameras. They have been told the bomb has been planted outside an insurance office. They begin a systematic search, starting with the obvious place
  a trash can. Unfortunately, it's empty.  Later, they find the bomb in a flower bed.  The bomb is blown apart using one of the most significant weapons in the bomb disposal arsenal
  The Disrupter.  The Disrupter was particularly useful for destroying booby-trapped, under-vehicle bombs. 	But disrupters could not penetrate bigger bombs concealed inside cars.  The army had to resort to controlled explosions, which sometimes set off the whole bomb.  As the IRA began planting bigger booby-trapped devices in the trunks of cars, this became an increasingly dangerous problem. 	The ingenuity of the IRA was matched by the imagination of inventors like Sidney Alford, who devised new counter measures to remove bombs from car trunks. 	Propelled by high explosive, the slug of water blasts straight through the gas tank, and without igniting the fuel, lifts the beer keg 50 feet clear of the car.  It can then be more completely disarmed.  But as scientists produced counter measures, the IRA continued to come up with new devices. 	Shane O'Doherty was one of the first IRA bomb-makers to experiment with letter bombs.  After he blew himself up on this street in Derry, the IRA offered him a more dangerous mission. 	Peter Gurney defused many of O'Doherty's bombs. 	By the end of the 80s, the bomb disposal teams were dealing with a new problem.  The IRA had developed homemade mortar bombs, which they were firing at army barracks and police stations in Northern Ireland.  On February 7, 1991, just after the Gulf War Cabinet had convened at 10 Downing Street, the Provisional IRA launched one of its most audacious operations.  Half a mile away, they had parked a van and set a short timer to trigger a set of explosive charges.  This was the first mortar attack on mainland Britain. Peter Gurney, as Head of the London Bomb Squad, was on the scene within minutes. 	But only one mortar shell had exploded. 	Where there had once been a cherry tree, there was a smoking crater. The blast had showered the cabinet office with glass and debris.  Shrapnel damage is still visible on the garden walls. 	Two of the three mortar bombs failed to explode, landing on the other side of the wall, near a statue of Lord Mountbatten, himself a victim of a terrorist bomb.  Working alone, to avoid placing others at risk, Peter Gurney locked the bomb between his legs and tried to remove the fuse. 	It turned out the explosive in both mortar bombs had burned away without detonating.  In bomb disposal training, young soldiers learn from the experiences of veterans like Peter Gurney.  To qualify for duty in Northern Ireland, the men must get through this course.  It has one of the highest failure rates in the British army.		One of the most dreaded tactics was the hostage bomb.  The IRA would tie a hostage into a van loaded with explosives and order him to drive to an army barracks.  Luckily, in this case, the driver was freed by a sentry just before the explosion.  In two similar incidents on the same day, the hostages were killed.  To teach soldiers how to deal with such incidents, exercises are staged to test their ability to assess hidden danger.  In this case, a radio receiver has been wired up to a trunk full of homemade explosives. 	When the bomb disposal crew arrive on the scene, they are briefed by an instructor playing a police officer.  He tells them there's a hostage strapped in the car. 	This incident is a bomb disposal man's worst nightmare.  There is no time to put on a protective suit or send in a remote control robot.  In this situation, as the IRA is well aware, the bomb disposal man must risk his own life to save the victim.  If the car is booby-trapped, pulling the door open might set off the bomb. 	He searches for the detonator, the small explosive tube which sets off the main charge and forms the vital link between the electronic circuit and the bags of explosive.  By cutting it out, he can reduce the immediate risk, but there could still be secondary devices concealed in the car. He has found a wire connected to the driver's door.  If opened, it could set off an explosive charge. 	Once the area is clear, the crew can send in a remote controlled robot to finish off the job. 	As the IRA's booby-traps became more elaborate, the army relied on robots to play an increasingly important role in assessing dangerous situations. The Wheelbarrow has come a long way in 25 years. In seven out of ten incidents, it acts as the eyes and hands of the operator so that he can work on the bomb from the safety zone.  It carries a pair of roving cameras to locate the device and a pair of disrupters to destroy it. For more cramped situations, Wheelbarrow has a smaller brother called "Buckeye" that can maneuver in narrow places like the aisles of trains or steep staircases.  But the ultimate tool is still a long way off. 	Until that day, engineers will continue to improve the versatility of robots.  One of the key problems is trying to fit the tools, cameras and weapons on the end of the arm.  They are all competing for the same space. Perhaps robots will eventually have a selection of different tools and attachments that can be carried on board.  The ultimate attachment would be a hand. Future designs may use a virtual reality gauntlet, so that the operator can slip his hand into a glove and feel, as well as see what he is doing.  But even today's robots are remarkably sophisticated tools.  They were being used so much in Northern Ireland that the IRA began to revise its tactics. 	The bomb was now a lure.  The bomb disposal squad had become the real target.  In this exercise, the house is being booby-trapped with trip wires and pressure mats.  The crew is told that there has been an explosion, but they know this could be a trap to entice them into the building. Nothing must be taken for granted when training for duty in Northern Ireland.		This officer's identify is concealed for security reasons. 	They decide to send in a robot to inspect the house. 	Once a safe path has been cleared by Wheelbarrow, he puts on an armored suit before checking out the house.  Just as a soldier never goes on duty without his rifle, so a bomb disposal man always takes a disrupter. Inside this house, three booby-trap bombs have been laid.  Each is designed to kill the bomb disposal man.  Using a metal detector, he locates a pressure mat under the carpet.  If he stood on the mat, it would complete an electric circuit, triggering a bomb. He scans each doorway with a thin, metal wand and a flashlight, searching for tripwires.  Often, these are thin fishing lines which are very hard to see.  By focusing his eyes along the wand, he can concentrate his attention.  Meticulously following these procedures, searching according to a well-defined plan, prepares him for the dangers he may soon have to face in Northern Ireland.  He catches the glint of light from a fishing line and follows it to a homemade bomb hidden around the corner. 	They could be sent anywhere in Northern Ireland. One of the most dangerous places has been South Armagh, where the IRA controls the area and has the freedom to set the most elaborate booby-traps.  In such dangerous terrain, all operations are carried out by helicopter.  The equipment has to be flown in because it's too risky to travel by road.  These units are always aware that they might be walking into a trap, with the IRA watching their every move.  One of the most notorious incidents happened on the Belfast to Dublin railway line, right on the border with the Republic of Ireland. 	He had been called out to investigate an explosion on a track.  He quickly spotted another bomb a few yards away, and set to work disarming it. Unknown to him, there was a carefully hidden third bomb, which went off just as he walked past. 	The bomb had been triggered remotely by an IRA man watching the scene from across the border. When the team returned two days later to check the area, they discovered a fourth device. 	They quickly blew a hole in the tracks to break the circuit and prevent the IRA from having a second chance to blow up the bomb disposal man. He was awarded a medal for his bravery. 	As long as terrorists plant bombs, there will be bomb disposal teams devising new methods of defusing them.  In 1995, life almost returned to normal in Northern Ireland with the IRA's cease-fire.  That was shattered when a huge bomb was planted in London at Canary Wharf in February, 1996.  Later that year, the IRA struck again, this time at the Headquarters of the British Army in Northern Ireland.  In late 1997, as peace talks continued under a fragile, new cease-fire, the men of the Bomb Squad hoped that the deadly cat-and-mouse game with the IRA might soon be over.  One thing will never change
  the universal horror of the terrorist bomb.    During the following program, look for NOVA's Web markers, which lead you to more information at our Web site.    An unknown genius discovered the key to navigating the open seas—time. Now, based on the best selling novel by Dava Sobel, "Lost at Sea - The Search For Longitude."    This program is funded in part by Northwestern Mutual Life, which has been protecting families and businesses for generations. Have you heard from the quite company?  Northwestern Mutual Life.    To be lost at sea meant wandering an empty ocean.  A lonely ship, far from shore and never finding safe harbor.  These perils were the stuff of legend since ships first sailed beyond the sight of land.  But until just over 200 years ago, there was no sure way of knowing the position on the high seas. Navigation because the greatest scientific challenge of the age of sail.    But far away, in a remote English village called "Barrow-on-Humbar," a carpenter named John Harrison was teaching himself clock making.  He had no formal education, but his clocks were highly original.  Harrison learned his craft while observing village life around him.    Neither a university man nor an astronomer, having never been to sea, what role could John Harrison have in solving the greatest technical enigma of his time?    Consider the problems of the sailors and navigators of the 1700s. On the training vessel Eye of the Wind, the passengers and crew are about to experience the challenges of being at sea on board a tall ship and finding their way across vast reaches of open ocean.  Will Andrewes, Curator of Harvard University's Collection of Historical Scientific Instruments, has joined the crew in this exploration of ancient navigation.  They're trying out a replica of a typical log and line of the early 1700s.    Measuring the speed with knots was one of the techniques of dead reckoning.  It was a crude method, and it didn't allow for currents or cross winds, which could easily push a ship off course.  But it was then the only way to estimate distance traveled at sea.    For centuries map makers have used grid lines to indicate points on the surface of the earth.  This grid system evolved into lines of latitude and longitude.  Latitude is represented by parallel horizontal lines circling the earth, with the Equator as the line of zero degrees latitude.    Navigators knew that the height of the noon-day sun varies.  On the equator, it would be high in the sky, but in the far north, the sun remains low on the horizon.   But without any means of figuring longitude - their east-west position—latitude was all navigators could hope to use.   On a damp October day in 1707 a fleet of British warships was returning home from battle with the French.  They were just a day's sail from England.   Although they had no way of determining their exact position, they believed they were safely clear of the treacherous Scilly Islands off the English coast.   But as the ships sailed on, a crash was heard on the lower decks of the flagship.   They had run aground, and the hull had been severed below the water line. One by one, four ships hit the rocks.  And one by one, they sank.  In a matter of minutes, thousands of men drowned and an important part of England's fleet was lost.   The wreck of Admiral Shovell's fleet was a national tragedy. There were days of mourning, official inquiries.  If England was to be master of the seas, how could such a disaster have happened in her home waters?   The unfortunate situation had been exposed, and an outcry finally forced some action.  In 1714 Parliament offered a reward to anyone who could solve the key problem of navigation—how to find longitude at sea.   But if Newton and the Board expected that the huge prize would quickly produce and answer, they were frustrated by the rush of loony, half-backed pamphlets which flooded the book stalls of London.   William Hogarth's etching shows a pack of Longitude Lunatics searching for solutions within their asylum walls.  Finding longitude, in the public's mind, had become the work of madmen.   For John Harrison, at the age of twenty, clock making had become a passion. He was obsessed with accuracy and, by about 1720, he too had become intrigued with the problem of longitude at sea.   Although he was mostly unschooled, Harrison kept a detailed journal.  Some of his writings have survived, and his own words reveal how quickly he grasped the essence of the longitude problem—its connection to time.   In theory, a clock should work.  The earth turns a full 360 degrees in 24 hours, or 15 degrees each hour.   To know the longitude, one must know the time in two places at once.  If a sailor knew when it was noon at the home port—Greenwich England, for example—and then had to wait one our until it was high noon on board his ship, he would know that the ship was 15 degrees west of Greenwich.  If the sailor had to wait two hours for the sun to reach its high point, he was 30 degrees west. The challenge was knowing the time at the home port while sitting hundreds or thousands of miles away.   Harrison understood that an exceptionally accurate timekeeper which would work at sea could solve the problem.  But few clocks had reached the level of accuracy, even on land.  Here, above the stables of the great English country house at Brocklesby Park, one of Harrison's first machines still keeps time. Each Thursday morning the estate's carpenter winds the movement.   It was a wooden clock, like all of Harrison's early timekeepers. Its sturdy frame disguises its extraordinary accuracy and innovative features.   As a carpenter, Harrison knew the properties of wood.  And this led him to anew way of reducing friction, which all clock makers knew was the enemy of accuracy.   But could a clock based on these methods work at sea?   But some way of keeping the time at sea had to be found.   Desperate problems invite desperate solutions.  One fantastic scheme was presented by Professors William Whiston and Humphry Ditton.   If sky rockets were impractical, the sky itself might provide time signals if one knew where to look.   Using a primitive telescope, in 1610 the great astronomer Galileo discovered four moons circling the planet Jupiter.   He carefully charted their motions.  The four moons would become a celestial timekeeper when tables were eventually drawn, to show their positions at seven o'clock each night, precise to within a few minutes.   By the 1660s the Italian disciples of Galileo were close to perfecting his method of telling time with Jupiter's moons.  News of this breakthrough reached the Paris Observatory, which was soon to become the home of the greatest Italian astronomer since Galileo—Giovanni Domenico Cassini.   Using the moons of Jupiter to find longitude promised to revolutionize map making.  And, hoping to provide better maps for his busy map collectors, King Louis XIV set his new Italian astronomer to work.   Cassini would start by measuring the distance from the Paris meridian to the coasts.   When the stunned Louis XIV first saw the new, highly accurate map of his diminished kingdom, he is said to have exclaimed "I have just lost more territory to my astronomers than to all my enemies."   Cassini's method relied on the best telescopes of the day.  It has a high level of accuracy—perhaps a bit too high for the King.  But could the same system be used at sea?   With Jupiter unable to be used as a clock at sea, there seemed to be two alternatives.  Either find a different astronomical clock, or build a mechanical one.  And Newton and the Board of Longitude were skeptical of mechanical clocks.   Working in isolation, John Harrison never heard Newton's doubts; and the labor to perfect his clocks went on.   John Harrison's living room had become a genuine scientific laboratory.   Of the many factors which could degrade a clock's performance, none was worse then the effect slight changes in temperature had on the speed of the movement.   Searching for a pendulum which would not be affected by temperature, Harrison noticed that heat caused brass and iron wires to expand at different rates.  Making use of this observation, he combined wires of the two metals to compensate for expansion, producing and perfecting his gridiron pendulum.  He would succeed only when there was absolutely no time difference between the two clocks, whether hot or cold.  It was brilliant science requiring astonishing feats of observation.  By 1730, John Harrison had collected enough information on the effects of temperature, friction, and gravity to convince himself that he could really build a sea clock accurate and reliable enough to win the Longitude Prize.  For the first time in his life, he ventured beyond the vicinity of Barrow, traveling to London to present his proposal to the esteemed Astronomer Royal, Dr. Edmond Halley, predictor of the comet which bears his name.  Halley arranged an introduction to London's most famous clock maker, George Graham.  After a stay of several weeks Harrison returned to his village. His journals describe his London adventures, and give a glimpse of the country carpenter meeting England's most distinguished scientists.  His plain-spoken memoirs suggest that he was less than impressed by the work of the celebrated George Graham.  Harrison's meeting with George Graham was indeed a turning point. With Graham's support development money began to flow, allowing Harrison to build his first longitude timekeeper, the sea clock known today simply as H-1.  One by one, Harrison attacked the problems of adapting his clocks to go to sea.  Working in brass for the first time, he continued to use wheels of oak to engage rollers of ignum vitae.  To overcome the motion of the ship Harrison replaced his long pendulum with two rocking balance arms with springs to maintain their oscillations.  In 1736, Harrison accompanied his first sea clock on a preliminary testing voyage to Lisbon on board The Centurian.  The stormy five-week journey was to be the only ocean trip of John Harrison's life.  Without even asking for additional tests Harrison put H-1 aside and took on the job of producing what he hoped would be an improved model, H-2.  After two years of painstaking work Harrison noticed a fatal flaw.  When subjected to a specific extreme movement the accuracy of his bar balances was corrupted.  Harrison's development of his large sea clocks was bogging down. Years passed as his quest for perfection led up many blind alleys.  For a man obsessed with time, his own time meant nothing to him.  Both moon and stars move across the night sky.  Astronomers knew that the position of the moon against the stars was unique for every minute of every day.  They had the makings of a true celestial clock if someone could work it all out in advance. Enter the forceful champion of this lunar method, the Very Reverend Nevil Maskelyne.  If John Harrison was the perpetual outsider, Nevil Maskelyne was the perfect insider.  As a well bred, ambitious young astronomer from Cambridge,  Maskelyne set out to make a name for himself within the scientific establishment.  Laboring at Greenwich, Maskelyne observed the motion of the moon against the background of stars.  Eventually, he could predict its position for every minute of every day.  Using these predictions, Maskelyne produced a set of astronomical tables.  Unlike Jupiter, no powerful telescopes were needed.  From his ship, a navigator would measure the angle between the moon and certain stars.  Then, in theory, he could use Maskelyne's tables to find the time at Greenwich, if he had clear weather, precise instruments, and after hours of calculations.  But from a rolling deck just keeping site of the moon was a difficult chore, even without the lengthy computations.  But the Board of Longitude still would not accept that the clock was the answer, and it controlled the funds Harrison desperately needed to work on his difficult H-3.  Harrison continued to work.  In his H-3 he replaced his swinging bar balance with large balance wheels.  Almost as an aside he invented the caged roller bearing, a friction reducing device still widely used today.  And yet, his new clock continued to prove troublesome.  Perhaps Harrison's large timekeepers had reached a dead end.  This was an extraordinary change of direction.  Now Harrison was prepared to reject 25 years of his own work and move ahead on an almost untried technology, struggling to make smaller what he had always assumed should be made larger.  The Board of Longitude ordered H-4 to be tested on a proving voyage from Portsmouth, England to the island of Barbados.  Locked in its new protective box the precious watch had been carefully set to the correct time at Portsmouth using the sighting of the sun at noon.  For 46 days The Tartar sailed southwest across the Atlantic.  The ship passed from the chill of the English Channel to the tropical Caribbean—a temperature difference of 50 degrees.  After a month and a half at sea, on the morning of May 13, 1764, the Tartar dropped anchor off Bridgetown, Barbados.  The watch was rowed ashore to be examined.  To know if H-4 has passed the test the exact longitude of Bridgetown itself had to be determined to a new level of accuracy.  this was clearly work for an astronomer.  In a great irony Nevil Maskelyne, Harrison's chief rival, had been sent to Barbados months earlier to make careful land-based, moons of Jupiter observations for the purpose of determining the correct longitude.  The testing of the clock in Maskelyne's hands was bound to be thorough, but would it also be fair and objective?  Maskelyne's boasting had created an appearance of conflict-of-interest.  A century-long quest for longitude had come down to a contest between the work of two stubborn men on the beaches of a remote tropical island.  At the moment of noon, just as the sun reached its highest point over Bridgetown, William Harrison prepared to unlock H-4's case. The clock had not been reset for forty-six days.  At that same moment the watch indicated that it was 3
55 PM back in Portsmouth.  At fifteen degrees of longitude per hour, the clock placed the Harbor at Barbados just under sixty degrees west of Portsmouth, only a few miles from what we now know to be its actual position.  With Maskelyne now able to influence the Board, Harrison's hope that H-4's performance would quickly gain him the prize began to fade.  On the instructions of Nevil Maskelyne, Harrison's timekeepers were carted away for further tests.  This left Harrison deeply discouraged.  Finally, in 1772, Harrison's son wrote a letter to George III, pleading on behalf of his father.  The two Harrisons were soon granted an audience with the King of England.  And so, forty-three years after a young John Harrison first travelled to London, a reluctant Parliament at the insistence of the King, awarded him the full 20,000 pounds.  In 1995, the first truly world-wide navigation system was realized.  GPS, the Global Positioning System now provides navigators their latitude and longitude within a few feet anywhere on Earth.  As 24 satellites orbit ten thousand miles overhead, their atomic clocks are monitored for almost perfect accuracy.  Today, just as it was three hundred years ago the secret of knowing where you are is knowing what time it is.    Tonight, on NOVA
  As daylight fades, a silent hunter stalks. For the first time ever, under the cover of complete darkness, see her strike. With NOVA's special cameras, go on the hunt with Africa's most successful big cat.  Enter the hidden world of leopards of the night.  Many African cultures praise the courage and charisma of the leopard.  They also fear his stealth and his cunning, because he can move and hunt in total darkness, whereas we, unable to see, can only hide away.  This is South Luangwa National Park, in Zambia, a lush riverine valley full of life.  Leopards thrive here, but they are masters of concealment, and if you do catch a glimpse of an adult during the day, it's generally not doing very much at all. Tonight, on NOVA, lives were imperiled, fortunes spent, to possess a precious gem plucked from the sea. For centuries, its mystique centered on the mystery of its origins
 an accident of nature, or a product of human engineering? Has science unlocked the secret of the perfect pearl? Of all of the world's gems, it is the pearl which has held the greatest fascination for humans. So powerful is the pearl's allure, that for thousands of years, people have risked their lives to rest this perfect jewel from the ocean's depths. Today's cultured pearls are produced in their millions in a remarkable collusion between nature and science. But as science continues to perfect the techniques for pearl culturing, nature is not always a willing partner. Pearl oysters are sensitive creatures, susceptible to even subtle changes in the environment. They are a member of the mollusk family, one of the most successful species on earth. Mollusks have been around for at 530 million years, and have evolved into over 130,000 living species.  All types of mollusks can produce something resembling a pearl, but relatively few species create the lustrous objects we prize as gems. The quest to uncover the secrets of the pearl oyster has been a lifelong passion for zoologist John Lucas, an international mollusk expert. Currents also carry foreign material which can enter the shell. Normally, the oyster can expel any irritant that finds its way inside. But sometimes a piece of shell or coral catches in its delicate flesh. If it can't get rid of this foreign matter, the oyster isolates it inside a membrane or pearl sack that secretes nacre, the same smooth substance called mother of pearl that lines its shell. The irritant is slowly plated with translucent layers of calcium carbonate crystals, which make the irritant smooth and tolerable to the oyster. Throughout history, the pearl has been passionately sought after by kings and queens, emperors, and maharajahs. As valued in the West as in the East, pearls proclaim their owner's wealth and power, and were often the currency of romance. Even after the introduction of underwater breathing systems, diving for pearls remained dangerous and unpredictable. Shark attacks and accidents took their toll, along with the diver's disease known as the bends, where nitrogen bubbles form in the blood stream.  Sometimes divers were forced to dive too deep, or stay below too long. The human passion for pearls took a heavy toll. Natural pearls are always rare, exquisite accidents of nature. And when discovered, they're almost never perfectly round. They come in an infinite variety of shapes. Formations, bumps, and half-domes, that grow against the shell's interior surface are called mabes.  Some pearls grow into irregular and, sometimes, fantastic forms called baroques. A baroque is created when an oyster is unable to turn the foreign object inside its shell, causing the layering of nacre to build up unevenly. The mystique of the pearl centered on the mystery of its origins. The first known example of pearl culturing came in the 12th century, when the Chinese produced little pearl Buddhas by sliding figurines into freshwater mussels between the body and the shell.  The practice of inducing mollusks to make pearls goes back more than 1,500 years. As early as the 5th century, the Chinese produced pearls by inserting small objects, including images of Buddha, between the shell of a freshwater mussel and its nacre-producing mantle. It wasn't until the end of the 19th century that a technique for culturing pearls was invented in Japan. At last, the natural process could be duplicated. The essential discovery was made by the son of a noodle shop owner, Kokichi Mikimoto. After twenty years of exhaustive research and many disappointments, he founded Japan's cultured pearl industry. Mikimoto had discovered a natural irritant which the oyster wouldn't reject. But these implanted beads were still not being consistently coated with nacre. Another ingredient was needed. Fortunately, two other Japanese experimenters found the answer, which Mikimoto would later license. In this procedure called nucleation, mantle tissue from another oyster induces the formation of a pearl sack around the irritant bead. That pearl sack then secretes nacre, and, over a period of time, produces a cultured pearl. Mikimoto also invented a system for farming oysters. His divers gathered wild akoya oysters, which thrived in the sheltered coastal waters of Japan. Once they'd been nucleated, the oysters were caged and suspended from rafts and left to grow for four years, to produce a thick coating of nacre. Mikimoto wasn't just a remarkable innovator. He was also a brilliant business man and promoter. He worked tirelessly to have his cultured pearls accepted as true gems. Mikimoto invented the process for culturing pearls in Japan's Ago Bay. Today, dozens of large pearl companies cultivate oysters in the bay.  Small oysters, like the akoya, usually cannot tolerate nucleation more than once.  Most will be killed during harvesting when the pearls are separated from the flesh. The Japanese Akoya, Pinctada imbricata,  Japan's pearling industry expanded beyond its boarders to other Pacific shores in search of larger South Sea oysters. In the late 1950s, the Japanese arrived in Australia, helping to establish the countries first cultured pearl farm in the Kimberly region.  Australia is home to the Pinctada Maxima, the world's largest oyster, producer of the biggest and most expensive pearls. It can live up to twenty years, growing to the size of a dinner plate.  The environment in this remote region proved ideal for sustaining a large, healthy population of pearl oysters. These shell beds are swept by an exceptionally high tidal flow, providing the oysters an abundant supply of food. Nick Paspaley now runs a modern pearl culturing operation along these shores. His father began the business in the 1930s, harvesting oysters long before the arrival of Japanese culturing methods. In those days, gem quality pearls were rare, and the business of the day was in the profit the shells could bring. Nick's father became one of the first Australians to move into pearl culturing, and, in 1958, he established a farm with Japanese and American partners. Oysters were gathered in the wild. But instead of killing the oysters for their shells, the live animals were transported to sheltered bays and used as raw stock to cultivate pearls. Japanese technicians were employed to make use of their proven, but still secret culturing techniques. The Japanese also brought their oyster farming methods.  They crowded together the large Australian shells, 5,000 or more, suspended from a single pontoon. But disaster struck. 60 percent of the oysters died, and those that survived produced only a few gems quality pearls. Clearly, Paspaley would have to find new methods. Unable to roll in the surf, captive oysters quickly become smothered by barnacles. To avoid this, oysters were winched onboard and put through cleaning machines every few weeks. The oysters' health did improve. But other problems remained. The harbor water was becoming less pristine and overcrowding was a growing concern.  Now, every year from June till September, Australian crews and Japanese technicians live and work in an environment more beneficial to the health of the oysters. This floating enterprise is a high-tech solution to the threat of oyster mortality. But it is a solution few can afford. In Japan, pearl farmers are also struggling with the problem of overcrowding. And pollution is a major concern.  After 100 years of continuous pearl culturing in Ago Bay, the Akoya oyster is under assault. Katsumasa Tanaka and his wife, Kikumi, are second generation pearl farmers at Shimatown on Ago Bay. One of hundreds of independent producers in Japan, the Tanikas practice a technique handed down from Katsumasa's father, who started the family business more than 30 years ago. Ago Bay is no longer a quiet backwater. Today, it's a busy port surrounded by residential and tourist development. Industrial and domestic wastes are steadily polluting the once healthy waters in which the farmed oysters live and breathe. One threat is when toxin-producing plankton reproduce in great numbers, causing what is called "red tide."  Long term problems with pollution have made Japanese scientists leading authorities on algal blooms. The senior manager at Mikimoto's Pearl Research Laboratory is Dr. Shigeru Akamatsu. Every day, the laboratory collects samples to monitor the water quality in Ago Bay. When dangerously high levels of plankton are detected, Mikimoto scientists alert government authorities, who advise local farmers to reposition their oysters. But red tide isn't the only problem. Ago Bay is now pushed to the limits, accommodating scores of small pearling companies. Packed tightly across the bay, the mesh of oyster nets restricts tidal movements, reducing the food supply. If the oysters don't grow, neither do the pearls. Rising mortality rates is one reason Japanese pearl farmers have taken to harvesting early.  On some farms, the traditional three-year growth cycle has been reduced to as little as six months. Often, buyers are unwilling to risk the wait for higher-quality pearls. This harvest will supply the ready market for less expensive pearl jewelry. In the still-clean waters of Western Australia, pearl producers have been able to avoid many of the problems faced by Japanese farmers. But clean water alone is not enough. During the nucleation process, the large Australian oyster becomes stressed. An elaborate storage and conveyance system is designed to reduce the time it spends out of water. No longer a secret, Mikimoto's technique is still performed here by Japanese technicians. A cut is made in the oyster, and a shell bead inserted into the flesh. Positioning the bead is critical. For a perfect round, the technicians aim for the reproductive organs.  Nick Paspaley and his technicians have developed their own trade secrets. They've introduced antiseptics and hygienic conditions to minimize the oyster's exposure to infection. Unlike fish, oysters can survive out of water for hours.  Every two weeks, the oysters are cleaned to remove marine growths, which carry parasites and diseases that can affect the oyster's health, or even kill them. The cages are turned regularly, so that the embryonic pearls develop evenly. This way, they're more likely to produce the perfect spheres that are so highly prized in the marketplace. Once they've recovered, the oysters are transferred to one of the farms dotted in more sheltered waters. The farm at Talbot Bay is nestled among the ancient cliffs of the Kimberley Coast. It's home to more than 100,000 nucleated oysters. As the oysters mature, they're periodically x-rayed to gauge their progress. But with all the care in the world, nature still has the power to intervene. High winds and waves can kill unprotected oysters and tear apart entire farms. After two years of careful nurturing, the oysters are removed from the water, so that the pearls can be harvested. This is the moment of truth.  Now, in a second operation, the pearl is removed. After a two-year growth cycle, the hope for a result is a large pearl of excellent quality, with a thick coating of nacre. If an oyster yields a good-quality pearl, the technician immediately implants a fresh nucleus to start the process all over again. With a productive life of around eight years, an oyster can produce up to four pearls.  As the oyster continues to grow, it can tolerate increasingly larger nuclei, so it will produce its biggest pearl towards the end of its life. Giant South Sea pearls such as this comprise only five percent of the world's pearl market. They are extravagantly expensive, and out of reach for most consumers. The smaller Japanese pearl is still the most popular and affordable. The Mikimoto Company specializes in the high-end of this vast consumer market. For years, the Mikimoto Company produced all the pearls it sold. Today, half of what it sells comes from other pearl suppliers. China and other Asian countries are rapidly developing their own pearl culturing industries, competing for the mass market with Japan's Akoya pearls. Japan's dominance has diminished as a producer, but Japanese companies still control much of the world's pearl market. The rest of it is shared by others. Nick Paspaley will soon be selling his most recent harvest. In the world of pearls, these command the highest price. And it is New York where many of them will end up. Americans spend more each year on pearl jewelry than any other consumers in the world. Much of what they buy passes through New York. One of this country's best known pearl dealers is Salvador Assael. He specializes in South Sea pearls from Tahiti and Australia, that command dazzling prices in New York's auction rooms and jewelry salons. Her flamboyant costumes included yards of the gem that had once been the trademark of nobility. These cross-shaped pearls are from Lake Biwa in Japan. Formed in fresh water mussels, the Biwa pearls are induced by inserting mantle tissue alone without a bead. As a result, it's the shape of the tissue that determines the shape of the pearl. But as environmental pollution contaminates the lake where they grow, these gems are now virtually unobtainable.  Today, it is the black pearl that is capturing the attention of jewelry designers. Black pearls were once considered an exotic oddity, rare and almost mythical. Now, they are becoming increasingly popular. Salvador Assael claims credit for helping introduce the black pearl to New York's fashion jewelers. In the past few years, more islands in the South Pacific have been producing this once-rare commodity. Most black pearls are produced commercially in the remote coral atolls of Tahiti, in the middle of the Pacific Ocean.  The warm ocean currents and concentration of plankton in these waters create a favorable environment for the black-lipped pearl oysters, pinctada margaratifara.. This oyster is second only to the giant pinctada maxima in size, growing up to 12 inches in width and weighing as much as 11 pounds. It can produce pearls ranging from 10 to 17 millimeters. The pearl's distinctive range of colors is determined by the dark shades of the oyster shell and may also be affected by mineral salts in the water. Like the Australians, Tahitian pearl producers have adapted the traditional Japanese methods of cultivation to suit local conditions. But typhoons and sudden temperature fluctuations make these oysters vulnerable. Until recently, mortality was high, with a third of oysters dying after nucleation. To ensure the future of pearl culturing, the industry must understand every aspect of the oyster's development, even manipulating its genes in the quest for ultimate control. Dr. John Lucas is experimenting with a method of artificially breeding oysters in hatcheries, so that the small island states of the South Pacific can develop their own pearling industries without plundering their reefs for wild oysters. The moment of spawning begins with a milky eruption. The Japanese were the first to experiment with artificial breeding techniques more than 50 years ago. Then, as now, there are not enough wild Akoya oysters to meet the demands of the industry. Today, they hatch oysters in large glass tanks inside laboratories. After two months' growth, the spats, or baby oysters, are suspended under water in breeding cages. Overbreeding from the same genetic strains may soften the oysters' shell. Because the shell is its only defense against the outside world, any weakness in this natural armor can put the health of the oyster at risk. But, even healthy oysters do not always produce perfect pearls. At the end of the annual harvest, every gem is graded by shape, color, lustre and size. The painstaking process of matching the pearls then begins. With only 150 gem quality South Sea necklaces produced in a year, these cultured pearls have started to command prices at auction once reserved for rare natural pearls. In 1992, an Australian South Sea necklace was sold at Sotheby's in New York for $2.3 million dollars, a world auction record. Australia's cultured pearl industry continues to benefit from the luxury of largely unpolluted waters. Off the country's remote northern coast, pearl farmers can still collect wild shells, but only with a permit. Strictly enforced quotas limit the number of shells each farmer can collect, helping to ensure the future of Australia's wild oyster population. Pearls were once considered miraculous, a gift from the Gods. Science may have unraveled the oyster's secrets, but the pearl remains an evocative symbol of nature's genius, and a haunting reminder that humans too often destroy what they treasure most. Tonight on NOVA, a mystery on the icy depths of Loch Ness. Eye witnesses bring the legend of Loch Ness to life. Can science bring proof to the surface? Is Nessie a prehistoric monster or an elaborate hoax? An expedition launches a search for the answer. The beast of Loch Ness. ...("NOVA" theme music)... Major funding for NOVA is provided by the Park Foundation, dedicated to education and quality television. And by Iomega, makers of personal storage solutions for your computer so you can create more, share more, save more and do more of whatever it is you do. Iomega. Because it's your stuff. In the remote highlands of other Scotland, there is a place of haunting beauty. Steeped in mystery. Loch Ness. Beneath this wind-swept surface, lies one of the world's deepest bodies of water. It is a cold and forbidding environment. Drowning victims sink without a trace in the icy depths. Divers fear becoming disoriented in the eternal night, ever mindful of the legend of Loch Ness. Is this what they are seeing? A photograph taking in 1934 shows an unknown animal, or an elaborate hoax. This film was shot by an aeronautical engineer in 1960. When computer processed for NOVA, it shoes a featureless back hump, quite different from the boat, filmed later that day for comparison. Both are moving at ten miles an hour. Photographic experts at the Royal Air Force concluded that the hump is at least six feet wide and five feet high. Probably an animate object. Today, a new expeditions arrives to search the Loch. The leader is Bob Rines. Rines is a man of many accomplishments
 A respected patent attorney and founder of a law school, he was trained in science and engineering at MIT, and helped in them development of both radar and sonar. But his true passion is a pursuit few scientists take seriously
 The hunt for the Loch Ness Monster. Rines' longtime partner in the search is Charles Wyckoff. A photographic innovator with over 60 patents to his name, Wyckoff created the film stocks that captured the first images of atomic bomb explosions and moon landings. It took time for this scientist to warm to the idea of the Monster. For these two men, this expedition might well be the final chapter in a quest that began some 30 years ago, when Rines became intrigued by the mystery on a chance visit to Loch Ness. As a lawyer, used to dealing with eye-witness testimony, he found the accounts of sightings persuasive. His hunch turned to conviction in the summer of 1972, when he and his wife, Carol, had an experience that would ever haunt them. The sighting inspired Rines to mount an expedition, combining old technologies in new ways. He aimed a sonar out into the depths and nearby, placed a camera with a strobe light to take pictures every 45 seconds. After weeks of waiting, the plan finally paid off. For thousands of frames, there was nothing. Then, suddenly, three frames showing an object reflecting the strobe light back at the camera. After computer enhancement at NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory, the image revealed a flipper-like shape some six feet long. Rines' excitement was shared by his mentor, Harold "Doc" Edgerton, a legendary figure at MIT, the inventor of both strobe photography and side-scan sonar. Edgerton would be an active participant in Rines' later expeditions. New sonar hits and this image, in which some see the body and neck of a large animal helped to win an other important convert, one of Britain's most respected naturalists, Sir Peter Scott. With the support of Edgerton and Scott, the idea of the Monster gained new credibility. In 1975, Rines and Scott were invited to write an article in the prestigious scientific journal, Nature. For a moment, Rines had the attention of the scientific world. But his case for Nessie was soon embroiled in controversy. The flipper photo, already computer-enhanced by NASA, somehow became this image, raising doubts about its validity. As the years passed, with no follow-up by zoologists, Rines felt growing pressure to settle unfinished business. With only Wyckoff left of the original team, it is now or never. But searching Loch Ness is harder than it looks. Stretching 24 miles from the Cross-Scotland Caladonian Canal to Inverness, where the river Ness empties out into the sea, the Loch fills a deep chasm with sheer walls that plunge 800 feet down, making it the largest body of water in the British Isles. High above the Loch, Fish and his assistant install a relay station for their global positioning system, a key tool in Rines' new, more aggressive search strategy. Instead of waiting for the Monster to come to him, this time, Rines will sweep the Loch with sonar. If the sonar team finds a target, the GPS will give them a precise location. The camera team, close behind in a second boat, will then move in and attempt to capture the target on film. Getting pictures will take all of Wyckoff's ingenuity. Loch Ness is filled with peat particles washed down from the surrounding hills. The yellow haze limits visibility to a few feet. With most of the expedition's limited funds devoted to sonar, Wyckoff and his colleague, Sheldon Apsol, (?) have had to improvise. In the best MIT tradition, they have assembled a rig with a low light video camera and car headlight mounted on an aluminum frame left over from an expedition in the '70s. The final team member will play a very different role. Local naturalist, Adrian Shine, came to the Loch 20 years ago in the hope of solving the mystery. But his research has convinced him that there's no monster here. Despite their strongly opposing views, Rines has asked Shine to lend his expertise to the expedition. With the preparations completed, Rines, anxious to get started, briefs the team. A quarter of a century after his first attempt, Rines is back in the hunt. The lead boat is packed with high tech gear. Attached to the hull is a fish-finding sonar pointing straight down from surface to bottom. It will supplement the expedition's primary search tool, Sidescan Sonar. While it looks like Edgerton's original device, today's model is far more sophisticated. Pulled below and behind the boat, the Sidescan tow fish (?) sends out a sound impulse or "ping" in a 180 degree arc. In 1994 the British Natural History Museum took part in Project Urchin, the first major effort to study the ecology of the Loch. Monsters were not on the agenda. Yet its sonar experts said they too found large moving targets. Well Rines' systematic sonar sweep is going smoothly, Wyckoff is rediscovering the difficulty of taking pictures in Loch Ness. Moisture has seeped in and ruined the camera. They will have to send for a replacement; the timing couldn't be worse. If the side scan picks up the target, it may reveal more. But interpretation can be difficult. With sound waves bouncing off the steep sides, the Loch is notorious for generating misleading sonar images. Even changes in the water temperature or thermal can create apparent targets where none exist. Whatever the target was, the tow fish passed beneath it and failed to pick it up. Still, it's a tantalizing start. Even Arnie Carr is beginning to believe there may be something here. For Rines, this unconfirmed hit is an encouraging sign. Could the creature he and thousands of others believe they have witnessed still be here? ...(music)... The sightings began when a new road gave travellers their first good views of Loch Ness. It was here in 1933 that two local residents reported seeing an enormous animal rolling and plunging on the surface. An account of their sighting in the local paper brought the news of the beast to the rest of the world. The Loch Ness Monster has been a media phenomenon ever since. The Intrepid, armed to the teeth, set out to capture the beast, to no avail. Capture an image proved to be the next best thing. Some photographers resorted to outright fraud. Others succumbed to the Loch's powers of deception. Boat weights (?), wild life, and floating debris have all been mistaken for monsters. But one photograph stood above the rest. ...(music).... Boyd's investigation led to man named Christian Sperling, who claimed that he and the surgeon, Dr. Wilson, had been part of a plot to dupe a London newspaper. The object in the photograph was a one-foot plastic neck that Sperling had grafted to a toy submarine. This confession dealt a powerful blow to the Loch Ness Monster. But to American journalist, Richard Smith, the confession didn't ring true. With Rines' support, Smith has come to Loch Ness to find out if the hoax story may, itself, be a hoax. Is this a one-foot model, photographed from up close, or the four-foot neck of a living animal, shot from a distance? To find out, Smith has built floating necks, one and four feet high. His plan is to photograph them from different vantage points to see which one matches the original photo. Smith's experiment is possible only because the discovery of a new version of the surgeon's photo. The narrow strip of the far shore line, and the absence of near shoreline show how the picture was framed. And the ripples around the object provide another clue. Analysis of the ellipse shows that the camera was pointing at an angle of 19 degrees down from the horizon. Using these clues to guide his experiment, Smith has recruited a surveyor and a professional photographer to help him duplicate the surgeon's photo. Down on the shoreline where Sperling said the photograph was taken, Smith tests the "one-foot" model. The next morning, the team get their first look at the prints. To Rines and Wyckoff, the one-foot model doesn't match the original photo. The four-foot model is more convincing. Smith is convinced; now it's up to the doubters. A short way down the Loch, Alastair Boyd decided to take up Smith's challenge, with the ever skeptical Shine lending a helping hand. With the one-foot styrofoam model, they hope to prove the photo was a hoax. They too are careful to angle their camera at 19 degrees. On the left is the recreation. On the right is the original. Despite the near identical images, Smith has reservations. Boyd's experiment shows that a one-foot model can produce an image much like the surgeon's photo. The picture might be a hoax, but Boyd has no doubt that the creature in the Loch is real. Day three of the expedition. With the camera still out of commission, Wyckoff has joined Rines aboard the sonar boat for a night run. Tonight they will concentrate on Urchin Bay, where the ruins of a fourteenth century castle overlook the deepest part of the Loch. After several hours of routine searching, there is a flurry of activity. A number of targets have appeared on the print-out. One catches Arnie Carr's attention. He estimates that it's five meters, or sixteen feet long. Using the GPS relay system, they come about to search the same area again. If the target is still there on the second pass, it's probably stationary debris. If not, it's moving. To marine biologist Arnie Carr, the size and density of the mark on the print-out indicate a large, solid mass, very different from a school of fish. Carr's analysis makes photographic back-up essential. The next morning Wyckoff's team is back in action. They've replaced their video camera with a professional underwater model. With the new camera performing even better than expected, the expedition is back up to speed. There is a sense of anticipation that the long search is about to pay off with an exciting zoological discovery. ...(music)... If Nessie is an animal, as the eye-witnesses say, the implications extend well beyond Loch Ness. Long necked monsters have been reported in northern lakes all over the world, from Lake Ciarre (?) in Siberia, to Lake Champlain in North America. Could these other lake "monsters" be flesh and blood too? Cryptozoology is dedicated to the study of cryptids, or unknown animals. In almost every case, the search is triggered by eye-witness reports, a source of evidence most scientists disregard. But eye-witness evidence sometimes leads to remarkable discoveries. The Okapi in 1901; the mountain gorilla in 1912; and in 1994, the pseudo oryx in Vietnam. These were brand new species unknown to science. Rines' conviction is shared by Roy Mackal, a pioneer in the field of cryptozoology. Mackal, a molecular biologist by training, came to Scotland in the 1960s and joined a local group of enthusiasts who kept a constant vigil on the Loch. His work helped persuade Rines that there was something here worth investigating. It's been 30 years since Mackal interviewed eye-witnesses, and the descriptions remain the same. ...(music)... Long before Sir Peter Scott, when the Highland tourist industry made it popular, people were convinced that Nessie was a prehistoric relic. Plesiosaurs were cold-blooded marine reptiles that co-existed with the dinosaurs during the Jurassic and Crutatious periods, feeding on fish in the warm inland seas. But the oceans are home to a variety of prehistoric relics. From the massive megamouth shark, discovered in 1976, to the coelacanth, a fish once thought to have died out at the time as the plesiosaurs. Could a small population of plesiosaurs have escaped extinction, taking up refuge in Loch Ness? The Loch's geological origins hold the answer. Loch Ness straddles the Great Glen, a massive geological fault tat nearly cuts Scotland in two. As the land masses on either side of the fault slid by each other, they created and area of shattered rock or breccia. Each time an ice age descended on the northern hemisphere, the glaciers returned, repeatedly carving out this breccia to form a deep basin. Plesiosaurs could not have survived in Loch Ness since the age of dinosaurs, because for much of that time, it was a solid block of ice. When the glaciers finally retreated eleven thousand years ago, they left behind a deep pool of frigid water and a shallow passage to the sea
 The River Ness. Could Plesiosaurs have used the river to enter the Loch since then? It's an unlikely scenario. Even if they had somehow escaped extinction in the open oceans, these cold blooded reptiles would have had to adapt to the near freezing temperatures of the Loch Ness. Warm blooded mammals have the metabolism to thrive in cold water. And one primitive species of whale had a serpentine neck. It's known as an archeocyte. (?) But can Loch Ness sustain a breeding colony of these animals? ..(music).... Adrian Shine and fish biologist Alan Butterworth have set out this morning to explain the Loch's ecology. The dim light stifles plant growth, and in effects it ripples up the food chain, starting with the tiny plankton that feed on vegetation. Because of this limited food supply, the number of fish living in Loch Ness is surprisingly small for so large a lake. But there's another possibility
 Migratory salmon which pass through the Loch on their way to spawn. There is only one other plausible explanation for what Nessie might be
 A visitor from the sea. A large sturgeon could pass in and out of the Loch undetected, as could a large eel. Eels have been known to reach ten feet in length in the open ocean. Either one would explain the sonar hits. ...(music)... But the eye-witnesses don't buy it. Retired Chief of Detectives for Inverness, Ian Cameron, along with seven other people, reported one of the longest sighting on record, lasting almost an hour-. Day five, the Loch is flat calm, a good day for Nessie-hunting. By now, Rines has complete faith in his battle-tested sonar team. The pressure is on the untried camera crew. For today's last push, Rines has decided to focus, again, on Urchin Bay. Late in the morning, the boat's fish finder records a target at a depth of 25 meters. This is the expedition's biggest challenge, imaging a moving target under water. Minutes later, the target is out of range. Just when they seem closest to an answer, the team runs out of time. Wyckoff has learned the hard way that tracking and imaging a moving target in the murky waters of Loch Ness requires resources well beyond the means of this expedition. And something even money can't buy
 Luck. But Rines has achieved his primary goal, finding out if there is still something here. Reports of monsters in Loch Ness demand skepticism, especially given its long history of hoaxes. And the evidence from biology and geology seem to rule out Plesiosaurs or any other large, resident predator. But a lake so deep could well have a few secrets left. Someday, a more plausible explanation may emerge. Perhaps an occasional visitor from the sea. Until then, the unexplained sonar hits and the conviction of the eye-witnesses will keep the legend of Loch Ness alive.	The full horror of fire can be understood only by those who escape with their lives.  Time after time, the same deadly mistakes are made as victims underestimate the speed of fire.  They become disoriented in thick, blinding smoke, or suffocate on choking, toxic fumes.  Firefighters have battled this savage enemy for centuries, requiring an increasingly sophisticated arsenal of weapons.  But the towering skyscrapers of the 20th century have outstripped even the most modern firefighting technology.  Today, the best way to defeat fire is to prevent it.  We expect public places we frequent to be fire safe, like London's King's Cross Station.  This is the ticket hall of one of Britain's busiest traveled gateways.  It houses five subway and three railway lines.  Today, it is outfitted with modern fire prevention technology.  But it wasn't always that way.  When thousands of commuters passed through King's Cross Station in November 1987, they had no idea they were in any danger.  The fire started small, a careless act on the Picadilly line escalator.   One of six escalators in the station, it was made almost entirely of wood.  Underneath, years of grease and accumulated debris ignited.	Hidden under the Picadilly line escalator, the fire continued to grow.  But rush hour crowds still poured into the station.  Upstairs, a young musician named Ron Lipsius found nothing out of the ordinary.	Blocked from the Picadilly line escalator and unaware of the fire, Ron decided to take the nearby Victoria line.  He waited on the platform for a train.  Several precious minutes would go before he was advised to leave. Nearing the top of the Victoria line escalator, Ron began to realize that something was dreadfully wrong.	Suddenly, the fire bolted up the Picadilly line escalator and exploded into the ticket hall.  It was flashover, the worst possible moment in a fire, when everything combustible suddenly bursts into flame.  King's Cross Station had become an underground inferno.	Knocked down and badly burned, Ron somehow survived.  But he was in mortal danger.	Upstairs, the casualties were mounting.	Still downstairs and stumbling around, Ron was fighting for his life. Then, the miracle, as he calls it, happened.	Once outside, Ron collapsed on the street and was rushed into an ambulance.  He spent weeks in the hospital, and years recovering from his burns.  Since then, Ron has had dozens of operations to regain function in his hands.  Before the fire, Ron was building a career as a guitarist.  He can no longer play the guitar, but he still writes music, and he considers himself lucky - he escaped.  Thirty-one people died in one of the worst fires in British history.  But why?  It took months of sifting through the ruins to understand why this fire was so unusual - hotter, faster, and more ferocious than most.	After the fire, more than 150 changes were recommended throughout Britain's public transport system.  The wood escalators have been replaced with stainless steel.  Underneath, the mechanisms are cleaned regularly, and automatic sprinklers have been installed.  Smoke and fire alarms are now in place, and smoking bans are strictly enforced - all lessons learned from the tragedy at King's Cross.  Throughout history, fire safety has come at a terrible cost.  And every innovation is a legacy of centuries of battle against this brutal enemy.  One of the first chapters in firefighting history was written 2,000 years ago in ancient Rome, where a brand new technology was in use - the pump.  It remains the single most important weapon in a firefighter's arsenal.  The well is filled by buckets and the pumping action propels a continuous stream of water right into the fire, closer than any human could get.  When Rome passed into history, the water pump was forgotten, and in the vast darkness of the next 1000 years, firefighting in Europe was reduced to prayer and superstition.  By the middle of the 17th century, London was wholly unprepared for the disaster it was about to experience
  a fire of such magnitude it would have consequences for centuries to come.	Spreading to the roof and fanned by a strong wind, the fire advanced rapidly.  As it moved away from the river, another of London's problems became all too apparent.	In the dark of night, the citizen firefighters had to break through the cobblestones.  With fire spreading all around them, they burrowed down to the wooden water pipes several feet below.  More precious time passed while they drilled a hole in the wood.  Finally, some water to fight the fire. Bucket chains were formed, sometimes hundreds of people passing leather pails from hand to hand until they reached the fire.  But all too often, the water would give out.  The pressure was very low, and the pipe system unfamiliar to these volunteers.  Sometimes, they would cut into the wood at the wrong spots, wasting water and running upstream areas dry.	A pitiful defense against a raging inferno.  But the biggest challenge they faced was to fight the fire where no squirt or bucket could reach.	London was in chaos, teeming with people desperately trying to save their possessions.	Dry conditions, strong winds, and the total lack of trained firefighters conspired to keep this fire burning.	The Great Fire of London destroyed three-fifths of the entire metropolitan area.  With their city in ruins, the people of London finally realized the only escape from the devastation of fire was to be prepared.  From the ashes of London, modern firefighting began.  New building codes were passed.  Wood and plaster were replaced by more fire-resistant brick.  Soon, a better water system went under construction.  Wooden mains were still used, but now, holes were pre-cut in them.  Removable plugs were placed in the hole.  And they were made long enough to reach above ground, marking, for the next fire, exactly where the water was.  This is the origin of the phrase "fire plug," what some people still call hydrants today.  But the Great Fire might have been very different with one of these.  A thousand years after Rome fell, the Dutch reinvented the pump.  While London burned, Amsterdam was protected by 60 manual pumps and hundreds of trained firefighters.  But there were drawbacks.  Their pumps had fixed nozzles.  The best they could do was aim the water at a window and hope that it reached the fire inside.  It took a 17th century Dutch painter, Jan van der Heyden, to revolutionize firefighting with an invention we all take for granted today
  the hose.  It was made of leather, and 50 feet of hose weighed about 100 pounds - without the water.  With the hose, Amsterdam's firefighters could get the water closer to the fire than was ever dreamed possible.  By the mid-19th century, manual pumps had grown very large, to cope with the dangerous fires of the industrial age.	Large groups of volunteer firefighters created other problems, especially in cities like Cincinnati, which competing immigrant populations.	The problem would be solved with the same technology that powered the industrial age
  steam.  A steam powered pump could dramatically reduce the number of men needed in the fire service.  In 1852, Cincinnati unveiled the first American-built steam powered fire engine—and the firefighters didn't like it at all.   Determined to get this new technology accepted, the City of Cincinnati held a public contest.  The steam engine, with its three operators, would compete against their best manual pump and a dozen of the strongest firefighters.  And may the best man, or machine, win.  For the firefighters, the steamer was a serious threat.	Determined to beat the steamer, the volunteers had an early advantage.  All they needed to do was connect the hose to the pumper, tap into the underground water well, and pump away.  With strong backs and a determined will, they quickly got a good stream of water going.  The steamer took much more time to get ready.  It needed to be hot enough to generate the steam that powered the pump.  But finally, it, too, produced a strong stream of water.  At best, the contest looked like a tie.  But time would catch up with the volunteers.  More than 20 minutes of strenuous pumping took its toll. Exhausted, they gave up the fight.  Now, the steamer really showed its stuff—not just one, but four streams of water, all equally strong, all from one engine.  And it would pump until the coal ran out, or the water.  Within a year, the City of Cincinnati would change its entire system of firefighting.	By the end of the 19th century, most cities in America and Europe were using horse-drawn steamers.  Ultimately, they were replaced by motorized fire engines.  This is the Cincinnati Fire Department today.  It is one of the busiest in the United States.  In the battle between man and fire, the goal has always been the same
  to get as much water onto the fire as fast as possible. Success usually depends on the technology available.  Today, the engine itself is a pump that carries hundreds of feet of hose, many ladders, and a vast array of equipment that often marks the difference between life and death.	They are even beginning to look like weapons.  The Cincinnati Fire Department is testing out this quick action water cannon that fires a fine mist at more than 300 miles an hour.  No hydrant hook-up is needed.  The mist gun is completely self-contained.  The small water tank provides enough ammunition for 35 shots, each one powered by a slug of compressed air.  This gun may be most useful when water is scarce.  One squirt has the same effect as 35 gallons of water from a conventional hose.	In order to survive this hostile environment and do their job, firefighters must be protected.  The first line of defense
  protective clothing.	Turn-out gear is designed and tested to keep the firefighter inside as cool as possible in temperatures that can soar well over 1,000 degrees.  It is also fire-resistant.  That is extremely important in situations like this
 a firefighter caught in a sudden explosion, fuel and fire sprayed all over him. Thanks to protective clothing, he only suffered a burn on his ear.	Without a supply of air, firefighters are unable to enter a burning building.	Even with air, there are many dangers inside which could incapacitate firefighters.  That's why they wear a device that can signal for help.	But perhaps the worst part about fighting a fire is the lack of visibility.  These firefighters are about to test a new piece of equipment that could help them see in the smokiest environment.	As the toxic cloud of smoke descends with deadly speed, everyone in this room is in mortal danger.	It's the smoke that kills in most cases, not the fire.  Within minutes, visibility in this room will be down to zero.  This is what a fire really looks like.  Unlike the movies, there is no flame lighting the way.  All is obscured by black, deadly smoke.  These are the conditions that firefighters walk into every day.  But this helmet has a camera attached to the brim that can penetrate the darkness.  Using thermal imaging technology, what it actually "sees" is heat.	Once inside, this firefighter can immediately see the white, hot flames of the fire on the left . . .	. . . and his colleagues searching along the wall.  But the victim is the other way, clearly visible with the helmet.	He can even guide his colleagues over to help in the rescue.	A couple of decades ago, this was secret military technology that helped illuminate targets at night.  Now, a life-saving device, there is one drawback
  Few fire departments can afford the $25,000 price tag.	In real emergencies, seconds can make the difference between life and death.  Today, Cincinnati averages about four minutes from the time the alarm is called in to the moment firefighters arrive on the scene.  But it wasn't always that way.  Modern fire communication began with the invention of the fire alarm box in Boston in 1852.  Hidden inside was a telegraph system.  When the lever was pulled, the number on the box was transmitted across town to fire alarm headquarters.  From there, it was sent on to the fire station nearest to the box.  At the station, the address of the box was identified, and the fire company was off, sliding down the newly invented fire pole.  In some stations, the alarm system triggered the stall doors to open automatically.  And the trained horses were harnessed within seconds.  Of course, the firefighters still didn't know exactly where the fire was.  If no one stayed by the alarm box, they would just have to drive around until they saw smoke or flame.  Over the years, fire alarms saved countless lives.  But there was one problem that some local fire departments went to great lengths to remedy.	Today, Cincinnati, like cities all over the world, uses telephones and computer systems to get to the fire fast.  All emergency calls in the City of Cincinnati come here first.	With enhanced 911, the address of the telephone automatically comes up on the screen.  But that's not always the address of the fire.	Now, the dispatcher goes to work.  His computer determines which fire station is available and nearest to the fire.  And the call goes out.	Fire does its worst damage in the first few minutes - before most fire departments arrive at the scene.  The solution to this problem is to build fire safety into buildings themselves, like this one in New York City.  In 1911, this building was a monument to fire safety.  Made of stone, steel, and masonry, it was considered fire-proof.  It even had a rudimentary fire alarm and a water supply on every floor.  When a small fire broke out on the eighth floor, everything went smoothly.  The Fire Department arrived quickly, and the fire, confined to two floors, was put out within 18 minutes.  It was indeed a firefighting success story - except for one thing.  The building was a death trap.  Garry Briese, Executive Director of the International Association of Fire Chiefs, visits the building that forever changed world-wide attitudes about fire.	As the workers got ready to leave for the day, no one noticed a small fire smoldering in a rag bin.  By the time they did, it was growing rapidly, fueled by oil from sewing machines and flammable materials.	But one of the exit doors was always locked to prevent the employees from taking breaks or stealing.  There were three other exits.  One led to a steep and dangerous staircase that was filling with smoke.  It quickly became unusable.	All that was left were two tiny elevators.	No stairs, no fire escape, and no elevators.  The remaining Triangle Shirtwaist workers were trapped.	One hundred and forty-six people died in the Triangle Shirtwaist fire.  Seventy more were badly injured.  It all happened in less than 20 minutes.	Every industrialized country has a Life Safety Code - requirements for building design and construction that protect human life in a fire.	We are surrounded by the legacy of tragedies past.  After a rash of apartment and hotel fires in the 1940s, fire escapes were mandated.  In this century alone, thousands of people have died in theater fires.  Today, most theaters are required to have numerous exits, and occupancy is strictly limited.	Fire alarms and sprinklers are also required, and curtains must be made of fire-resistant materials.  Sometimes, a single fire can have a profound effect.  In 1942, Boston's Coconut Grove nightclub was crowded.  Many of the customers were soldiers and sailors, celebrating their last days before shipping out to war.  Exactly how the fire started is still in question, but there is no doubt about the tragedy that ensued.   The ceiling was decorated with a highly flammable fabric.  Fire and toxic smoke filled the room in seconds.	Hundreds of people became trapped in this burning inferno, crushed up against doors that opened inward.  Other exits were completely sealed off.	Four hundred and ninety-two people died in less than 15 minutes.  The injured lined the hallways of Boston's hospitals.  Officials collected bodies for hours.  Personal belongings were gathered in piles, and unclaimed cars were towed away for days.  It remains the worst nightclub disaster in American history.	Today's cities reach to the heavens.  But it is buildings like this that pose the greatest danger for the occupants and the greatest challenge to firefighters.  Some of the most horrifying fires have occurred in the high rise buildings that tower over our cities.  One of the worst, the Joelmo Office Building in Sao Paulo, Brazil, in 1974.  It started on the 15th floor.  The stairwells filled quickly with smoke and flames.  The heat was so intense that the helicopters could not land on the roof.  Ladders could not reach the trapped victims.  For some, there was no choice.  One hundred seventy-nine people died - the greatest loss of life in any high-rise fire.  The firefighting challenges posed by the high-rise buildings were graphically illustrated in this Philadelphia building.  In 1991, a fire broke out on the 22nd floor.  The only luck in this fire was that the building was empty. Everything else that could go wrong, did.	The water pressure problem would not be solved for more than ten hours.  In that time, three firefighters lost their way in the smoke, ran out of air, and died.	On the 30th floor, their luck turned.  A few floors at the top had been retrofitted with sprinklers.	There has never been a multiple death in a properly sprinklered building.  Yet only 40% of high-rise buildings have them—less than 2% of homes.  The surprising thing is that the technology has been around for almost 200 years.  Sprinklers date back to 1812, when British inventor Sir William Congreve patented the forerunner of the modern sprinkler system.  He arranged a series of perforated pipes along the ceiling.  Valves outside the building controlled water flow to the pipes.  That meant that fire had to be big enough to attract notice.  Fifty years later, a piano maker would come up with the automatic sprinkler.  Unaware of Congreve, Henry Parmalee long feared what a fire could do to his Connecticut piano factory.  He would not only solve that problem, but create a new business for himself.  Parmalee placed a cover over a small piece of pipe.  The genius behind this idea was that the solder he used would melt at 155 degrees.  Then, he attached the assembly to a pipe that was directly connected to a water supply.  To protect the entire area, he spaced a series of pipes several feet apart along the ceiling of his factory.  When the temperature at the sprinkler head reached 155 degrees, the solder would melt. Although today's sprinklers are more efficient, the basic technology is still the same as Henry Parmalee's invention almost 150 years ago.  Sprinklers would probably have made quick work of this 1993 fire in Basingstoke, England.  But none had been installed because engineers believed this five-year-old building would itself prevent fire from spreading.	And it worked - for a while.  The fire was initially contained on the eighth floor.  But there was one thing the designers didn't plan on.	It was an expensive lesson that none of the building designers predicted.  To understand this unusual fire, the University of Greenwich rebuilt the exterior of the Basingstoke building in its computers.	To solve the problem, Ed Galea drew in some ledges, or protrusions, over the window.  On the far right, the one-meter ledge is big enough to deflect the flame.  Although some of the hot gases cling to the building, the temperature stays low and the fire won't spread from the outside.	Computer modeling holds promise for safer building design, although even Ed Galea warns that computers can't solve all fire problems.	Escape from a fire demands more than good design.  It also requires understanding people.  This became painfully obvious in Bradford, England when, in the middle of televised soccer game, a small fire started in the debris under the stands.	Very soon, the heat and flames became unbearable.	Fifty-three people died, mostly because they waited too long to escape.  But why didn't they recognize the danger?	To save lives, human behavior must be taken into account in modern building design.  And that is exactly what this computer model does.  Each one of these virtual "people" is given physical attributes
  age, weight, strength, and so on.  And they are also given psychological traits
  drive, intelligence, and ambition.	The goal is to learn the lesson before tragedy strikes.  Maybe in the future, more fire victims will die in computers than in their homes and offices.  But until then, surviving a fire involves knowledge and preparation. Garry Briese knows better than most that no building is fireproof.  For him, fire safety is a routine part of everyday life.	The most important thing to know is where the exits are in case an emergency does happen.  Garry walks the route as soon as he is settled in his room.	Every day, more than 100 people die in car accidents.  This one is in Memphis, Tennessee.	In one dreadful moment, three lives have been shattered.  Two of these victims will not survive the trip to the hospital.  In the last 100 years, more Americans have died in car crashes than in all the wars the United States has ever fought.  Is there a way to make these devastating accidents survivable?  This is Germany's infamous highway system, the autobahn.  For long stretches, there is no speed limit.  Some cars cruise at 100 miles an hour, and faster.  Occasionally, German police cameras monitor the roads.  Most of the time, traffic flows in predictable patterns.  But recently, the cameras recorded a shocking event.  As shown on this small screen in the lower right, a Mercedes in the oncoming lane is about to round the far corner, traveling almost 150 miles an hour.  Playing back the tape, the police were able to see exactly what happened.  The car was going too fast to make the turn.  It grazed the guard rail on the right, and the driver lost control.  After sliding 400 feet upside down, the car comes to a stop on the embankment, and the removable top flies off.  Clearly, a horrifying accident, but what happens next is almost unbelievable.  The driver climbs out - not only alive, but uninjured!  A lucky man, certainly, but he also owes a large debt of gratitude to modern engineering.	As the car tilts, sensors trigger the rollover to pop up, creating a space between the driver's head and the pavement.  Wearing a seatbelt is crucial to keep the occupant inside.  Before the rollover bar was introduced in 1986, this kind of accident was unsurvivable.  In the last 30 years, science and engineering have helped created much safer cars.  Today, no new model hits the showroom without being rammed into walls, barriers, and other automobiles - to comply with international standards of safety.  But it wasn't always this way.  Automobile safety came slowly, and at the expense of millions of lives. This is a 1929 Chevrolet, crash tested using today's standards.	Survival in one of these "motorized coffins" was due mostly to luck, and the fact that cars were slow and scarce.  The automobile age began in Germany.  Powered by a combustion engine, the first car was built by Karl Benz in 1886.  For years, the automobile was considered a toy in Europe, meant only for the very rich.  It was an entirely different story in America.  Soon after the turn of the century, low-cost automobiles went on the market and Americans bought them in staggering numbers -even if the roads weren't always ready for them!  As the number of cars increased, so did accidents.  By the early 1920s, more than half a million people had died in collisions.  Yet, nobody blamed the automobile.  Accidents were considered an act of God - or, a bad driver.	Auto makers avoided the topic of car safety.  Sales could be hurt if customers began to think of cars as dangerous machines.  There was, however, one aspect of car design so lethal everyone recognized the need to change it - plate glass windows.  A minor collision, even a small rock tossed up by a passing vehicle could shatter a windshield, sending razor-sharp shards of glass inside.  In 1910, a laboratory accident would lead to a major advance in glass safety when Edouard Benedictus, a French chemist, knocked a flask on the floor. To his amazement, the bottle broke, but didn't shatter, because it was coated with nitrocellulose which had dried out, leaving an adhesive film on the inside.  Benedictus didn't think much about the incident until he read of an auto accident in which a young girl's face was disfigured by flying glass. Moved by the reports, he went back to his lab.  The result was a sheet of celluloid adhesive between two pieces of glass.  Bonded together, they made one clear pane, the middle layer holding the lethal pieces in place.  An improved form was first used in gas masks during World War I.  But it took 16 years and an accident to get safety glass used in cars.	Safety glass was considered such an important advance, car companies even advertised it.	Used in front windshields for almost 40 years, safety glass was an improvement - although far from perfect.  This, called the "glass necklace," was the unforeseen consequence of safety glass - graphically described in this film from the 1960s.	The glass necklace caused serious lacerations of the neck and head, sometimes even decapitation.  A glass more resistant to breakage was needed, but it couldn't be made so hard that an impact would cause serious neck and brain injuries.  The answer was to replace the adhesive with a middle layer of plastic that would stretch but not break.  But in most cars, glass-plastic is only installed in the front windshield, increasing the danger of ejection in side impact accidents.  By the mid 1920s, there were 22 million cars on American roads.  The initial demand for automobiles had been satisfied and sales were in a slump.  To spur the market, General Motors instituted the annual model change.	Dazzled by the new styles, most of the car-buying public ignored the carnage on the roads.  One accident at a time, cars were taking tens of thousands of lives every year and injuring millions.  There was one Detroit physician fully aware of the problem.  Plastic surgeon Claire Straith spent most of his time repairing the faces of crash victims.	Even in minor accidents, serious injuries would result when the human body met up with the car's interior.  Protruding knobs could rupture an eye or sever a nose.  Rock-hard dashboards fractured skulls and caused debilitating, crushing injuries.  Claire Straith's granddaughter, Janet Straith Husband.	Dr. Straith came up with a simple idea that could prevent such horrible injuries.	Claire Straith designed numerous pads to fit all different makes and models of cars, and tried to market his invention.  But it was never a commercial success.	The 1937 Dodge was a direct result of Claire Straith's talk with Walter Chrysler.  It had a safety smooth dashboard with knobs that were recessed.  The dash was raised to prevent knee injuries, and the front seat back was padded to protect passengers in the rear.  The 1937 Dodge was an improvement, but it had little influence on the auto industry as a whole. Safety would not be its focus for many years.	Hugh DeHaven's interest in safety began with a plane crash during World War I.  He was engaged in a practice dogfight and both planes went down. The other pilot walked away, but DeHaven spent months in the hospital wondering why he alone was so badly injured.  That question became DeHaven's life's work, and that of his friend and colleague, Colonel John Stapp.	In 1954, more than 35 years after his plane crash, a documentary about DeHaven's work at Cornell University aired on CBS.	The scientists at Cornell studied the forces that injure the human body.  To obtain measurements, they bounced plastic heads on dashboards and dropped tin men onto knobs.  They even studied some human oddities, like the story of Louis Zito, who lost his balance while working on top of this smokestack and fell 15 stories down.	Luck, certainly, but science had a lot to do with Zito's amazing survival.  Hugh DeHaven analyzed the plunge.	At that speed, Zito should have died on impact.  What interested DeHaven was why he didn't.	Zito's survival proved that even severe impact forces can be reduced with padding.  But that kind?  And how much?  To test different materials, DeHaven's team used the most fragile object they could think of (an egg), and dropped it 15 feet down.  The materials developed at Cornell would eventually find their way into automobiles.  But DeHaven knew that padding wouldn't solve all the problems.  And he proved it with some of the earliest crash tests on record.	With crash tests, they would prove the central foundation of DeHaven's work, that for every accident, there are really two collisions.  The first one occurs when the car crashes into an object.	The second one, when unrestrained occupants inside the car collide with the dashboard, windshield, or even the back seat.	It's the second collision that kills and injures, and Hugh DeHaven knew the best way to prevent it
  seatbelts.	The occupant is safely held in place, riding down the impact forces. As a result of Hugh DeHaven's studies and his relentless advocacy of seatbelts, auto makers began to offer them in cars in 1955 - not as standard equipment, but as an option.  Called lap belts, or two-point belts because they attached to the car frame at two points, they were an important improvement in safety. But they weren't perfect.  Head injuries, while less severe, still occurred. Spinal injuries were possible.  And sometimes, when the belt was placed too far above the hips, serious abdominal injuries could result.  In the 1950s, aware of the problem with lap belts, Volvo tried a diagonal belt that went across the chest.  But it, too, had some fatal flaws.  Retired safety engineer, Nils Bohlin.	Nils Bohlin would come up with a solution, simple, but very effective.  He demonstrates using the same prop that DeHaven used some years earlier—first, without a belt.	The three-point lap-shoulder belt worked because it restrained the two strongest parts of the body, the hips and the chest, with a single belt that was anchored by three connections to the car frame.	Nils Bohlin holds the patent for the single most effective safety device in any vehicle.  First installed in the 1959 Volvo, it took more than a decade for three-point seatbelts to be required in American cars.  That same year, Bela Berenyi, an engineer at Mercedes, came up with a safety concept that would completely change how cars were designed and built.  Before Berenyi, people believed the more rigid the body, the safer the car.  But such construction was deadly to passengers because all the impact forces went straight inside the vehicle.	Bela Berenyi recognized that if the front end and back end were built to crumple, most of the impact forces would be absorbed by the outside of the car before they reached the occupants.  And, if the occupant area were surrounded by a rigid frame, it could minimize intrusion from the crumpling members.	This is Berenyi's concept in action.  The damage to the car is severe, but the passenger space remains intact.  The secret to this design lies deep within the car frame.  Marked in red, the skeletal members are carefully designed and made of special materials that crumple in predictable ways.	First introduced in 1959, crumple zones with rigid cabs are now the standard in every car made throughout the world—although some cars perform better than others.  The only way to determine whether a car meets safety standards is to crash it, and then see what injuries the occupant has sustained.  That is where anthropometric dummies come in.  At about $100,000 each, dummies are as expensive as they are technically complex.  Still, scientists crash, smash, and abuse them in hundreds of different ways.  Each body part is made separately and designed to be as close to human as possible. Plastic skin is poured into a mold.  This one will become a knee.  An inner layer of flesh is extruded into the mold as well.  All the body parts weigh the same as they would in a comparably-sized person.  And the skin is wrapped around steel bones with joints that move smoothly.	Every car maker has a large collection of dummies - full-sized males, small females, even different sized children.  For every crash test, they are outfitted with dozens of sensors.  Wires connected to various parts of the dummies feed crash-impact data into waiting computers.  Small foils can be attached, that change color when pressure is applied.  And by matching the color, the severity of facial bone fracture can be determined.  Chest and rib injury can be detected by special sensors and then graphed on computers. Everywhere a human can be injured is measured, from neck stress to ankle flexion.  Dummies can't feel our pain.  But they can do a good job of measuring it, repeatedly and reliably.  It took almost half a century to create today's dummies.  In the 1950s, they weren't much more than mannequins.  One of the pioneering scientists in dummy development was Colonel John Stapp.  An Air Force doctor, Stapp was willing to undergo punishing speeds, and then suffer wrenching deceleration to gather the first crude measurements of the effect of crash forces on human beings.  His work was initially for aeronautic research, but it had universal applications.	Some tests were just too dangerous even for Stapp.  For those, he used cadavers and anesthetized animals.  The animal experiments would never be done today, but they did save lives.	Ford never did produce that steering wheel.  With the information he gathered, Colonel Stapp went on to write the first standards for anthropometric dummies, making animal experiments and human volunteers unnecessary.	But in the 1950s, safety still took a back seat to style.  Cars were becoming bigger and more powerful.  Speeding was such a problem, actor James Dean was asked to film a promotional spot.	A few weeks later, Dean died on a California road.  While the death rate soared, one accident in 1951 would inspire a safety idea so revolutionary that it took almost 30 years to show up in an automobile.  On a ride with his family, John Hetrick swerved to avoid a rock and landed into a ditch.	On the way home, Hetrick thought there should be something to stop people from hitting the dash or the windshield in a collision.	He thought of a cushion, a cloth cushion that would fill with air quickly when an accident occurred.	Almost a decade earlier, Hetrick worked in a Navy torpedo maintenance shop.  Torpedoes carried a charge of highly compressed air.  One day, an unusual event occurred.  The torpedo he was working on was covered with a canvas . . .	Inspired by a torpedo canvas, Hetrick's airbag was mechanical. Triggered by springs, the bag was filled by compressed air.  In 1952, John Hetrick was granted the first patent for an airbag.  Shortly after, he wrote to car makers and insurance companies, trying to market his new invention.  All but one letter went unanswered.	They wouldn't be interested in airbags for years to come.  But there was one car company that tried to break the mold.  In 1956, Ford introduced Detroit's first real effort at building a safer car.	Ford's so-called "Life Guard" design also included a padded dashboard and sun visors, seatbelts, and safety door latches.  And the company spent millions of dollars promoting it.  The only problem was, nobody wanted to buy it.	Styling sold cars.  And in 1960, this car captured the public's attention.  The new, sporty Chevy Corvair was exciting, and an instant hit.	Six years later, the Corvair shook the auto industry to its core, thanks to a young lawyer named Ralph Nader.	Nader's book, Unsafe at Any Speed, exposed many flaws in the Corvair's design, including the placement of the engine in the back, which created a rear wheel bias that could cause the Corvair to go out of control in a turn and flip over.	In 1966, President Johnson created the National Highway Safety Transportation Agency that would set standards of safety for all car makers to meet.	Soon, seatbelts were required in every car.  But getting people to use them was another matter.	But the ads didn't work.  In 1970, fewer than 15% of all Americans wore seatbelts.  The government called for a technological fix, a device that would restrain occupants in their seats, whether they liked it or not.  The race was on to develop the airbag, then considered to be the ultimate passive restraint.  It was a radical step; airbag deployments are violent events.  They use explosives to generate the gas needed to fill the bag.  And the bag itself deploys at 200 miles an hour.  Creating safe airbags was an enormous challenge. And there were several false steps.  Engineers had to determine how big the bag should be, what materials were best to use, and how to inflate them within 30 milliseconds after impact - without blowing them apart.  When the airbag deploys, some gas does seep out.  To be sure it wasn't toxic to humans, Mercedes carried out a series of tests.  The first ones involved putting a cage full of canaries in the automobile.	The canaries were unharmed by the gas, although they didn't like the noise airbags make when they deploy.  In fact, humans were also tested to ensure that they could withstand the explosion without hearing loss.  In 1980, Mercedes was the first to offer airbags as standard equipment.  Eight years later, all cars sold in the United States were required to have airbags.  And they are credited with saving thousands of lives.  But a darker side to the airbag story would soon emerge.	The car's speed at impact was about nine miles per hour, and the damage was minimal.  Both airbags deployed.  The boys in the back seat were fine, but Alison was limp and unconscious.	At the hospital, Rob learned that Alison had sustained a severe head injury and that she may be brain dead.	Alison died the next day.  Shortly after, her family discovered she was the 12th child killed by an airbag in a low-speed collision.  Injury can occur when the child's head is close to the airbag and struck in the first milliseconds of deployment.  Several children have been decapitated this way. Another type of injury is called catapult.	With other grieving families, Rob formed a group to force the auto industry to post a prominent warning about the dangers of airbags in all new cars.  The owners of older cars with passenger side bags received letters.	By the end of 1998, 48 adults had also been killed by airbags, mostly small women.	On/off switches are also available in some cars.  Although an airbag that is turned off won't kill anybody, it won't protect anyone, either.  Rob Sanders is a strong proponent of airbags.  But he is fighting hard for some basic changes in how they work.	But high technology may provide the ultimate solution
  an airbag system with a brain that decides for itself when and how the bag should deploy, based on certain criteria.   Under the seat is an electronic "scale" that directs the bag to deploy only if the rider is above a certain weight.  On the dash is an ultrasound sensor to determine the size and location of the person in the seat.  At the heart of the system, a computer.	The bag itself looks the same as today's systems, but can deploy at two different speeds.  This is the airbag module.  It is designed with a single canister that holds the gas that fills the bag.  On top, there are two initiators.  In a minor accident, only one initiator fires, and the bag inflates smaller and softer.  In a high-speed accident, both initiators fire, and the bag fills completely.  The third option is no deployment at all.  When an infant seat is placed in front of an airbag, the sensors recognize this dangerous situation and prevent the bag from opening.  Smart airbags won't show up in cars for several years, leaving in place a system that is life-saving for many, but decidedly unsafe for some.  After 100 years, cars are much safer than they have ever been.  But there is one thing that hasn't changed, the most dangerous threat of all
  the human behind the wheel.  Each year, 40,000 Americans die in car accidents.  Ninety percent are caused by human error.  The solution might be to take the human out of the driver's seat entirely.	And a computer can also drive a car.  This platoon of automobiles is completely controlled by computers.  The cars travel at 60 miles an hour, precisely 21 feet apart.  For ten days, this was the highway of the future, the two middle lanes of a seven-mile stretch of road in San Diego, built by a group of universities, private industry, and government.	A ride on the automated highway begins when the car takes over from the human.	Foot off the pedal, hands off the wheel, and leave the driving to the computer.	The magnets, in the center of the road, sense when a car is veering out of line and trigger the steering control to adjust.  Then, magnets themselves are small, buried an inch under the road.  They interact with three magnetometers attached under the front bumper.  There is a radar screen on the front and back of each vehicle that maintains a safe distance between the cars. And obstacles on the road are no problem.	What if something unexpected happens, like a breakdown?  Here, the automated truck detects the car ahead with plenty of time to change lanes.  But what would happen if the driver became ill?	But critics are skeptical that such a complex system can ever be truly reliable.	One of the goals of the automated highway system is to be collision-free.  But 2,000 pounds of steel hurtling across the landscape at 60 miles an hour is inherently dangerous, and as long as we choose to drive, we may never completely escape the risk.	An aircraft falls out of the sky.  For the military pilot, there is one last chance of escape.  For airline passengers, the only hope is to survive a crash landing.	There will always be aircraft accidents.  The problem is how to make them survivable.  Airline tragedies have forced engineers to confront the question of how to design planes to enable crash victims to escape with their lives.  The First World War introduced young aviators to the real dangers of aerial combat.  If their aircraft were hit, they had no means of escape.  On the Western front, the crews of observation balloons were in an even worse position.  Patrolling behind enemy lines, they were sitting targets.	Although the lives of hundreds of balloonists were saved, parachutes were thought to be unsuitable for airplane pilots.	Most pilots would have rather taken their chances with a parachute, even if they risked tangling it in a spinning aircraft.  But the generals feared pilots might be tempted to abandon their planes at the first whiff of danger.  Towards the end of the war, a German pilot was shot down, but managed to escape using a parachute attached to a can outside his aircraft.  The war was over by the time the Allies decided to install parachutes.  The idea of parachute escape was first conceived by Leonardo da Vinci.  Several Renaissance thinkers imagined it might save people from burning buildings.  But it would remain a paper idea for three centuries.  It works by the simple principle of counter-acting the downward force of gravity with the upward force of air resistance from the canopy.  The first public demonstration was in Paris in 1797, when a showman jettisoned his balloon and fell to earth on a parachute. Parachutes have always been associated with daredevil stunts.  In California, the public enjoyed spectacular air shows, which often ended with jumps.  But the parachute was still folded in a canister fixed to the plane.  One of the best known jumpers was a showman with the nickname "Sky High" Irvin.  He made his first jump from a balloon when he was 14, and had appeared in Hollywood movies.  By 23, he was one of the most experienced parachutists in America, and would be the guinea pig for a dangerous experimental jump.  In April, 1919, Irvin was selected by the Air Force to do a jump with the parachute strapped to his back instead of to the plane.  The folded chute would be ripped out of the canvas pack with a cord.  Many feared he might black out during the dive and not be able to pull the rip cord.  But the parachute's designer, Floyd Smith, who flew the plane, was confident.	This would be the world's first free-fall jump.  Would the acceleration be too much to bear?  Would he lose all sense of time, and delay pulling the rip cord too long?  Would the weight of his falling body be enough to pull open the chute?	Irvin capitalized on the success of his jump and set up the Irvin Parachute Company.  It soon became the largest parachute manufacturer in the world.  The military realized that parachutes were so reliable, they could be used not just for saving air crews, but for deploying troops.  And so, the paratrooper was born.  They would become the cavalry of the air.  Meanwhile, during the 30s, airline travel had become popular with the public.  It was far more dangerous than traveling by land or sea, yet if there was an emergency, passengers had no effective means of escape.	Aircraft designers began thinking of ingenious ways of getting passengers out of planes, like the trapdoor release, and the swing seat egress. One parachute company even made a promotional film to try to persuade airlines to provide parachutes for everyone.	In the days of propeller-powered aircraft, engine failure often caused accidents.	Mass parachute evacuation for airline passengers would remain a fantasy.	In reality, people not trained in parachute jumping risked serious injury, so the airlines never took up the idea.  In military planes, the parachute became the pilot's main hope of survival.  During the Second World War, it saved thousands of airmen's lives.  But as aircraft became faster, bailing out became more difficult.  Ground tests on a Spitfire showed the effects of wind blast, when a pilot tried to climb out of the cockpit.	Even if he could force himself out at such high speeds, he would risk smashing into the tail.  A new method of escape was needed.  Unknown to the Allies, in Germany, the Luftwaffe was already working on the problem.  Their new prototype jet could travel at over 500 miles per hour.  So, bailing out with a conventional parachute was impossible.  German scientists began trials to see how air crews might cope with sudden acceleration forces.  During an ejection, they would need to survive extreme air blasts.   Much of this work was carried out at a top secret research airfield at Rechlin, in what would become East Germany.  It was badly bombed in the final days of the war, and little remains today.  Returning for the first time in over 50 years, these men were all involved in high speed escape.  Theo Knacke is an engineer who left Germany after the war to work for the Air Force and NASA.  One of his first tasks was to design a parachute which would not be ripped apart at high speeds. His ingenious chute was made of silk ribbons.  They allowed the sudden blast of air to be released between the gaps.  After a few seconds, the weight of the falling pilot forced the ribbons to cling together, supporting his descent like a normal parachute.	But getting the pilot safely out of the cockpit was still a problem. The most important development to come out of Rechlin was the ejection seat. The seats were fired with compressed air using the same principle as an air gun.  Controlling the right amount of air was difficult.  If too much was used, the pilot's spine would be crushed.  One of the first to survive an ejection in battle was the Luftwaffe pilot, Otto Fries.	The Allies never built an ejection seat until after the war, when a small aircraft company in England grew to become the world's largest manufacturer.  The company, Martin Baker, was formed by an engineer named James Martin and a test pilot, Captain Val Baker.  Shortly after it was formed, Baker was killed flying one of Martin's prototypes.  So, the company stopped designing planes and began work on ejection seats.  The small family firm grew under the watchful eye of James Martin, who had a mission
  to save pilots' lives.	In the 1940s and early 50s, Martin Baker carried out some pioneering research on how to eject a pilot safely.  The pull-down blind protected his face from air blast, and ensured his elbows were tucked close to his body.  By using small explosive cartridges rather than compressed air, a much smaller shock was inflicted on the body.  The spine was only compressed briefly, reducing the risk of permanent damage.  This was a major improvement on the early German seats.  After several trial runs on dummies, they prepared for the first live ejection from an aircraft.  The guinea pig was to be a Martin Baker employee, Bernard Lynch.	Initially, pilots were wary of these explosive seats.  They did not like the idea of being human cannon balls.  But as more and more lives were saved by ejection seats, they were soon adopted by Air Forces throughout the world.  The unresolved question was just how much punishment the human body could take.	In the 1950s, a US Air Force Doctor, Colonel John Paul Stapp, volunteered to put his own body on the line.  His experiments on himself would measure the maximum forces a human being could withstand in an aircraft ejection or a plane crash.	There were some spectacular failures.  Luckily, most of them were on dummies.  Later, they used anesthetized chimpanzees to measure the effects of G-forces.  But chimps and dummies don't talk.  Stapp wanted subjects who could describe the experience.  And that was a problem, because he was usually the subject as well as the scientist.  So, he put in a request for a medical assistant.	Stapp was forced to use chimpanzees until eventually his boss was promoted.  Only then was he able to restore human test runs.	Stapp's most dangerous experiment was on a rocket-powered sled called Sonic Wind.  It would simulate ejection from a plane at supersonic speed.	Stapp had become the fastest man on earth, and proved the human frame was much tougher than anyone thought.  At the end of the 50s, he was asked to tackle a new problem.  The US Air Force was testing experimental rocket planes that could travel many times the speed of sound, and fly to the edge of space. These were dangerous missions, and the Air Force wanted to be sure their pilots could survive bailing out.  Preliminary tests on dummies showed that free-falling from such extreme altitudes would throw a pilot into a disastrous spin.  So, they developed a small drogue chute to stabilize the descent.  Now, Stapp wanted to know if a human being could survive the experience.  He needed a volunteer as bold as himself who was prepared to take the dummy's place. Stapp decided Joe Kittinger was the right man for the job.  He was an experienced skydiver and test pilot.  But no one had parachuted from altitudes where the air was so thin it was impossible to breathe, and the pressure so low that only a special suit would stop his body from exploding.  Kittinger would make his jump over the White Sands Missile Range in the New Mexico desert.  The launch vehicle for the mission would be a helium balloon.	The balloon rose steadily at 1,200 feet per minute.  After an hour, it was ascending through the upper reaches of the atmosphere.	Kittinger and Stapp persuaded the authorities to complete the real objective of the program
  to jump from the edge of space at over 100,000 feet.	But something did happen.  The glove on his right hand did not pressurize, so the blood began to pool, leaving his hand immobilized.	Joe Kittinger's record skydive still stands today.  He had demonstrated that it was possible to escape from planes even at the very edge of space.  But a new problem was emerging as military jets flew closer and closer to the ground to avoid enemy radar.  Most fatal accidents happened when they were too low to guarantee safe ejection.  So, the seats were fitted with rocket motors, which could propel the pilot up and away from danger, even when flying at ground level.  As Stapp's research had shown, it was theoretically possible to escape as almost any speed or altitude.  Today, at his old rocket sled track in New Mexico, engineers are about to test a new escape system. There will be no human volunteers on this run.  It's a dummy in the seat.  This prototype will be able to sense when a plane is about to crash.  On-board computers will automatically trigger an ejection, and control its trajectory from the doomed aircraft.  It could save a fighter pilot before he even realizes his life is in danger.  To test the prototype, they will fire it down a 10-mile rocket sled track at 500 miles per hour.	High speed cameras show what happens at the moment the ejection seat rockets ignite.  In a fraction of a second, the parachutes are deployed.  The dummy floats safely back to earth.  Whether pilots will entrust their lives to an ejection system that takes the decision to abandon the aircraft out of their hands remains to be seen.  As the technology of escape becomes more sophisticated, the chance of surviving an accident in a military jet increases. In civil aviation, the problems have been different.  The idea of passengers ejecting or parachuting out of a plane in mid-air was abandoned long ago. Research shifted to making crashes more survivable.  In 1965, the Federal Aviation Administration staged its first crash test.  This crash may look fatal, but many passengers would have survived.	The FAA investigators realized that the key to survival was getting passengers out of the cabin before it filled with smoke.  They used an old, crashed plane to conduct timed evacuation trials.  Clamoring out of the over-wing exits was cumbersome and slow.  Passengers had to help each other out.  As airliners became bigger, they needed more emergency exits.  These were often too high above the ground for passengers to jump to safety.  So, some aircraft were fitted with evacuation slides.	The early slides were made from canvas, and were difficult to deploy.	It would be hard to sort out this mess with a fire billowing outside.	Airlines began experimenting with escape slides in the 1950s.  The early slides required the crew to exit first and hold out the chute for escaping passengers.  Back then, when planes were smaller, they could be evacuated in two minutes.  Today, even though aircraft are much larger, the requirement is 90 seconds.  To speed up evacuation, all commercial airliners are fitted with self-inflating slides.	In 1971, an accident in San Francisco revealed that under some conditions, evacuation slides could be dangerous.  After an emergency landing, there was a small fire in the undercarriage.	A minor incident ended up injuring 27 people.  Since that accident, evacuation slides have been redesigned to be much more rigid.  These massive structures fully inflate in four and a half seconds.  They are made of flame-retardant material to help protect them from pools of burning fuel.  But it is not always possible to deploy evacuation slides.  In 1989, a DC-10 bound for Chicago went dangerously out of control after an engine explosion.	The plane was diverted to a small airfield in Sioux City.  It hit the runway so fast, the fuselage started to break up.	The extreme impact had torn the aircraft apart, leaving the main cabin upside down.  Amazingly, 184 people managed to escape.  But 112 died, most of them from head injuries, as they hurled to the front of the plane, still strapped to their seats.  Colonel Stapp's crash tests had proved that passengers could survive if they were properly restrained.  This test, conducted two months before the Sioux City crash, demonstrated that the seat and seat belt attachments could fail on impact.	The latest planes are fitted with much stronger seats.  But most aircraft still have seats like these.  In the Sioux City crash, passengers who survived the initial impact faced another danger.	Smoke can be even more dangerous than fire, as this crash test demonstrates.  As the remotely controlled airliner hit the ground, the fire retardant fuel being tested failed.  Cameras recorded what happened inside the cockpit and cabin when the plane was engulfed in fire.  Although flames briefly entered the broken fuselage, instruments recorded life-threatening levels of toxic smoke.	When plastic interiors and foam seats start to burn, poisonous fumes build up rapidly inside the cabin.  A few seconds delay in evacuating a plane can make the difference between life and death.  This accident in Manchester, England in 1985 left no doubts about the lethal effects of toxic smoke.  The plane, carrying 130 passengers, caught on fire during take-off.  During the emergency, one exit was blocked.  But the other three were open with escape chutes deployed.  There should have been enough time to evacuate everyone.  But 55 people died.  Most of them had collapsed after inhaling toxic smoke.  The entire airline industry was shocked by what should have been a survivable accident.	Helen Muir was asked to investigate by Britain's Civil Aviation Authority.  She set up a series of trials designed to induce the chaos of a real evacuation.  To do that, she offered a financial incentive to be the first off the plane.	The trials were conducted in an old airliner to see how different cabin layouts affected the flow of passengers.  This research video shows how bulkheads can cause blockages.  A recommendation was made that the opening be increased to 30 inches.	The researchers also experimented with different seat layouts and suggested widening the access to over-wing exits.  The openings were so narrow that people became jammed.  In this trial, firemen had to intervene to unblock the exit.  The findings were published.  But few major changes were made.	In Los Angeles, the USAir Boeing-737 crashed into a building, blocking half of its emergency exits.  Twenty of the 80 people on board were overcome by smoke and died before they could exit the plane.  Even in the wake of these accidents, the airline industry has resisted change.  Increasing the number of emergency exits means fewer seats - and fewer paying passengers. Muir has also focused on other ways of improving evacuation times without redesigning the planes.  The performance of cabin staff in an emergency can dramatically affect the number of survivors.	By aggressively directing, even pushing the passengers, the flight attendants can evacuate the aircraft much faster.  In a burning plane, this could save the lives of dozens of people.  In some trials, Helen Muir increases the realism by adding smoke and switching off the cabin lights.  This is how most crashes end up.	Researchers like John Paul Stapp have dedicated their lives to proving that crashes are survivable.  In military aviation, such knowledge helped pioneer extraordinary advances, enabling jet pilots to escape certain death.  In air travel, as in other forms of transport, accidents will continue to happen.  How to make them survivable is a question that continues to haunt aviation.	When a ship goes down in a storm, any survivors are at the mercy of an angry, unforgiving sea.	Within minutes of entering cold water, even the strongest swimmers struggle to stay alive.  Cold saps their strength, and the risk of drowning increases dramatically.  The harsh lessons of survival at sea have been learned from centuries of maritime accidents.  Improvements in life-saving equipment have increased the chance of survival.  But when disaster strikes, the sea remains a formidable foe.  The events that unfolded on this ill-fated ship illustrate the acute problems of survival at sea.  Like the Titanic. and Lusitania before her, the car ferry Estonia was the pride of the fleet.  Every day, she sailed across the Baltic Sea between Estonia and Sweden.  It was a busy route, and the car deck, just above sea level, was often full.  When she set off on September 27, 1994, there were almost 1,000 people on board.  Most of them were asleep in their cabins as the sea began to get rough.  A computerized reconstruction reveals what happened that night.  It was not a particularly bad storm, but  heavy seas battered the ship's bow door.  The pounding put stress on the opening mechanism, until the hinges snapped, and the bow door hung loose.  Shortly after 1
00 in the morning, it was forced open, and water began to pour into the car deck.  Officers on the bridge noticed the water on a video monitor, but they did not realize the imminent danger. Fifteen minutes after the hinges snapped, the bow door fell off, releasing the ramp.  The ship carried on at full speed for another minute.  Water flooded the car deck, and the Estonia began to list.  Eight minutes later, the crew put out a distress call.	There were no emergency instructions from the bridge.	When the ship turned over on its side, hundreds were trapped in their cabins.  Paul Barney clung to some pipes as the ceiling became a vertical wall.	He found a small group of passengers desperately trying to board a life raft at the other end of the sinking hull.	For the next few hours, Paul Barney clung to his life as others around him slipped into unconsciousness and drowned.  As long as ships have sailed the seas, lives have been in peril.  Centuries ago, in the days of wooden sailing ships, there were no lifeboats or life belts.  So, if a vessel foundered, the best way of staying afloat was to find some wooden wreckage. Sailing ships were often smashed on the rocks before shipwrecked sailors could be rescued.  This infamous stretch of Yorkshire coastline had over 700 shipwrecks each winter in the middle of the last century.  A new way of bringing stranded sailors safely ashore was needed.	The idea was to fire a cannon ball which carried a rescue line.  The problem was making sure the line didn't snap.  Sidney Alford, an explosives expert, follows the instructions of Captain Manby, the inventor.  He ties in a length of leather to absorb the initial shock of the explosion.	The mortar could shoot a life line several hundred yards out to sea. Once it was secured to the ship, the crew could be hauled to safety by volunteers on shore.  This kind of rescue saved thousands of seamen's lives every year.   Later, the mortar was replaced with a rocket, which had greater range and accuracy.  The rocket powered line was used well into this century. Each survivor was pulled to safety on a cork life belt attached to a pulley block called a "breeches buoy."  This equipment could only be used close to shore, or from another ship.  In the middle of the ocean, survival was a problem, particularly when ships were no longer made of wood.  When iron hulls were introduced, passengers were concerned for their safety.  If an iron ship sank, it went down quickly with little floating debris to cling to.  To allay their fears, enterprising Victorian inventors came up with some curious survival aids.  If the ship went down, a gentleman could always slip into his cabin trunk.  This specially adapted model was lined with cork to provide extra buoyancy, ensuring a safe paddle home.  In distress?  Then, why not mark the spot, so rescuers can find you?  A rubber suit, a paddle, and lifebuoy.  What more could a sinking passenger want?  The Mayday mouthpiece, ideal for projecting that urgent message to the loved one - if the gallant passenger can keep his head above the waves.  Thankfully, none of these inventions was tested in an emergency.  But the Victorians did come up with the first practical life preservers made of cork.  They were worn by lifeboat crews during rescues.  The cork lifejacket would keep a man afloat, but testing one reveals its limitations.  Dr. Frank Golden, a retired Admiral and pioneer in maritime survival, assesses the jacket.	But any lifejacket was better than nothing.  When this World War I battleship turned over, the survivors who made it to the deck slid down the hull into the sea.  Few wore lifejackets, and some of them could not swim.  If they were lucky, they might find a Carley Float, which they could cling to. These light, aluminum floats carried rations and first aid.  But they were no use if a person's strength was fading.  Thousands of seamen lost their lives in the cold waters of the Atlantic during the First and Second World Wars.  Airmen were more fortunate.  They were issued with Mae Wests.  The early ones had to be inflated by blowing into a tube.  They provided good buoyancy.  But they suffered from the same problem as all early lifejackets.  If the airmen became unconscious, they were almost certain to drown.	Dr. Edgar Pask was the guinea pig in a series of experiments where he came as close as he dared to drowning.	After these experiments, lifejackets were redesigned with a firm collar to support the head.  With a modern life jacket, it doesn't matter how a person enters the sea.  On surfacing, the head will always be held upright and clear of the water.	But even the most modern lifejackets would not have saved the crew of this ship, which set sail on its maiden voyage in 1912.	After disaster struck, hundreds of people plunged into the sea, because there was not enough room on the lifeboats.  The Titanic disaster alerted the world to the real danger of abandoning ship.  The sinking of the unsinkable ship made nations international safety regulations for the first time.  From then on, everyone traveling on a ship was guaranteed a place on a lifeboat and an approved lifejacket.  All ships were required to conduct lifeboat drills.  This was a simple procedure for an upright ship in calm water.  But in more extreme conditions, it could deteriorate into chaos. Twenty-two years after the Titanic, in 1934, the Morro Castle set sail from New York to Cuba, which was a popular cruise destination at the time.  It had a full complement of lifeboats, but the passengers were not taught how to use them.  The captain wanted everyone to enjoy the party atmosphere.  On the return journey, a small fire on the lower decks was allowed to get out of control.  As the Morro Castle approached New York, the order was given to abandon ship.  The crew had no idea how to organize an evacuation.  The plight of the passengers inspired a dramatization of the disaster.  One of the passengers, Dolly McTigue, was on her honeymoon with her husband, Sidney.	Many of the lifeboats were burned in the fire.  The rest were commandeered by the crew, who left the passengers to fend for themselves.	The four lifeboats that made it to the shore carried 119 crew members and only 15 passengers.  The code of the sea had been abandoned with the sinking ship.	The Morro Castle tragedy cost the lives of 124 people.  After an inquiry, the captain was prosecuted for negligence.  The disaster highlighted a number of problems.  The firefighting provisions were completely inadequate, with hydrants locked and hoses stored away.  The passengers had been given no safety drills.  And most important was the complete failure of the crew to deal with the emergency.  On this training ship, merchant marine cadets learn to prevent such disasters.  If there is a fire on board, a well-rehearsed emergency plan swings into action.  The sailors become firefighters and divide up into small teams to locate the source.  They learn how to use breathing apparatus to navigate through smoke.  If they can extinguish the fire quickly, it will avoid the need to pump large volumes of water which could flood the ship.  They are also trained to search through the ship's compartments for victims overcome by smoke.  If a fire should take hold, the worst case disaster scenario is to abandon ship. 	The only way of abandoning without major loss of life is to ensure everyone knows the drill.	Down in the engine room, the crew is particularly vulnerable. Automatic doors seal the ship into fireproof, watertight compartments.  If there is a fire on a lower deck, sailors can be trapped.  So, many ships have an escape tunnel that runs along the entire length of the propeller shaft.  A vertical chimney is their direct link to the top deck.	Not knowing where to go is a common problem.  On a well-organized ship, everyone reports to a muster station, where a roll call is carried out to ensure no one is missing.	Some of these cadets will become the cruise ship officers of the future.  One day, they may have to rescue passengers who are frightened and untrained in the ways of the sea.  But there are even more extreme situations. Escape from warships under enemy fire has its own set of rules.  For as well as saving lives, the crew must do everything possible to save the ship.  One of the most heroic examples of this was on board the aircraft carrier, USS Franklin.  It was bombed by Kamikaze pilots in the Second World War.  The ship's own bombs and ammunition started to explode, triggering massive fires. Most of the crew was evacuated, but damage control teams stayed on, battling the fire for five days, as the ship limped back across the Pacific.  Today, in Portsmouth, England, a simulator called the Hazard enables sailors to practice damage control without leaving the dock.  Working in a small compartment as the water level rises, they experience first-hand the terror of trying to prevent a flooding ship from sinking.  The hull is riddled with holes.  Their task is to stem each new leak.  This high-tech simulator mimics the motion of a ship taking on water.  High pressure water jets are triggered inside to simulate direct hits beneath the water line.  It's like a plumber's worst nightmare.  To combat the danger, the crew adopts a low-tech approach.  They use crude tools, wedges of wood, hammers and scaffolding braces.  Wood expands when it's wet, so by plugging each hole, the sailors can cut down the water flow.  They must work fast, because the water level in the compartment is almost up to their necks. As the interior continues to flood, the rocking of the simulator starts to slow down, just as it would on a real ship that is taking on water.  What determines the moment a ship sinks is an exact science.  A ship is most stable when it's able to right itself quickly.  Paradoxically, the quicker it rolls, the more stable it is.  This scale model of a destroyer enables Naval engineers to see what happens when different sections of the ship are flooded.	When that point is reached, disaster strikes quickly.  The Estonia sank at 1
40 in the morning, with most of the 980 passengers still trapped below decks.  There was not enough time to fill the lifeboats.  Only 137 people would survive the night.  Paul Barney was fighting for his life in his upturned raft.	Hypothermia is one of the biggest problems of survival at sea.  But it's scientific investigation has a tragic history, which began in the Second World War.  The German Luftwaffe was concerned by the number of pilots lost at sea.  Sometimes, they died of cold even after they were rescued.  It was this problem which led to a series of horrific experiments at the Dachau Concentration Camp.  Nazi doctors watched as their subjects slowly shivered to death.  The perpetrators of these unethical trials were later convicted of war crimes.  One of the few survivors was a Dutch prisoner called Post Uiterweer, who was 25 when he was ordered to strip and enter the freezing water.	Few of these Nazi experiments had any scientific value.  But they established that hot water was the best way of treating hypothermia.  They also found that human beings lose consciousness when the body temperature falls below 28 degrees.  What to do with this information became highly controversial, because at least 80 prisoners are thought to have died in these brutal experiments.  Cold water survival research since the war uses volunteers.  Royal Navy researchers filmed a series of demonstrations with British Olympic swimmers.	Another volunteer was submerged in water at five degrees Centigrade. The experiment was supposed to last five minutes.  But he could only withstand two and a half.  Paul Barney felt the onset of hypothermia start to jeopardize his ability to survive.	Even the most simple actions become impossible in cold water.	Staying alive after abandoning ship is hard enough.  But an even more extreme survival challenge is underwater escape - from a submarine.  Being entombed beneath the water with a limited supply of air has always been the submarine crew's greatest fear.	This German movie dramatizes Bauer's pedal-powered descent into the harbor.  Everything went well, until water started to leak through the hull. It rapidly sank 60 feet to the bottom.	But escape by flooding the entire vessel became impractical as submarines got larger, with more crew members to evacuate.  So, the Navy experimented with an airlock chamber that was flooded for each individual's escape.  The men were equipped with breathing apparatus for the ascent.  An inflatable bag was filled with oxygen from a small cylinder, allowing them to escape from depths of up to 200 feet.  In 1939, an accident aboard the USS Squalus caused the submarine to sink 240 feet to the ocean floor.  An open valve had allowed the engine room to flood.  To save the submarine, the crew sealed off the area, sacrificing 26 men on the other side.  The survivors feared they were too deep to risk escaping with a breathing apparatus.  Their only other hope was to wait to be rescued.  Along the East coast, an emergency operation was set in motion.  A ship carrying a new, untested McCann Rescue Chamber raced to the scene.  The submarine crew realized it was going to take at least 24 hours to arrive.  Carl Bryson and Danny Persico were both young sailors in their 20s.	A diver was lowered to attach guide wires, so the rescue chamber could descend to the escape hatch.	With the chamber locked to the submarine, the rescue could begin.	Danny and Carl were in the last group to be rescued.  After 34 hours on the bottom, they waited for the bell to return for the final trip.	The lifting cables had become entangled, so the men were trapped in the bell, halfway between the submarine and the ship.  The only way of saving them was to haul the bell up by hand.	The McCann Rescue Chamber was never used in an emergency again.  It was eventually replaced by an underwater rescue vehicle that could reach the greater depth of nuclear submarines.  This mini rescue sub rides piggy-back on a mother sub.  In an emergency, it travels to a disabled submarine, locks onto an escape hatch, and then ferries survivors from the stricken sub back to the mother sub.  So far, it has never been used in an emergency.  When accidents occur at shallow depths, there is a much easier way of escape.  In this water tank, British submarine crews learned the buoyant ascent method of escape. They wear a special suit filled with air.  After taking a few last breaths of compressed air, they zip up the suit and climb into a flooded escape chamber. The buoyancy of the suit guarantees a rapid ascent.	In a real escape, the survivor could face a long wait in the sea.  To protect him from hypothermia, the suit is heavily insulated, and also has an inflatable life raft.  It keeps him out of the water, cocooned from the cold. Life rafts are critical to prevent the rapid drop in body temperature common to all sea survivors.  At the Marine Training Center in Holland, oil workers and ship crews are trained how to use life rafts.  These men are wearing insulated suits, which increase survival times in cold water.  But clambering into a life raft, even when it's calm, can be difficult.  Most ships carry self-inflating life rafts, which can be deployed quickly.  But as Paul Barney discovered, they sometimes get turned upside down by wind or waves.	To overcome these problems, this ship was designed with a new way of evacuating people.  The HSS Stena Explorer is a high speed car ferry.  Although it can carry up to 1,500 passengers, this giant catamaran has no lifeboats.  In the event of an accident, the crew deploys enormous inflatable escape chutes. They are taking part in an evacuation test monitored by Britain's Marine Safety Agency.  Two hundred crew members must demonstrate they can evacuate the entire ship in under 18 minutes.  They slide down two 80-foot escape chutes to a floating platform which is linked to three enormous life rafts.  Each has a capacity of 135 people.  It is a daring concept to evacuate everyone from the ship - without getting their feet wet.  But it remains to be seen how untrained passengers would cope with the slides in 50-knot gales, or how these whale-like rafts would perform in a storm.  One of the toughest places to escape from is an oil rig at sea.  The risk of fire and the great height of the platforms make evacuation particularly difficult.  A solution to this problem came from a Dutch company called Verhoef.  Back in the 50s, Joost Verhoef started a small company, which would eventually produce a new form of lifeboat.	Aluminum had many advantages.  It was strong, light-weight, and fire-proof.  But Verhoef realized that to improve lifeboats, the launching system needed to be re-designed.	This goal would take longer to achieve.  Verhoef went ahead and built a full-scale prototype.  It was tested on the canal next to the factory.  A rich ship owner, who had lost two ships in heavy seas, funded the project, because he wanted safer lifeboats for his ships.  Over the next 25 years, Verhoef perfected the design.  If his lifeboat was to be used from oil platforms, he had to ensure that it could be launched from a great height.  He developed a pointed bow to reduce the impact on passengers as the boat hit the water.  By shifting the center of gravity and making the superstructure more buoyant, he achieved his final goal.	To demonstrate the extraordinary resilience of his lifeboat, Verhoef began rough sea trials on a scale model.  Despite the success of his trials, he could find no buyers.  He showed the boat could survive the biggest waves, was completely watertight, and could even withstand fire.	In 1984, Verhoef tested the boat to see how it might fare in a burning sea.  Five thousand liters of kerosene were ignited.  With the water spray system triggered, the boat was engulfed in flames for ten minutes.	The importance of this feature became clear in 1988, when the Piper Alpha oil platform exploded in the North Sea.  A huge fireball engulfed the rig, making it impossible to launch conventional lifeboats.  Many oil workers died jumping into the burning sea.  As a result of this disaster, the oil industry began to invest in a better solution.	Free-fall lifeboats have now been installed in many oil platforms and tankers.  Anyone who might have to use them is required to participate in test drills.  All passengers must be well strapped in for the big drop.  The free-fall lifeboat provides a rapid escape from danger for trained crews.  But it is not suitable for mass evacuation.  It would have been hard to deploy on a ship listing as fast as the Estonia.  Paul Barney's ordeal continued until first light, when helicopters began rescuing survivors.  Ten people on his life raft did not make it through the night.	He had survived the Baltic Sea through his sheer determination to live.   The horror of this tragedy prompted international action.  Today, ferries must provide automatic evacuation systems and life rafts that cannot be flipped in a storm.  The sea will always be an unforgiving environment, but the lessons from past disasters hold the key to our survival.	Since 1991, US Navy Battle Groups have been stationed in the Persian Gulf.   An aircraft carrier is the centerpiece, surrounded by submarines, cruisers, and destroyers - all armed with the latest weapon technology.  It is a fearsome projection of US military might.  Twice in the last year, the battle group has been brought to the brink of war.  And on December 16, 1998, the call to strike finally came.	The Battle Group began an aerial assault within hours of the President's order.  One hundred sites were targeted, and nearly all were hit. But the crisis that brought coalition forces into war has not been resolved. After years of working to dismantle Iraq's nuclear, biological, and chemical weapons, UN inspectors are now banished from the country.  And in the skies over Iraq, missile attacks against US and British aircraft continue almost daily.  A renewed conflict is almost assured.  But is the Battle Group the right force for the job?  In the dramatic months that preceded the latest confrontation with Iraq, NOVA went behind the scenes to examine the inner workings of this enormous force - on alert in the Persian Gulf.	January, 1998.  Amid growing tensions with Iraq, the USS Independence is suddenly deployed to the Persian Gulf.  The carrier and its 80 aircraft arrive in the region with a formidable array of supply ships, cruisers, destroyers, and hunter-killer submarines.  Together, they form a Battle Group.  One of the most powerful military forces on Earth.  Eight years ago, when Iraqi troops invaded Kuwait, the Independence was the first carrier on the scene.  Its Battle Group led the charge that would become operation Desert Storm - the largest military encounter since the Vietnam War. Today, the Independence returns for the last time.  The oldest warship in the Navy, it is scheduled to retire after this six-month tour of duty.  But as the threat of conflict grows, the crew is put on maximum alert.  Pilots aboard the Independence are assigned the dangerous mission of enforcing the no-fly zone.	The no-fly zone was put in place by US, British, and French forces. It was designed to contain Saddam Hussein's aggression by limiting the movements of his military.  Following the Gulf War, coalition forces designated areas in the north and south of the country where Iraqi planes would not be allowed to fly.  For pilots enforcing the no-fly zone, missile attacks are a constant threat.  In recent weeks, Iraq's surface to air missiles have targeted US and British aircraft almost every day.	Coalition forces have retaliated, knocking out some of Iraq's missile launch sites.  In at least one incident, missiles have missed their target, causing civilian casualties.  Aircraft flying missions over Iraq are sent out in strike packages, a mix of planes with different capabilities.  Fighters, bombers, and electronic warfare aircraft all work together as a team.  The E2-C Hawkeye, with its huge dome radar, tracks all air activity over a 500-mile radius.  It sends that information electronically to the other planes and ships of the Battle Group.  If an airborne threat is detected, it is the job of the F-14 Tomcat to shoot it down.  This two-manned fighter is primarily designed for air-to-air combat, and is the carrier's long range protector.  But it is the FA-18 Hornet that is the carrier's most advanced aircraft.  The Hornet is equipped to strike both air and ground targets, and requires only one pilot to operate its navigation and weapons systems.	The take-off of the strike package is coordinated through the carrier's tower.  Every 30 seconds an aircraft is launched.	In the Gulf, it is not just the airwing that is vulnerable to enemy missile attack.  Ships must be constantly on alert.  If an air assault ever got by the carrier's fighter jets, the Independence, on its own, would be virtually defenseless.  The carrier must be constantly guarded.  One ship in particular is assigned this role
  the guided missile cruiser, San Jacinto.	While the San Jacinto never leaves the carrier's side, the John S. McCain, the Battle Group's most modern warship, patrols a much larger region.  Equipped with an arsenal of weapons, it uses more advanced technology and fewer crew compared with the cruiser.  The destroyer also protects the carrier from enemy attack, both from the air and the sea.	Today, it is the carrier's own hunter-killer submarine, the USS Tucson, that is preparing to strike.  As part of an unscheduled exercise to test the Battle Group's defenses, the Tucson tracks the carrier - undetected.  It is the McCain's job to monitor the movements of submarines throughout the Gulf.  Failure to detect the Tucson would suggest that the Battle Group is vulnerable to a real attack.  The McCain's sonar team is searching for any unusual sound that may signal a potential threat.  Sixty-three feet below the surface, the Tucson hides in the carrier's wake, an area known as the baffles.  This confuses the McCain's sonar picture.	The submarine is penetrating the Battle Group's defenses.  If it succeeds, the implications are serious.	The carrier's sense of invulnerability has been destroyed.  Alerted by the submarine's flares, its helicopters from the carrier begin a frantic search.  They chase down the submarine using dipping sonar, placing it in the water in an ever-shrinking circle.	In the restricted waters of the Gulf, options for escape are limited.	Stung by the fact that the Tucson got through her defenses, the John S. McCain's sonar team zeros in on the submarine.  The noose is tightening.  The submarine crew is running out of places to hide.	The McCain has found its target, and launches its own dummy torpedo at the submarine.	Attacks by enemy submarines are not the only threat these warships must face.  In the Gulf, where Naval forces patrol close to shore, missiles launched from land also pose a significant risk.  To help counter such an attack, the Independence, its cruisers and destroyers are equipped with all-directional defense radar called Aegis.  The Aegis system links the Battle Group electronically.  As each ship monitors activities in the Gulf, its information is shared with all of the others.	The backbone of the Aegis system is a specially designed radar that can track even baseball-sized targets over a 100-mile radius.  If an airborne threat is detected, the Aegis system then guides the Battle Group's own weapons in a defensive counter-attack.	Since the Gulf War, many more weapons are now equipped with guidance systems.	One Standard Navy Missile costs over $400,000.  At almost a million dollars, the newest generation of Tomahawk missiles is guided by satellite and can travel up to 1,000 miles to reach a target.  Advances in weapon technology have enhanced the Battle Group's capabilities.  But its ultimate strength resides in the configuration of its ships - a strategy that has not changed for over 50 years.  The concept of the Battle Group was forged in World War II, when for the first time, sea battles were fought by a force made up of different ships grouped around an aircraft carrier.  This replaced the traditional order of battle, where ships lined up to confront their enemies. This flexible concept was first used in the battles of Coral Sea and Midway, where the new Battle Group outflanked and outmaneuvered the Japanese Navy. During the war, as America's power and influence expanded, Naval bases were established throughout the world.  The US Navy divided the globe into spheres of influence with a fleet based in each area.  At the heart of every fleet is a battle group.  The Navy relied on this force to counter the Soviets throughout the Cold War.	With the Cold War over, shifting regional crises replaced a global Soviet Threat.  The mobility of the Battle Group appeared to be an answer to new strategic demands.  Today, 12 US Navy carrier Battle Groups are able to project an American presence anywhere in the world.  But are they the right force for every job? Battle Groups were built to operate in the deep oceans of the world.  The  Persian Gulf is a very different environment.	The Brown Water, or littoral zone, is any area of sea close to shore. In the Persian Gulf, the coastal region is full of territorial claims, no-fly zones, and disputed international boundaries.	There has been a Navy presence in the Gulf for over 20 years.  They were there when Iranians took American hostages in 1979, and they have been there ever since.  Supporting friendly Arab nations and protecting the flow of oil have been the US Navy's primary objectives.  And for the last 10 years, it has been Iraq, not Iran, that has most disrupted the region, first drawing fire in 1991 after its invasion of Kuwait.  But the war did not end with Iraq's defeat.  Saddam Hussein's weapons of mass destruction were still a threat.  The United Nations mandated that they be found and destroyed.  Weapons inspectors were put to the task while Battle Group forces in the Gulf remained to help ensure that Iraq would not obstruct their efforts.  US troops also stayed to enforce trade sanctions against Iraq.  Sailors, like those aboard the destroyer John S. McCain, search merchant ships in an effort to stop the flow of restricted goods.	Twenty-six-year-old Lieutenant Vince Watson is in charge of the ship's boarding team.  This will be the crew's first interdiction of the day.	They depart the relative safety of the ship wearing bullet-proof vests and weapons.  Although routine, these boardings are never without danger. Like a police officer stopping a car, the team expects that the crew of the Luc Nam will cooperate.  But all of them know that anything could happen.	The Captain has been ordered to move the ship's crew above deck, and to open all cabins for inspection - orders that clearly were not followed.	Fortunately, no weapons are raised in this encounter.  During the search, this radio is discovered.  Too powerful for conventional use, the boarding team suspects that it may be intended for Iraqi military communications.	The ship will be detained until an explanation for the radio is provided.	US forces have been controlling Iraq's trade and military movements ever since the Gulf War.  After eight years of sanctions, Saddam Hussein announced a year ago that he will tolerate them no more.  In defiance, he ejects United Nations weapon inspectors - a direct provocation to which the United States quickly responds.  Within weeks, the United Nations authorizes the use of force against Iraq.  And a second battle group is quickly deployed to the region.  It centers around the John C. Stennis, America's newest carrier on her maiden voyage.  It will join the Independence and her battle group.  As tensions mount, war seems imminent.	After so many years of using these war ships to enforce sanctions, it may now be time to use them to actually fight a war.  But in a last  minute effort by the United Nations, a strike is narrowly averted.  Saddam Hussein steps back from the edge, allowing UN weapon inspections to continue.  After the biggest military build-up since the Gulf War, peace is restored - for the moment.  Across the Battle Group on every ship, there is a collective sigh of relief.  It's a moment to slow down, reflect, and attend to personal business. Some men and women take time to record a video message to send home.	Mail arrives at the ship almost every day.  It is a time of great anticipation.	 These seamen and their families know only too well the dangers they face with Saddam Hussein and his arsenal of deadly weapons.  Troops are vaccinated against anthrax, a germ agent that attacks the lungs.	Aboard the Independence, Lieutenant Schnurr is the only woman. The USS Saturn arrives to re-supply the carrier and its warships.  Fifty tons of essential items can be airlifted by these huge, Sea Stallion helicopters in less than three hours.  Every week, sailors of the battle group will consume 40,000 eggs, 5,300 gallons of milk, and 15,000 boxes of cereal. The Independence and the Stennis have their own fuel requirements, too.	On the Independence, the steam boilers that run its engine consume 100,000 gallons of oil every four days.	The Stennis is nuclear powered.  It can dedicate its entire store of fuel - all four million gallons - to its airwing.  This allows the Stennis to keep its jets flying twice as long.  The Stennis also has facilities to accommodate women.  They comprise 6% of her crew and are involved in all aspects of carrier activity.  Jennifer Keefer is training to become a yellow shirt.  Yellow shirts are responsible for getting these multimillion dollar planes on and off the deck.  Airman Keefer is "UI," under instruction.  Her every move is shadowed by her supervisor.	On the flight deck, the yellow shirts have the power.  Even the pilots, all officers, take direction and occasional admonition from the yellows.	Keefer has one last step on her journey to be a qualified yellow shirt.  A test conducted by her senior petty officers that is now only weeks away.  Flight deck operations are never without danger.  One of the most hazardous moments aboard any carrier is when aircraft return from a mission. Pilots rely on the air traffic controller to orchestrate the carefully sequenced return of the planes.  Pilots are guided by landing signal officers on deck.  Pilots themselves, the LSOs, mark and grade every landing.  In a delicate and difficult maneuver, the pilot must use his plane's tail hook to snag one of four wires that extend only six inches off the deck.  Catching the third wire will get him the best grade.  But hooking any one of them will achieve the essential goal
  a safe landing.	When a plane's tail hook misses the wire, the pilot is forced to "bolter," shove open the throttle and blast off the bow before coming around to do it again.  Bolters are serious business.  One too many, and the next flight the pilot will take is back to shore to re-qualify for carrier operations. FA-18 Pilot Jesse Kingg returns after another mission over Iraq.	Today, Jesse lands successfully.  Tomorrow, he will do it all again.	Flight operations continue around the clock.  As the day ends, a new group of aviators prepare for a nighttime intelligence operation.	This crew will search the electronic signals that may indicate the presence of Iraqi missile sites.	Lieutenant John Abbamondi is an electronics warfare officer.  He and three other crew members are flying the night shift.	Lieutenant Ewing is the pilot.	The airplane they fly, the 4-seat Prowler, is a relatively new addition to the Battle Group.  Sent out ahead, it is the Prowler's job to locate and jam Iraqi radar.  Iraqi missiles will then be unable to locate and attack the aircraft that follow.  Unlike the fighter jets it protects, the Prowler has no air-to-air weapons of its own.  This leaves the crew defenseless to enemy aircraft during its missions over Iraq.	John explains how he got his nickname.	As night descends on the Gulf, operations begin on board the Independence with the launch of the Prowler.  Just off the carrier's starboard stern, the guided missile cruiser San Jacinto prepares for a mission of its own.	Attached to the front of the helicopter is a specially designed camera called "FLIR," short for Forward Looking Infrared.  It can turn night into day.  This image was taken from over two miles away.  Tonight, one of the helicopters sees a large cargo vessel traveling suspiciously close to Iranian shores.  Images of the ship are instantly relayed to the destroyer, the John S. McCain.  If the vessel is suspected of smuggling, it will be the destroyer that sends out a boarding crew to search it.  During nighttime interdictions, the ship is dark.  Even on the bridge, no lights are allowed. This scene was filmed using a night vision camera.  Concealed by darkness, the McCain will track the suspect vessel.	An Iranian warship pulls up next to the vessel.	But almost as quickly, it departs.	Suspecting some kind of covert activity, the Captain reluctantly gives the order to board the ship.	Dressed in body armor and armed with sub-machine guns, the boarding team begins a search of the ship.  They take no chances.	The search party hits pay dirt.  In one of the biggest finds since the embargo against Iraq began, 20,000 tons of smuggled oil is discovered on board.  The ship will be detained, its cargo sold, and the proceeds will go in part to fund the UN operation in the Gulf.  Back on the Independence, the Prowler crew returns at 3
00 a.m.  For pilots, night landings are a tremendous challenge.  Jesse Kingg knows the risks involved.	On his first attempt, Lt. Ewing does a bolter, and is forced to go around again.	A hook skip occurs when the plane's tail hook bounces over the arresting wire.  One of the LSOs will let Spew know whether he or his tail hook is to blame.	His relief is understandable.  As a Naval aviator, Spew knows that he is only as good as his last landing.  The next morning, aboard the Stennis, it is crunch time for Jennifer Keefer.  Today, she goes before her superiors to take her final test to become a fully qualified aircraft handler, a yellow shirt.	Keefer faces a tough crowd.  Their standards are high.  Even though she has worked hard to get here, they have no intention of just giving these yellow shirts away.	Despite some difficulties, Airman Keefer does manage to pass the test.	For the 25,000 men and women working aboard these ships of war, their six-month tour of duty ended before the call to strike ever came.  Aboard the Independence, their departure is particularly meaningful.  After 39 years, this will be the carrier's last patrol.	The Indy has been around since the days of the Cuban Missile Crisis.  Her missions have included Vietnam, Lebanon, and Granada.  Many pilots have flown off her deck never to return.  The Independence Battle Group will soon be replaced by another.  A new group of pilots spends its days and nights gathering information about Iraqi troop movements, surveying missile sites, and identifying locations of Iraqi weapons programs.  They are laying the groundwork for the strike that is soon to come.  Tensions with Iraq escalate once again in November 1998, and it is the USS Enterprise that is sent to reinforce troops already in the region.  But this time, Saddam does not back down.  And in the early morning of December 16th, the Battle Group begins to rain down Tomahawk cruise missiles on Iraq.  And during it all, Saddam Hussein remains defiant.	For the past 10 years, hundreds of thousands of troops have served in the Gulf working aboard the most advanced warships ever built.	And until the crisis ends, they will continue to cycle through these waters.  Presently, there is no alternative to the Battle Group.  This Blue Water Navy may not be comfortable in the shallow Brown Water of the Gulf.  But for now, it is the best there is.	In the 12th century, in a Europe ravaged by war, famine and disease, the rich Italian city of Pisa rose above the horror by erecting the most magnificent Tower the world had ever seen.  800 years later this bold architectural dream has produced a nightmare.  Inch by inch, year by year, the Tower is slowly tipping over.  What was once an amusing tourist attraction is now a threat.  The top hangs 17 feet south of the base - and the Leaning Tower of Pisa is on the brink of disaster.	Pisa is shaken by several tremors each year.  If an earthquake rocks the ground, or a storm sweeps in from the nearby coast, one of the wonders of the world will be lost forever.  Can modern ingenuity prevent this nightmare and save Pisa?	Over the last decade, teams of engineers and scientists have been at work in the Italian city of Pisa.  A $20 million struggle to save the Leaning Tower is approaching a crucial stage.  Built 800 years ago to house the bells of the vast cathedral of the Piazza dei Miracoli, or Place of Miracles, the Leaning Tower of Pisa is one of the wonders of the world.  And one of Europe's top tourist attractions, with over six million visitors each year.  But the risk of collapse is now so high tourists are banned from entering the Tower. People still travel thousands of miles to steal a glimpse.  180 feet high, with columns, carvings and brickwork all of matching marble, even if it were straight this would be a breathtaking building.  There are almost 200 columns supporting the six stories of external arcades.  These walkways in the air must have been a thrilling experience for the medieval Pisans.  Even today the view is spectacular.  The infamous lean is not intentional.  The gravity defying five and a half degree tilt is a tragic flaw, that could eventually destroy the Tower.  Towers do collapse.  In 1989, in Pavia - a few hundred miles north of Pisa, a 14th century bell tower collapsed, killing four bystanders. Pavia's tower wasn't even leaning.  The Italian government reacted, and here in the shadow of Pisa's Tower, a Committee of experts has been assembled.  Nobody has refused this invitation.  Saving Pisa is the greatest prize in civil engineering.  Among the brilliant minds rising to this challenge are Giorgio Macchi of Pavia, and John Burland of Imperial College, London.	Burland, a soil engineer, digs into problems below ground, while Giorgio Macchi, a structural engineer, attacks weaknesses in the Tower itself.	Before the Committee intervenes, they must first investigate.  So many analytical devices are fixed to the Tower, it becomes the most monitored building in the world.  A circular sensor, which can register a vibration from a footstep, runs around the inner walls.  Metal clamps detect any shift in 25 of the Tower's largest cracks. Three plumb lines hang from the top level.  Taut cross wires measure deformations in the walls.  Some startling secrets are exposed - the Tower reacts to changes in the elements.  Every day the entire building sways in a minute circle not more than a 100th of an inch across.  This infra-red camera shows why.  The lens is sensitive to heat, which is displayed as white.  The sun heats the south side more than the north.  The marble there expands, creating an imbalance and increasing the lean.  At night it will shrink back.  Larger movements are recorded during rainstorms.	When the rain stops, the Tower will move back.  Committee member Carlo Viggiani has studied the Tower for 35 years.	The sensitivity to the water table suggests there is a problem in the ground below the Tower.  This will be an important part of the investigation. But first the Committee faces a more immediate danger.  Structural engineer Giorgio Macchi must deal with a series of massive flaws in the Tower's structure.  The Tower is a hollow cylinder, 45 feet across.  In most places the walls are nine feet thick.  But corkscrewing through the walls is a staircase wide enough for two Pisans to climb side by side.  This reduces the thickness of the walls to barely a yard in some places.  This would be just adequate if these walls were solid marble - as they appear to be.  But probes reveal otherwise.	Medieval masons often filled in walls with stones and lime but it severely weakens the structure.  What's more, there are several holes in the conglomerate, created by the original builder's wooden scaffold.	It turns out that this elegant marble facing is the Tower's main support.  The stress created by the lean falls mainly on this thin façade.  That's why many of the bricks are cracked.  One may be the start of a collapse.  To pinpoint this potential catastrophe, Macchi must locate the Tower's zone of maximum stress.  Detailed measurements, and data from the monitors, are fed into a computer which calculates structural stress, and highlights it in blue.  The largest stresses are on the south side, below the lean, on the second story, where a doorway meets the staircase.  This is where the collapse will begin.	If the marble here gives way, the 14,000 ton Tower won't merely crumble.  The tensions accumulated over centuries will be unleashed with immense and sudden force.  Thankfully this ticking time-bomb has always been well maintained.  Even today minor repairs are carried out by Pisan stonemasons who replace some of the damaged marble with newly chiseled blocks.	But traditional maintenance will no longer contain the growing stress of the lean.  In 1992 a dozen plastic-coated metal tendons are wrapped tight around the critical second story.  The cracks are held shut and the collapse prevented, or at least delayed.  This is one of the great monuments of medieval Europe.  So the unsightly tendons cannot remain in place here indefinitely. Now that the structure has been strengthened, the Committee begins to search for a permanent solution.  The quest carries the engineers into strange territory - deep into the ancient mysteries of the Tower.  Medieval Italy was tower mad.  Skylines like this one at San Gimignano just south of Pisa were commonplace.  For the princes and merchants, the bigger your tower, the more wealth and power you projected.  Today Pisa is a quiet university town.  But medieval Pisa was an aggressive trading power and one of the richest cities in the world.  Piero Pierotti is an historian at Pisa University.  Although not on the Committee, he is an expert on the Tower.	In 1064, just inside the north wall of the city, work began on a massive Cathedral.  The wedding-cake tiers of marble columns were an early expression of the style that would later embellish the Tower.  Inside are more colonnades.  Horizontal layers of black and white marble seem to draw worshippers towards the artistic climax - the apse - with its haunting mosaic, Christ In Majesty.  The Pisans borrowed ideas from other cultures. There are Byzantine mosaics - and an Islamic dome.  And they recycled the marble of classical buildings, inviting comparisons to the glory of ancient Rome.  They built what is still one of the largest baptisteries in Italy.  Here the richest citizens were christened in style.  This bizarre architectural mix has gothic pinnacles sprouting from the trademark Romanesque colonnades. Still, the medieval Pisans weren't satisfied.  They decided to give their new Cathedral the most extravagant bell tower the world had ever seen.  But their ambition exceeded good building practice.	This painting reveals the Pisan masons had plenty of  experience building Towers.  What were the soil conditions that worried them 800 years ago?  Between Pisa and the nearby coast is an alluvial marsh.  Perhaps this is what the ground around the Tower was like before construction began.  Soil engineer John Burland travels to the shoreline to assess what effect this ground might have had upon the Tower.	A team of scientists performs an ingenious experiment to reconstruct Pisa's geological history.  A three-foot high aluminum model of the Tower is placed upright on sand which has been carefully arranged to mimic the silt below the Tower.  Sandy silt and metal Tower are then lowered into a centrifuge which will simulate the effect of hundreds of years of gravity.  Centuries are compressed into a few weeks.  When taken out of the centrifuge, this Tower leans just like the real thing.  Not only did the model sink, but it sank unevenly - just like the real Tower, which was built on ground no more solid or consistent than a beach.	So the Tower settled more deeply into the softer silt on the south side.  The scientists have explained the Leaning Tower of Pisa.  Now they must save the Tower, by finding a way to halt - even reverse - the lean.  Proposals arrive in Pisa from all over the world.  Some devised by qualified engineers, others by schoolchildren.  But most rely on some version of a huge prop. Aesthetically, this would be unacceptable, and would probably destroy the tower.	The search for a solution takes the engineers back into history.  The Tower has always been cared for by an organization called the Opera,  whose presidents represent an unbroken line of craftsmen right back to the 11th century.  The Opera archives contain a priceless hoard of information.  A report from 1550 showed the top was already 12 feet south of the base.  The first scientific measurement was made by two British architects, Edward Cresy and George Taylor.  But this was a static observation.  Regular surveys have been made since 1911.  And these reveal the Tower has stopped settling into the silt.  The ground has hardened.  The Tower is no longer sinking - it's capsizing.	In July 1993 the engineers begin to act.  They load 600 tons of lead ingots on the rising north side.  As the lead is piled up, there is always the danger that the ground might give way again.  So the Tower's reaction is scrutinized by the electronic monitors.	The lean is brought under control for the first time in 800 years, but the beautiful Tower has become an eyesore.  So a permanent solution is devised, with no lead weights.  It is based on removing soil from beneath the Tower.	Reducing the lean by 10% will shift the Tower north by half a degree. In the Piazza, an experiment is done on a concrete test tower which is taller and heavier on the south side and so simulates the forces under the lop-sided Leaning Tower.	But some have doubts about soil extraction.	At tense Committee meetings, Carlo Viggiani becomes the first apostle of soil extraction.	 But some have no faith in this time machine.	There is so much at stake, it's hard to reach an agreement - especially with so many experts.	Before approving soil extraction, the fractious Committee demands conclusive evidence that this intervention will not damage the Tower.  The soil engineers must establish precisely how this fragile structure reacts to changes in the ground below it.  Yet again, the answer lies in the past.  Jane Morley is an architectural historian who has studied the Tower extensively. 	Perhaps something the medieval builders did will give modern engineers useful insights into the mysterious interaction between this structure and the soil.  The first clue is in the impressive craftsmanship of the exterior marble.	These stones reveal an extraordinary history.  Construction of the Tower began in 1172.  After about six years the masons had reached the fourth level, but then they stopped.  The Tower was abandoned for almost a century. Probably this was due to political and economic strife.  But perhaps the delay was really a brilliant strategy.	When construction did resume, the masons must have noticed a slight lean to the north.  So they tried to straighten the Tower. 	The corrections are so small they cannot be seen with the naked eye and were only discovered recently by detailed surveys.  But as the masons straightened the Tower, it lurched in the opposite direction.  When it reached the seventh story, work stopped again.  Over the next 90 years the southward lean grew to over one and half degrees, a severe inclination that did not deter the masons from adding a heavy bell chamber.	As a result of the delays and corrections over generations, the Tower appears banana-shaped.  This deformity provides the vital clue to the relationship between the soil and the structure - and is the basis of Burland's computer model.	But some believe the computer model oversimplifies the construction of the Tower.	The proof the Committee demands remains elusive.  In the meantime, its deliberations are complicated by yet another proposal, a plan to replace the unsightly tendons.  In his lab, structural engineer Giorgio Macchi experiments on a three-quarter inch thick steel bolt that fits inside the marble blocks - stiffening them from within.  But there is a risk the bolt might actually weaken the marble.  On a test rig, a marble block is forced upwards, while the bolt is held in a vice.  Eventually one will break.  But Macchi has calculated it will not be the marble.  The force builds up to 12 tons.  Then the bolt snaps, leaving the marble unharmed, suggesting a way to strengthen the Tower without defacing it.	So, there are two long term solutions for the Tower.  One would stabilize the structure with internal bolts, the other would reverse the lean through soil extraction.  Faced with this choice, the Committee hesitates, their indecision fueled by a frightening history.  There have been many previous interventions.  All have failed.  The disastrous meddling began with the digging of this trench around the base of the Tower.	As a result, the elegant carvings at the base of the columns on the ground floor had sunk below ground. 	There was more agony in the 1930s. Benito Mussolini, leader of the Fascists, had become dictator of Italy.  His regime rejected the drooping Tower as an inappropriate symbol.  Engineers were ordered to sort out the troublesome lean.  A plumb line was installed to measure it in thousandths of a degree. But below ground the engineers wreaked havoc.  They drilled holes through the floor of the Tower, and almost 200 tons of concrete were poured into the foundations.  The new plumb line recorded a southward lurch of nearly a tenth of a degree.  The work had destabilized the delicate Tower.  In the 1950s, the seven swaying medieval bells were locked tight.  Their vibrations had been shaking the Tower apart.  So precarious was the condition of the Tower that even its bells could tip the balance.  An object lesson that even today must be taken to heart.	Caution is wise, but visitors grow impatient.  Pisa's tourist industry appears to be struggling.  Eventually, the continuing threat of an earthquake and the hideous lead ingots trigger a major political shift and the green light is given to a high risk proposal.	In this plan, anchors will be attached to a concrete ring wrapped around the base of the Tower.  The engineers will drill through the soft soil and secure the anchors in the solid bedrock 130 feet down. The pull from the anchors will replace the push of the unattractive lead weights.  This operation will not reverse the lean, but should halt and stabilize it.  The contractors first attempt to install the ring through which the anchors will be connected to the Tower.  Made of reinforced concrete, the ring is positioned under the floor of the Catino - well beneath the water table. This is a major gamble.	As the contractors burrow down, they inject liquid nitrogen, at a temperature of about 200 degrees below zero, into the ground.  This freezes the surrounding ground water so that it cannot flood the excavation.  During the freezing, Opera president Ranieri Favilli, all too familiar with the consequences of past interventions, gets carried away by an overactive imagination.	As the freezing moves to the sensitive south side, the monitors watch the Tower closely.  At 3
30 a.m. on the 6th of September 1995, the Tower reacts.  The top lurches a 16th of an inch south.	Contractors scramble to restabilize the Tower by loading on more lead ingots.  The lurch is halted, but the Committee's attempt to remove the ugly lead has resulted in an even larger pile around the Tower's base.	The building site around the Tower lies quiet for a year after what becomes known as Black September.  Then in late 1996, because of a dispute within the Italian government, the Committee is disbanded.  Burland's extensive research now looks like it has been a wasted effort.	The Committee remains out of action until the fall of  '97.  Just north of Pisa, the area around Assisi - birthplace of St. Francis - is hit by an earthquake measuring almost six on the Richter scale.  Thousands are left homeless.  Unique historic buildings are damaged beyond repair.  And it soon emerges that although this earthquake was no surprise, little was done to prepare for it.  The resulting scandal inspires a new dynamic attitude in Italian restoration and conservation.  In Pisa, the Committee reconvenes, and approves soil extraction.	But there is no margin for error.  So the engineers on the Committee devise one of the strangest contraptions in this bizarre story.  100 yards north of the Tower, just behind the Opera, contractors begin work.  This is one of two tripods designed to hold steel cables that will run right across the Piazza to brackets on the Tower's second story.  The cables will form a massive harness to support the Tower.	During an unsettling deluge, the first cable of the harness is craned into position.  Although only temporary, this is a huge project.  Just ten yards of this cable weighs half a ton.  If it lashes out from the crane, it could kill the workmen and damage the fragile Tower.  At a critical moment, the cable slips and jams into a marble arch.  Locals come out to watch and hope that the Tower will not overreact.  Hours later, the struggle to free the cable is successful.  That night the first component of the harness is secured.  The completed harness is carefully balanced and adjusted.  It looks like heavy engineering, but there's only enough force exerted on the Tower to resist a minor mishap.	The scene is set and the soil extraction is put to the test.	The success of soil extraction hinges on the assumption that the ground below the Tower is mainly silt.  On day one, soil begins to spew out of the extractor casing. But it looks like clay, not silt.  Burland is eager to make an on-the-spot analysis.	The Tower has been creeping south for centuries, so the lean will not be reversed in a few hours.  Right now, the main fear is that the drilling will trigger a catastrophic lurch further south.  But the Tower is quiet, and the operation continues.	After one month of soil extraction the top of the Tower has moved a fifth of an inch north.  But the stable position of 300 years ago lies another foot away.  Even if the operation goes well, it will take about two years to coax the Tower that far north.  Until then, the Leaning Tower of Pisa will remain wired-in and strapped-up like a patient on the operating table.  Its progress will be anxiously watched, lest this enigmatic structure confronts us with an unwelcome surprise. In spring 1946, an order came through to destroy all the records of what had been the Allies' most secret operation of World War II
 the codebreaking unit at Bletchley Park. By mid 1940, the German Army had conquered all of western Europe. Hitler was tightening the noose around Britain.  In the Atlantic, German U-boats were decimating Allied convoys, threatening to cut off Britain's only lifeline.  But Churchill had a secret weapon, the strangest military establishment in the world.  Crossword fanatics, chess champions, mathematicians, students and professors, Americans and British, all came here with one common aim
 to unlock the secrets of the Enigma, a machine that concealed Germany's war plans in seemingly unbreakable code.  If Enigma could be penetrated, everything Hitler plotted would be known in advance.  At Bletchley Park there unfolded one of the most astonishing exploits of the Second World War.  Many here had never seen a code before, yet it was their job to find a way to crack Enigma.  In the process, they devised ingenious codebreaking machines that were forerunners of the modern computer.  But everything they did remained classified for 30 years.  Tonight NOVA reveals the secrets of the men and women who helped turned the tide of victory and shape the future. In 1939, Germany introduces a devastating new kind of warfare, blitzkrieg.  Lightning attacks by tanks and planes bring Europe to its knees. Blitzkrieg depends on surprise, demanding speedy communication.  So radio is crucial to the attack plans.  Every day the skies are full of German radio signals.  The German high command has trained thousands of wireless operators in preparation for the conquest of Europe.  Their job is to be able to interpret  Morse code in any conditions.  But there is still the problem of how to keep the messages secret.  So the German military has adopted a seemingly invincible code-making machine.  The Enigma turns a message into unintelligible gibberish, letter by letter.  When the message is sent in Morse code, all an enemy would see is a meaningless string of letters.  But when the German operator at the receiving end types the coded letters back into his Enigma machine, the real message appears.  In this way vital war plans remain totally secret.  The high command never wavers from its belief in the security of Enigma.  They are so confident that they deploy the Enigma throughout the German war machine.  They never imagine what was about to happen at Bletchley Park. This is the machine the German high command believed would protect their secrets.  This is the Enigma. Long before the war began, the airwaves were full of coded messages as Hitler prepared for battle.  Cracking the German ciphers became the priority of a special British Intelligence unit.  In 1938, the unit, known as the Government Code and Cipher School, or GC&CS, moved into Bletchley Park, an ornate mansion 50 miles north of London.  From this rooftop room, wireless operators contacted listening stations all over Britain that were intercepting German messages.  Bletchley Park's code name was Station X.  The challenge of breaking the Enigma demanded a special kind of talent.  GC&CS set about recruiting. Bletchley Park evolved into a unique operation in which military discipline, uniforms, and rank no longer mattered.  The sole imperative was to break the Enigma, and break it as quickly as possible. But youth and determination weren't enough.  Mathematicians were enlisted to take on the daunting complexity of the Enigma.  Only a completely new approach to codebreaking could help to penetrate its secrets.  But if the work at Bletchley Park were to succeed, absolute secrecy was essential.  Some of the recruits had no idea of the purpose of their work. The Germans were supremely confident in the Enigma.  Its basic principle was simple, but it could scramble messages in millions of different ways.  Pressing one typewriter key would light up a totally different letter. An electrical current was sent from the keys to the letters through a series of rotors.  Each time a key was pressed a rotor would turn, altering the wiring and so changing the letter that was produced. The Enigma was first developed as a commercial encryption device in the 1920s and patented in London.  German banks and railways were among its first customers, but the German military was quick to see its potential.  Each day German operators in the field received a new set of instructions from base on how to set up the Enigma.  They had to make three adjustments so that both the sender's and receiver's machines would match.  First, which rotors to put into the machine and in what order. The second step was to change the wiring of each rotor by adjusting the ring of letters around the rim - 26 combinations on each wheel.  The third step was the plugboard.  Using his secret instructions for the day, the operator could wire up each typewriter key to a totally different letter. Once the machine was set up, the message was encoded letter by letter.  These letters were then sent by Morse code to the receiver at the other end.  The Germans were never shaken in their belief in Enigma's invincibility.  At first, all the codebreakers had were meaningless groups of coded letters and endless patience.  And in the first months of the war the new recruits were getting nowhere. The search for a solution began long before the war.  Starting in 1931 and continuing for seven years, a hard-up German army clerk secretly obtained more than 300 documents, including the instructions and settings for the Enigma machines.  He sold them to the French Secret Service, but their cryptographers showed little interest.  Next the stolen documents were offered to the British Secret Service.  At this stage, GC&CS was skeptical that Enigma could be broken and politely declined the offer.  Finally the documents went to the Poles.  With Germany breathing down their necks, their response was very different.  A deal was struck.  With the stolen documents in hand, three brilliant young Polish mathematicians, Zygalski, Rozycki and Rejewski, set to work on the Enigma.  The Poles soon realized that they had to figure out how the Germans had wired the Enigma's keyboard to the first rotor.  Since any typewriter key could be wired to any letter on the rotor, the number of possible wiring orders was astronomical.  But if the Poles could work this out, it would be a vital first step in breaking the Enigma. But in 1939, on the eve of the invasion of Poland, the Germans added an extra choice of rotors to the Enigma and the Poles could no longer read any of the messages.  In desperation, they invited British and French officials to a secret meeting in a forest near Warsaw.  They revealed how they had previously broken the Enigma.  The British were astonished. Within weeks of that meeting, Poland was invaded and war broke out. The Polish cryptographers had given Bletchley Park their own replica of the Enigma machine, but the extra rotors the Germans had added meant that the codebreakers were still in the dark.  As the flow of German messages increased, at last they began to see a way of achieving the impossible.  The starting point was the messages themselves.  The British had set up a worldwide network of radio listening posts operated by the military, the post office, and even the London police.  They were known as Y Stations. Round the clock and around the world, thousands of operators were writing down meaningless groups of coded letters, the raw material for Bletchley Park.  Their approach to cracking the Enigma began with another Polish breakthrough.  One of the special procedures the Germans followed in setting up their machines was known as a double indicator.  It was to be the Enigma's Achilles' heel.  The instruction sheets for each day told the German operator how to set up his Enigma.  They specified the order of the rotors and the position of the ring of letters around each rotor.  The sheets then provided instructions for wiring up the plugboard.  All Enigmas on a network had to be set up identically for the system to work.  But there was one extra level of security.  If the enemy captured the instruction sheets, they would be able read all the messages.  To prevent this, each message had its own secret rotor setting, chosen by the operator.  First the operator had to pick three random letters.  He sent these in plain text to the operator at the receiving end, allowing that other person to line up his machine identically. So the operator encoded a second group of three letters as the secret message setting itself. By encoding the same letters twice, the Germans gave the codebreakers their first clue about the setting of the Enigma rotors.  Soon there was a second clue.  The Poles had noticed a strange quirk in the way the rotors worked.  In about one out of eight intercepts, the Enigma was turning one of the letters in the message setting into the same coded letter twice.  The mistake of sending the message setting twice was revealing a flaw in the machine itself.  Although it was designed to produce random coded letters, there were certain situations in which the Enigma was much less random than the Germans believed. It was just such a flaw that broke the Enigma.  Bletchley Park called the repeated letters "females."  Only a few configurations of the machine could produce these females.  If the codebreakers now worked their way through them, they would find that day's settings.  The codebreakers produced huge cards, known as Jeffries sheets, with holes punched through in an alphabetical grid representing the wheel positions that could produce females.  By lining these sheets over each other, the codebreakers could hunt through the wheel positions to find out how the Enigma had been set up for that day. In the spring of 1941, the naval war was building up in the Mediterranean.  Hitler had joined forces with the Italian Fascist Mussolini. Both dictators were dreaming of global empires.  The Allies knew that the Germans had given Enigma machines to the Italians.  One of the codebreakers trying to break in to the Italian messages was 19-year-old Mavis Lever. Mavis and the other codebreakers didn't know it, but they were about to make their first major impact on the war. The British fleet was based in the Egyptian port of Alexandria under the command of Admiral Andrew Cunningham.  Bletchley Park intercepted a message that would lead the Admiral to hatch a clever plan. Mavis had decoded just the message that Cunningham needed to outwit the Italians. Within hours the decoded message was on its way to Cunningham in Egypt.  The Italian fleet was gathering off Cape Matapan on the Greek coast. Their plan was to attack a British convoy at midnight.  Alexandria was a nest of spies.  The problem for Cunningham was how to act on the message without giving his plans away.  If he led the fleet out to sea the Italians would know immediately.  Cunningham embarked on an elaborate ruse to fool the spies.  He wanted his enemies to believe that all was quiet. But at night Cunningham slipped back on board and led the British fleet out to sea, to the precise spot where the Italian ships were gathered. The ruse worked.  Cunningham caught the Italians completely off guard.  That night the Italians lost nearly 3000 men, the cream of their navy.  It was the first major coup for Bletchley Park. The Navy were the heroes of the Battle of Matapan.  Bletchley Park was of course never mentioned, but the codebreakers had their own reward. But their joy was to be short-lived. Gloom descended not only on Bletchley Park but on all British cities. For months, relentless bombing had become part of everyday life.  The Blitz was a war of blood and nerves. During the grim months of the Blitz, Bletchley Park was one of Churchill's few glimmers of hope.  Access to the enemy's innermost secrets could make the difference between victory and defeat.  The codebreakers were working around the clock to break the Enigma.  They had divided into huts to attack different parts of the German war machine.  Hut 6 was now concentrating on the Air Force Enigma. The Luftwaffe's code, nicknamed RED, soon proved vulnerable. Ironically, the German Air Force  thought itself so technologically advanced that it was careless about security.  For months, Bletchley Park had tried to crack the secret messages from German airfields to their headquarters in Berlin. They had to find a way - and quickly.  Hitler was preparing to invade Britain. John Herivel turned his thoughts to the Enigma operator.  There were set procedures to be carried out to prepare each Enigma for that day's messages.  The settings of the rotors and the Ringstellung - the alphabet ring around the rotors - were crucial.  If the secret instructions were not followed exactly, the security of the whole system would be at risk.  But John Herivel discovered that the operators were making a fatal mistake.  It became known as the Herivel tip. The operator had to send the three random letters by Morse to the person at the other end so that both machines would be set to the same start position.  But Herivel realized that if the operator failed to spin his rotors as he should, then the three letters he was sending over the airwaves - uncoded - would be the secret ring setting.  Instructions were quickly sent out to the Y Stations to pay particular attention to the first messages they intercepted each day.  That's when the mistake would show up.  Hut 6 studied the opening letter groups of the intercepts as fast as they arrived to see if the Herivel tip would work.  Sometimes the operator made only a half-hearted attempt to spin the rotors.  So LWZ would become LYB - just a click or two away - or perhaps LUX.  But as the codebreakers plotted out each letter group, they would begin to see clusters of letters that revealed the original secret setting. Herivel's tip was working.  At last, they had a way to break Luftwaffe RED. The codebreakers could now give the RAF vital information about how the Luftwaffe was organized and what it was planning - even if they didn't always know the details. Hut 6 soon saw connections between the two sets of supposedly random letters.  Once they got the first three letters which were sent in plain text, they could often guess the second three, which were in code.  One operator called Walter became legendary at Bletchley Park. Every day he would set his rotors to the first three letters of his name and then type in the first three letters of his girlfriend's name, Klara. HIT was almost invariably followed by LER.  Even Hitler was helping to break the Enigma. Despite its success in breaking the Luftwaffe RED code, Bletchley Park  had got nowhere with the Enigma of the German Navy - and it was the Navy that was now the problem.  By the spring of 1941, German U-boats were wreaking havoc in the Battle of the Atlantic.  Every merchant ship sunk deprived Britain of the supplies it needed to survive.  Slow-moving convoys of merchant ships regularly crossed the Atlantic to and from America.  The United States had not yet entered the war but the convoys supplied half of Britain's food and all of its oil.  Although protected by escorts, its convoys were still easy targets for the German U-boats.  Hitler had ordered Admiral Karl Donitz to destroy Britain's lifeline. Donitz built giant fortified U-boat pens on the French coast.  From here his U-boats could strike out into the Atlantic.  To attack the convoys, Donitz organized his U-boats into hunting groups or wolf packs, operating along specific patrol lines.  As the slow moving convoys crossed the Atlantic, wolf packs of 30 or more U-boats would lie in wait. Donitz controlled the wolf packs by radio messages encoded in the naval Enigma.  Breaking it was to be the biggest challenge faced by Bletchley Park.  If they failed, the Battle of the Atlantic - and the war - could be lost.  One mind held the key to breaking the Enigma, and it belonged to Alan Turing. Soon after becoming a research fellow at Cambridge at only 22, Alan Turing invented the first basic concept of a computing machine.  Bletchley Park suited both his genius and his eccentricity. Alan Turing set himself the challenge of cracking the Enigma.  In an attic room at Bletchley Park, Turing began studying the U-boat messages.  All he had to go on were the scrambled letters.  In an astonishing feat of deduction, Turing discovered exactly how the Germans were hiding the crucial message setting.  Unlike the Luftwaffe, the German Navy was leaving nothing to chance.  Instead of letting the operator choose three letters at random for his message setting, he had to get them from a list.  Although Turing had no information about the naval procedures, he managed to identify exactly how they selected their daily keys from a set of secret tables.  Instead of replacing one letter with another, these so-called bigram tables substituted pairs of letters. Brilliant as Turing's deduction was, it was useless without the secret bigram tables, and those were on board the U-boats.  Then came an amazing stroke of luck.  Captain Fritz Julius Lemp was a hero of the Third Reich.  His U-boat, the U-110, had sunk the first ship in the war.  In April1941, he set out on what was to be his last mission.  David Balme had just turned 20.  He was an officer on H.M.S. Bulldog, which was escorting a convoy from Liverpool bound for America. Georg Hogel was the Enigma operator on U-110. He had been with Captain Lemp throughout the war. This was just the chance that Turing and Bletchley Park had been waiting for.  On board the U-110 were the secret bigram tables. The Germans abandoned ship, leaving the code books behind.  But Georg Hogel had one precious document he had to rescue - a book of love poems to his girlfriend. David Balme led a boarding party across to the stricken submarine. Fearing that the Germans had left men behind to scuttle the boat, Balme went aboard first. The rest of the boarding party began to search the U-boat. They had no idea what they were looking for.  They did not know about the secret bigram tables.  David Balme had never heard of Bletchley Park. Little did David Balme realize that the envelope in his pocket would transform the intelligence battle against the U-boats.  It contained procedural handbooks, a U-boat navigational chart, and the vital bigram tables.  These documents gave Bletchley Park a major leap forward in decoding.  Captain Lemp died in the attack.  No one will ever know why he did not scuttle the U-boat or destroy the codes. The only document on the U-110 that did not end up in British hands was the book of love poems to Edith.  The papers that were captured, including the bigram tables, were priceless.  When the documents reached Bletchley Park, the codebreakers rejoiced.  The tables and charts would lead to a drastic improvement in fixing U-boat positions, so convoys could be routed evasively around the wolf packs. Almost immediately the results were evident.  On June 23rd, 1941, Bletchley Park decoded a U-boat message that would save a convoy.  It was heading for England laden with supplies, and the codebreakers discovered that a wolf pack of 10 U-boats was lying in wait.  Armed with this knowledge, the Admiralty could reroute the convoy and set up a counter attack. The attack lasted five days; two of the U-boats were sunk and the convoy arrived safely.  The Allies had a formidable new weapon in the Battle of the Atlantic.  But the war was far from over.  Frustrated in his attempts to crush Britain, Hitler now dreamed of conquest in the east.  In the spring of 1941, decoded Enigma messages hinted at preparations for a massive invasion of Russia.  Once the invasion was under way, Bletchley Park began decoding other, more alarming messages. Churchill was taking a chance that the Germans would realize their codes had been broken, exposing the work of Bletchley Park.  It was a huge gamble.  In fact, the head of the order police was suspicious and ordered new restrictions on the sending of reports on the mass killings by radio.  Luckily for Bletchley Park, the German high command never lost its faith in the Enigma. But to avoid further risk of exposure, security was tightened and all information resulting from Bletchley Park decodes bore the top secret rating, code word Ultra. By the summer of 1941, Bletchley Park was able to crack the naval Enigma in less than two days, due partly to the U-boat documents and partly because they had learned to exploit a crucial weakness of the Enigma machine. When an operator typed a message on the Enigma, the machine would replace every letter with a different one.  The letter typed in never came out the same. This was yet another basic flaw in the Enigma that could be exploited.  The simple fact that no coded letter could ever be the original letter was vital to the codebreakers in their quest to unravel the messages.  As they studied the intercepts, it became clear that the Germans kept repeating certain set phrases.  It was soon possible to predict which message contained a particular phrase.  Bletchley Park called these phrases "cribs." As military bureaucracy settled into routine, the Germans often sent the same message at the same time every day. When they suspected the presence of a set phrase, the codebreakers then searched for it in a message.  Finding the correct position for the crib relied on the flaw in the Enigma.  The codebreakers lined their crib up against the coded message.  Since they knew the Enigma would never duplicate a letter in the original, if any pairs of letters did match, the phrase must be in the wrong position.  They slid the crib along the message until they found a point where none of the letters were the same.  This could be where the phrase was located.  If successful, they could then work out the Enigma settings for the next 24 hours.  The codebreakers became so adept, they would create their own cribs.  They would ask the RAF to drop mines in a specific stretch of sea.  The Germans would immediately send a message giving a grid reference for the mines. The codebreakers knew the grid reference CF97 would be spelled out in the coded German message.  So they used "caesar fritz nein sieben" as the crib to find the Enigma key.  Bletchley Park  called this gardening.  By now the codebreakers were not merely learning about the Enigma, but about the whole system of war communication.  Could the new intelligence have an impact on an entire military campaign?  The test came in the deserts of North Africa.  A new German general was making a name for himself with his aggressive attacks on the British
 Erwin Rommel. But Rommel's strategy had one major weakness.  He relied totally on the Italians to bring in supplies.  Rommel's supply lines were a natural target for the British. Bletchley Park could pinpoint the location of enemy oil tankers and even know how much gasoline they were carrying.  But to keep Ultra safe, it had to look as though the British knew about the convoys from some other source. But in the game of intelligence, the Allies had losses as well as gains.  Although the German secret service never cracked an Allied cipher machine, Rommel did obtain vital inside information from a spy.  The incident began earlier in 1941 when a group of American codebreakers visited Bletchley Park.  With America not yet officially at war, the secret services on both sides were nervous about collaborating. Although the British worried about the possibility of American security leaks, they began sharing decoded Enigma messages and diplomatic reports about the war.  British security fears were justified, for these exchanges soon gave Rommel his own intelligence breakthrough.  Reports on the British campaign in North Africa were sent regularly to Washington by the U.S. military attaché in Cairo.  The Germans intercepted the messages, but couldn't break the diplomatic code.  Then, in September 1941, the Italian secret service broke into the U.S. embassy in Rome and stole the code book used to encipher all U.S. diplomatic messages.  The thieves copied the code book and returned it to the safe without anyone knowing.  Now Rommel could read all embassy transmissions about the British campaign.  Armed with information about British troops and tanks, Rommel launched a bold assault through Libya, pushing the British back 300 miles in 17 days.  The news that reached Churchill painted a grim picture of defeat.  Now the British needed their own intelligence coup to reverse the disaster.  At Bletchley Park, the codebreakers raced to crack the daily rotor settings.  Some breaks came in only six to 12 hours.  Still, lives might be saved if the operation could be speeded up.  The gifted codebreaker Alan Turing had long been intrigued by the idea of building machines to automate the codebreaking process.  The Poles had built such a device before the war, but Turing set out to improve on their ideas.  Turing's goal was to build a machine that could figure out how the German operators had set up their Enigmas for that day's messages. Turing's machine was vastly more powerful than the Poles' earlier device.  Curiously, Bletchley Park called it the Bomb, perhaps because of the ticking noise it made while operating. The Bomb was an array of electromechanical drums that simulated the rotors of the Enigma machines.  The drums clicked round letter by letter, testing the thousands of possible Enigma settings - 20 every second - until the correct one had been found.  The Bombs radically sped up the pace of decoding. By the end of the war there were 200 of the devices at six different locations, enabling Bletchley Park to decode 90,000 messages a month. Meanwhile, in August 1942, Churchill traveled to North Africa, determined to reverse the Allies' fortunes.  His first action was to inject fresh blood into the leadership of the 8th Army.  He appointed a decisive new general, Bernard Montgomery, to take on Rommel's Africakorps.  He knew from Ultra that Rommel was prepared to attack somewhere in Egypt - but where? Montgomery predicted the ridge at Alam Halfa. But Montgomery had another advantage.  The Allies finally realized that the Germans were reading U.S. embassy reports on the British campaign, so the embassy changed its diplomatic code.  Rommel no longer knew what the enemy was planning.  Montgomery was still receiving Ultra from Bletchley Park.  Soon, the German forces were under enormous pressure.  But some of the decoders began to feel impatient with Montgomery. On the 23rd of October, the British launched its attack at El Alamein. British intercept stations logged over 300 messages a day in the battle that followed.  Bletchley Park knew Rommel's plans, his forces, and his losses.  For the first time in the war, an army moved into battle with precise advance knowledge of the enemy. Ultra told Montgomery of Rommel's critical shortages of fuel and tanks.  On the evening of the 2nd of November, Rommel signaled Hitler for permission to retreat. Hitler replied the next day, ordering Rommel not to yield a step, either victory or death.  Montgomery read the message within hours.  At El Alamein Montgomery's superior forces crushed Rommel.  Yet he decided not to pursue the remnants of the retreating German Army. At the time of El Alamein, the U.S. had been at war with Germany for nearly a year.  Even before Pearl Harbor, the British Admiralty had been passing decoded U-boat messages to the American Navy.  Churchill and Roosevelt knew that the Battle of the Atlantic was crucial and that Ultra gave them a vital edge in the fight against the U-boats.  In February 1942, the Admiralty received disastrous news.  An abrupt change in the U-boat code plunged Bletchley Park into darkness.  They could no longer read the U-boat signals. Equally serious was an abrupt change in U-boat tactics.  German submarines switched from the North Atlantic and began prowling the eastern seaboard of the U.S.  There, the marauding U-boats maintained radio silence.  When they did transmit, their signals couldn't be decoded.  All over the Atlantic, the Allied navies struggled to cope with mounting losses at sea.  As the crisis deepened, the naval Enigma team at Bletchley Park worked round the clock to crack the new code, which they called Shark.  Since none of the old codebreaking tricks would work, it was obvious that Donitz had somehow drastically changed the Enigma. For the Allies on both sides of the Atlantic, it was a severe blow. Before the blackout, the Admiralty's submarine tracking room had been able to pinpoint U-boats with the help of the navigational positions radioed between Donitz and his crews.  Now all they had were rough directional fixes on the signals themselves.  Toward the end of 1942, the Allies were losing ships at over four times the rate before the blackout.  Finally Bletchley Park figured out what Donitz had done.  Though still believing the Allies could never crack Enigma, he was worried about internal security, and ordered the addition of a fourth rotor to the machine.  The revolving rotors, with their maze of constantly changing electrical wiring, were the secret of the Enigma. Introducing a fourth one vastly multiplied the number of potential settings. Now the codebreakers would have to build a new type of device to simulate the four-rotor Enigma, and pacify the increasingly impatient Americans. Tensions grew when secrets were withheld from an American intelligence officer visiting Bletchley Park.  He wrote an angry report home. To resolve the crisis, Bletchley Park's second-in-command traveled to Washington for a meeting with the U.S. Navy.  They signed an agreement to resolve concerns about security and to cooperate fully on the breaking of the naval Enigma.  As part of the deal, American codebreakers would be sent to Bletchley Park.  Together they would take on the challenge of the fourth rotor. The first chance to get back into the naval Enigma came when a fresh set of captured U-boat code tables arrived at Bletchley Park, enabling the codebreakers to uncover a critical weakness in the four-rotor system.  The German four-rotor Enigma used mainly on submarines had to communicate with other naval stations that used only a three-wheel machine.  To solve the problem, the fourth rotor could be set in a special position that allowed the machine to simulate an old fashioned three-rotor Enigma.  With the help of the captured tables, the codebreakers worked out the settings of the first three rotors on the Bombs as they had in the past, then simply ran through all 26 positions of the fourth rotor until they found the right one.  Soon, the daily settings were on their way to the Admiralty and America.  After 10 months in the cold, Bletchley Park was back. Once again Bletchley Park could help reroute convoys around the Wolf Packs.  Airborne radar and improved escort support helped assure victory in the Battle of the Atlantic.  Although only a few of the men and women of Bletchley Park were in a position to appreciate it, the breaking of the naval Enigma was their finest hour.  By the spring of 1943, they were decoding dozens of messages a day, and cooperation with the Americans was taken to a new level. The U.S. codebreaking unit was known as Arlington Hall, after its headquarters in northern Virginia.  After the war, it would become the National Security Agency, or NSA.  Here the first American officers were selected to join the codebreakers at Bletchley Park. During their voyage to England, the officers were ordered to tell a bizarre cover story, that they were messenger pigeon experts in the signal corps.  This aroused the suspicions of an officer who was checking their identity. The Americans quickly settled into life at Bletchley Park.  The only serious dispute arose when the British challenged the Americans to a game of rounders, the British version of baseball. As the Americans adapted to their new life, their colleagues told them about a mysterious and daunting codebreaking problem.  They knew that in addition to Enigma, the Germans sometimes used another completely different kind of cipher machine. At first, the decoders puzzled over the origin of the strange signals.  Hitler had demanded a cipher machine for the German high command that was faster and even more secure than the Enigma.  His experts devised a coding system based on the teleprinter machine.  Teleprinters operated on a simple, universal binary code that was widely known.  But the Germans connected the teleprinter to a machine that cunningly exploited the teleprinter language itself to produce a complex code.  The secret German coding machine was called the Lorenz.  To scramble a message the Lorenz used 12 rotors - not just the three or four of the Enigma. The Lorenz relied on a mathematical system called "modulo two addition." This allowed the string of meaningless letters added to the message at one end to be removed at the other by a similar math calculation. The security of the Lorenz depended on the fact that it was adding a string of random letters to hide the real message. Bletchley Park gave the mysterious code the name FISH.  They worked out that fish was based on teleprinter language.  How to strip off the obscuring code was anybody's guess.  But on the 30th of August, 1941, a lazy German operator gave the whole game away. When the operator began to encode the same message a second time, he grew impatient and abbreviated parts of it.  The resulting slight changes enabled the codebreakers to strip off the random letters that were cloaking the message. Now that they had decoded the message, could they use it to figure out exactly how the Lorenz machine worked?  For the next two months, the codebreakers hunted laboriously for patterns in the endless strings of obscuring letters.  Eventually they were able to reconstruct the precise mechanics of the Lorenz - a machine they had never seen.  They even built their own replica.  Since it was used to crack the mysterious Fish code, they called the replica Tunny, after a fish in the tuna family.  Once the Lorenz settings were found, Tunny could turn the messages into plain German.  Despite the advances in understanding Fish, it still took at least a month to decode a single message, and by then the information was generally useless. But the whole process was about to be speeded up.  At the post office research station in London, a brilliant young telephone engineer hit upon the idea of an electronic machine that would automate the hunt for the Fish settings.  The machine would be nothing less than the world's first programmable computer. Though the codebreakers were skeptical, Flowers was convinced the answer lay in vacuum tubes - hundreds of them. Over Christmas 1943, Tommy Flowers installed the world's first programmable computer at Bletchley Park.  Eventually ten more were built, all dedicated to analyzing the secret messages of the German high command. They were given the name Colossus.  Colossus could read a coded message at high speed and then search for the settings of the Lorenz code wheels.  It could accomplish this in minutes instead of a month. Colossus began operating five months before D-Day, the critical invasion of France in June1944 that would turn the tide against Hitler.  Tanks and guns choked every main road and street in southern England.  The Allies prepared an elaborate deception.  They set out to trick the Germans into thinking that the attack on Normandy  was simply a diversion.  Double agents in Britain relayed the false information to Berlin, but only the codebreakers could tell if the deception was working. It was an enormous subterfuge and an even bigger gamble.  Around the clock, the Allies searched for the merest hint of German suspicion.  The invasion was poised to strike.  But then, a vital message was decoded at Bletchley Park. When Bletchley Park decoded Rommel's message, it contained alarming news.  German tanks were massing at the exact spot where American troops were about to parachute into Normandy. It was June 4th, 1944.  Reassured by the codebreakers that all was well, the massive army began to move forward.  Then came a discouraging setback. Twenty-four hours later, the Allies launched the biggest military invasion in history. The decoded messages showed that the deception had worked.  Hitler's troops were split between Normandy and Calais and were unable to counter the onslaught.  Over half the German forces had remained in the northeast, awaiting an attack that never came.  At Bletchley Park, those who knew about the invasion weren't allowed to leave for 48 hours.  Even now, nobody was taking any chances. It had not been a bad day for the codebreakers either.  They had accurately foretold the position of all but two of the 62 German divisions. Enigma and Lorenz messages were read throughout the D-Day operation.  By the end of the war, they had handled at least 63 million characters of high level code between Hitler and his generals.  In the months that followed, Bletchley Park would continue to chronicle the disintegration of Nazi Germany - right until the end of the war.  Finally, at the cost of at least 50 million lives, the Second World War came to an end. In the roll call of those who had brought about victory, the codebreakers of Bletchley Park would never be mentioned.  The operations there were to stay a secret for the next 30 years.  Eight of the ten Colossus machines were destroyed.  The remaining two were moved to British secret service headquarters, where they may have played a significant part in the codebreaking operations of the Cold War.  In fact, the Russian military had developed a code that was similar to the high command's Fish code.  So the techniques invented at Bletchley Park were still to prove vital in a very different kind of conflict.  In 1960, the order finally came to destroy the last two Colossus machines. Tommy Flowers returned to the post office and was forgotten.  In all the secrecy, Colossus never received recognition as the world's first programmable computer.  Instead, that honor was to go to the American Eniac. As for the codebreakers, they all dispersed, some back to universities and others into the fledgling computer industry.  A few stayed on in the British secret service, while some of the Americans returned to Arlington Hall.  The most innovative thinker of all, the man whose inventiveness had been at the center of Bletchley Park's success, died tragically.  In 1954, Alan Turing took his own life after being persecuted as a security risk because he was gay. Apart from the Atom Bomb, there was no greater secret in World War II than the work of the codebreakers of Bletchley Park.  Their breakthroughs gave the Allies a vital edge in the U-boat war, the tank battles against Rommel, and the D-Day invasion.  But their impact was felt far beyond the battlefield. Eavesdropping and decryption won a new prominence in the minds of politicians as well as generals.  The transatlantic alliance, that took its first hesitant steps at Bletchley Park, would mature and prove critical during the Cold War. And the roots of today's computer era trace back directly to the dazzling inventiveness of Turing, Flowers, and their wartime colleagues.  In the end, though, Bletchley Park's greatest achievement lay not in broken ciphers but in the hundreds of thousands, perhaps millions, of lives it saved. Cooking peanut butter at temperatures of 3000 degrees under pressure of over a million pounds per square inch is a recipe that won't fill your stomach - but it might make you rich. For nearly 50 years, scientists have known how to transform carbon rich substances into small industrial diamonds, but the trick to making gem quality stones has remained elusive - until now.  Today, it may be possible to manufacture diamond jewels that are indistinguishable from the real thing - and it has the diamond industry worried. What will happen to the mystique of this billion-year-old stone if science finally solves the mystery of making the perfect gem diamond?  For this most brilliant and treasured jewel, Mother Nature, it seems, no longer holds the patent. Deep under the earth - in mines scattered around the world - thousands of tons of rock are displaced each day in hopes of uncovering a few gem-quality diamonds. But how would we feel if this miracle of nature could be copied, atom by atom, in a laboratory in just a few hours?  Could any reproduction, no matter how faithful, ever compare with a natural stone? Diamonds have always invited fakery, which was often easy to spot.  And while the techniques for producing look-a-likes have improved, these sparklers are still no closer to being diamonds than a piece of glass.  Real diamonds are much more difficult to make - and nearly impossible to break. Their chemical composition was only discovered in the late 1700s, after  pioneering chemist Antoine Lavoisier found a way to burn one.  In this lab a real diamond is being heated to over 1500 degrees centigrade.  After being dropped into liquid oxygen, the diamond burns completely.  All that is left is carbon dioxide gas - proving that diamonds are nothing but pure carbon.  The only pure carbon substance known in Lavoisier's time was graphite - the soft, black material in pencil lead. Could slippery, soft graphite be transformed into diamond - the hardest and most brilliant material on earth?  For those who first dreamed of making diamonds, it must have seemed an insurmountable task.  It was war that created the urgent need for manufactured diamonds.  During the Second World War, diamond-tipped cutting tools were desperately needed to make weapons.  Only diamonds were hard enough to cut and shape the tools required for making airplane parts, vehicle armor and other military hardware.  At the time, American industry was dangerously dependent on South African diamonds. Fearing the loss of this critical supply, the American government was determined to develop an alternative source.  But it would be another decade before one was found. In 1951 General Electric started project Superpressure.  Its aim was to make the world's first industrial diamonds with the same properties as natural diamonds.  A young chemist, Tracy Hall, was invited to join the team. Another member of the team was physicist Herbert Strong. The first challenge was to find a way of transforming graphite into diamond.  The team soon learned that graphite, despite its softness, is amazingly resistant to change. The GE team first looked to nature when considering how to turn graphite into diamond.  Because diamonds are found inside extinct volcanoes, embedded in a mineral called kimberlite, geologists believed they were formed in the molten ooze of the earth's mantle - more than 100 miles below the surface.  Here, temperatures range between 2000 and 3000 degrees Fahrenheit.  Pressures rise above one million pounds per square inch.  Only in an environment of extreme heat and pressure, geologists realized, do carbon atoms coalesce into the highly compact crystalline form of diamond. By dating the minerals trapped inside diamonds, scientists learned that they were formed between 600 million and three billion years ago.  But how long did it take nature to make a diamond?  Did diamonds form slowly over millions of years?  Or did they coalesce quickly - perhaps during their explosive race to the surface inside volcanic plumes of molten kimberlite?  To find out, scientists would have to replicate the heat and pressure found within the earth's mantle.  Only then might they be able to break down the atoms of graphite and see whether they would re-form as diamond.  But the GE team had little idea what the right combination of temperature and  pressure should be. GE spent millions on diamond presses capable of focusing huge pressures and  temperatures on the graphite capsule, but still the graphite wouldn't turn to diamond. After four years - and many broken presses - Project Superpressure was in trouble.  The team had to find a way to make diamonds at lower temperatures and pressures or the project would be cancelled.  But before they could make diamonds, the scientists had to figure out how to break down the atomic structure of graphite.  They had one clue.  Because diamonds are crystals -  like ice - perhaps they, too, might be grown from a liquid. In the 1950s geologists discovered that a meteorite made this crater.  Within it they found tiny diamonds that had been formed on impact. There was another clue in that meteorite - something they thought must have helped to form the diamonds.  The diamonds were surrounded by metal. It was the evidence the GE scientists were looking for.  They hoped that a metal called troilite, when heated into a liquid, would act as a solvent to break the bonds between the carbon atoms in graphite - and do it at a pressure and temperature that was lower than the levels they had been using.  They tried adding some troilite to the growth capsule. They hoped that the carbon atoms in the graphite would dissolve into the molten troilite, and then when they had reached a high enough temperature and pressure, would crystallize as diamond.  They could only risk running their machine at full pressure for a few minutes.  But they had no idea whether this would be enough for diamonds to form.  Just as they had done dozens of times in the past five years, they broke open the capsule. Diamond making grew into a profitable business for GE.  As the technology improved, so did the product.  Today, nearly 90% of all diamonds used in industry are manufactured.  But these tiny crystals would never be gems.  GE was able to grow larger diamonds in the 1970s, but they cost more to produce than the price of natural diamonds.  For the time being, the market in large, gem quality stones is dominated by a single player. De Beers is the diamond business, and controls the world diamond trade from this building in the heart of London.  Over four billion dollars' worth of rough diamonds are sold here every year.  An equal amount is kept on reserve.  One of the ways De Beers has managed to keep the market value of diamonds high is by stockpiling some of its inventory.  Many of the world's diamonds comes from DeBeers' own mines in Africa.  But DeBeers has also formed strong partnerships with many other mining companies around the world.  And when new sources of diamonds are discovered - in places like Siberia and most recently in Canada - De Beers moves in.  Their goal is to protect the value of diamonds by controlling their release. It's impossible to know how much time and money is spent in search of diamonds, but it's clear that the amount of effort it takes to produce even a single engagement ring is impressive.  It is estimated that for every one of these rough stones, 250 tons of rock must be mined and processed.  By weight, that's a ratio of more than a billion to one. This is what rough diamonds look like, fresh from the ground.  They are sent to De Beers in London where they are sorted according to size, shape and color. Inspectors examine each stone, noting the number and size of inclusions, tiny mineral deposits trapped in the diamond crystal at the time it was formed. Dealers around the world then transform these rough stones into gems.  Most diamonds are cut before they are shaped.  It is an operation that requires careful attention to the stone's grain and internal crystal formations.  A diamond can be cut using a diamond-edged saw, a laser beam, or by hand, in the traditional method called cleaving.  Once cut, the stone is then roughly shaped, using another diamond to grind it down.  Facets are formed and polished by pressing the diamond against a spinning iron disk covered in a paste of diamond dust and oil.  It is not uncommon for more than 50% of the original stone to be lost during cutting.  The facets on the diamond must be fine tuned in order to maximize the color and quality of light that is reflected from the surface.  One mistake by any of the cutters can destroy the value of a stone.  But when everything works, the results are spellbinding. The tradition of wearing diamonds began in ancient times.  But for centuries, they belonged only to the rich and the royal.  One of the most famous - the pale blue Hope diamond - was the favorite jewel of King Louis XIV.  Not until the 20th century, following the discovery of rich deposits in South Africa, did diamonds become more widely available.  But more than price, it was promotion that made them the most popular gem in the world.  And Hollywood played a leading role.  By 1953, the year Gentlemen Prefer Blondes was released, diamonds were more than a girl's best friend. They were big business.  It was this kind of exposure that helped propel the diamond trade into a multi-billion dollar industry that shows little sign of abating.  As the demand for diamonds goes up, so do the incentives for any would-be diamond makers hoping to cash in on the market.  In post-Soviet Russia, scientists and entrepreneurs desperate for a foothold in the world economy are racing to create the perfect gem-quality stone.  One of them, Boris Feigelson, set up his own lab in rooms rented from the Institute of the Blind.  His plan was to grow large gems from a tiny seed diamond.  But this required expensive high-pressure equipment, and with little money, everything he used had to be built from scratch.  To make big stones, Feigelson knew he would have to run his presses for days at a time.  It was a risky proposition. Feigelson tried repeatedly to redesign his presses to withstand higher pressures without breaking.  Finally in 1995, the presses could run for the days needed to produce larger gem quality crystals.  But the real science of diamond making is in the delicate chemistry of the growth cell itself.  It is here that Feigelson focused his attention.  At one end of the growth cell Feigelson planted a grit seed of tiny diamond.  Above the seed is the metal solvent and then the graphite source.  Heat at the top causes the carbon atoms to filter out of the metal solvent to the cooler temperatures at the bottom where they latch onto the seed.  If the process is regulated carefully, the seed grows.  After two days of high temperature and pressure, these machines can each produce a one-carat diamond - large, but flawed, with telltale signs of manufacture.  Much would need to be done to reduce the processing time and to improve the quality of the crystal.  Boris Feigelson was not the only one trying to improve his diamond making method. There were at least five labs spread around the old Soviet Union - from Moscow to Siberia. And even though their diamonds were yellow in color and far from flawless, they were enough to set the alarm bells ringing at De Beers.  De Beers, in fact, has been concerned about the threat of synthetic diamonds for years.  Part of its defense has involved developing its own methods for growing diamond crystals. De Beers has no intention of selling these diamonds for use in the jewelry market.  They are used only as tools for distinguishing between man-made and natural stones.  Grown in Johannesburg, the diamonds are sent to De Beers Gem Defense laboratory outside London.  It is here where research scientists like Paul Spear look for ways to thwart the diamond makers.  Over 100 people are employed to identify the tiniest difference between the new synthetics and natural diamonds. As their laboratory-grown diamonds have become ever more perfect, De Beers has had to invent new methods of detection. But the threat may be increasing as Russian labs find ways to rid their gems of the telltale signs of manufacture.  The biggest problem is eliminating tiny pieces of metal trapped in the growing diamonds. It is a lesson that De Beers wants to teach gemologists around the world.  In gem testing centers, classes are held in synthetic diamond detection using diamonds produced in De Beers' own laboratories.  These gemologists learn how to pinpoint synthetic diamonds by zeroing in on their metal inclusions.  To eliminate metal inclusions, the Russians had to control the atomic growth of their crystals in a far more exacting way.  They had to prevent the metal, seen here in blue, from joining the carbon atoms as they formed the diamond.  The metal was finding its way in because the carbon atoms were flowing unevenly.  The key to keeping the flow constant - and the metal out - was controlling the temperature. Through a process of trial and error, constantly adjusting the heat on each end of the growth cell, Feigelson learned how to control the temperature gradient.  After hundreds of experiments, he found a setting that made the flow of carbon atoms more constant.  These minute adjustments helped keep the metal from attaching itself to the growing diamond seed - but exactly how he did it is something he won't divulge. Feigelson finally achieved his aim
 he was able to create a diamond that was metal-free.  But the next problem he and all other diamond makers faced was that their diamonds were yellow.  The color is caused by nitrogen from the atmosphere getting into the presses.  Natural diamonds also contain nitrogen, but over millions of years the pressures and temperatures in the earth's mantle concentrate the nitrogen atoms together into imperceptible clusters and reduce or eliminate the yellow color.  The problem of redistributing the nitrogen to reduce the yellow cast was one that the General Electric diamond makers had already grappled with. Today, in Provo, Utah, others are busy perfecting the methods for creating colorless diamonds.  In this factory, a 5,000 ton press can generate the kind of pressure needed to concentrate the nitrogen in diamonds.  It is a process that is being developed by the sons of GE diamond pioneer, Tracy Hall. But no one has found a way to do more than concentrate some of the nitrogen - enough to turn a brown diamond yellow, but not enough to make it colorless.  What the diamond makers needed was a way to prevent the nitrogen from getting into the diamond at all. A clue for getting rid of the nitrogen came from General Electric's work 20 years before which suggested that the nitrogen atoms could be chemically attracted away from a growing diamond by using what was called a nitrogen "getter."  The nitrogen getter Feigelson chose was aluminium. Feigelson found that by putting aluminium in the growth cell, it melted into the metal solvent and the nitrogen atoms were irresistibly drawn towards it, leaving the carbon atoms free to form as pure and colorless diamond. Feigelson managed to remove the nitrogen and metal inclusions from some of his crystals, but he has not been able to make many.  Despite this modest output, clear and colorless diamonds like these could still turn into a nightmare for De Beers. While Feigelson appears more interested in diamond science, a bigger threat to De Beers comes from a group of diamond makers in Siberia who want to mass produce gems.  Scientists have been making diamonds at the Institute of Geology in Novosibirsk for more than 20 years, but with state funding drying up, money has run out.  They too have had to look for new business opportunities.  What they have to offer is experience in the science of making gem-quality diamonds.  Desperate for money to keep the Institute running, they have been forced to look abroad for investment.  In return for the Institute's know-how, an American company in Florida has invested millions of dollars in a joint research project to make synthetic diamonds a commercial reality.  It is headed by retired Army general Carter Clarke. The Russians are now packing up some of their presses to send to Clarke in America.  If his new production line works, it will be the first time that synthetic gem diamonds, in a variety of sizes and colors, will be produced for the mass market. Like most diamond dealers, Carter Clarke will be selling his wares here, at the world's biggest gem fair - held every year in Las Vegas. But what if some diamonds makers refuse to play by the rules, gambling that they can pass their diamonds off as natural stones? Faced with a potential crisis of confidence caused by the new synthetics that are undetectable under a microscope, De Beers has been forced to look at the atomic structure of natural and synthetic diamonds to find the tiniest difference.  And that has required new and more sophisticated technology. After hundreds of experiments, De Beers' scientists have identified what they believe is a unique difference in synthetic diamonds. This work has traced the cause of phosphorescence in manufactured diamonds to the way they grow.  Natural diamonds have an octahedral structure.  But synthetics, because they grow in an artificial environment, also form cube shaped sectors.  It is this mix of cube and octahedral growth that causes man-made diamonds to absorb ultraviolet light differently. Because of the way defects like nitrogen concentrate in the growth sectors of synthetic diamonds, light is held back and released slowly, causing this unique phosphorescence.  The hardware De Beers developed to observe this phenomenon is called Diamond View. The Diamond View machine is not available to the average dealer, but it does offer a way to pinpoint one key distinguishing feature of synthetic diamonds that suggests that diamond makers may never be able to replicate the passing of time in nature.  In what is becoming a scientific cat and mouse game, De Beers has defeated the diamond makers at an atomic level.  But even this is being challenged. As yet, there is no evidence that any diamond makers have found a way to overcome the phosphorescence problem - but the game is likely to continue.  One team of Russians is trying to grow diamonds in conditions closer to those in the earth's mantle.  Much of this technology is secret, but because they are using a carbonate rather than a metal solvent and lower temperatures in their presses, their tiny diamonds have the pure octahedral form of natural diamonds. Tiny crystals like these represent the latest effort to make diamonds under conditions closer to nature.  These scientists claim that eventually they will be able to grow these minute diamonds into gems, indistinguishable from a natural stone.  But how realistic is this claim? Faced with the future threat of synthetic diamonds being imperceptible to the trade, De Beers is already preparing its bottom line - one low-tech way to guarantee detection.  They are putting minute logos on their diamonds. Some day the science of diamond making may become so ingenious that even experienced dealers won't be able to distinguish between man-made and natural diamonds.  For the diamond makers, this means that the only real difference is in the mind. But what will it mean to the consumer?  In a place called the Graveyard of the Atlantic lie the remains of one of America's most famous ships, the USS Monitor.   A team of Navy divers prepares for the treacherous assignment.  For now the seas are calm.  But in an instant conditions can change, putting ship and divers in dire jeopardy.  It's a deep dive, 230 feet to the ocean floor.  Powerful currents and sudden storms are a constant threat. The objective for the first dive is simple.  Find the target. But suddenly the divers run into trouble.  A strong current whips across the bottom.  Visibility plunges. On the surface anxious moments pass. Why risk life and limb to reach this relic of a war fought long ago? Because now the Monitor itself needs saving. In a race against time and the elements, the divers will try to raise the ship piece by piece.  The Navy has come to rescue one of its own.  It is one of the most famous battles in the American Civil War, the Monitor versus the Merrimack.  The first clash between ironclad warships, a pivotal moment in this war and in naval history. John Broadwater is in charge of the marine sanctuary which now protects the Monitor. The Monitor is not only hard to recognize, but being upside down makes it dangerous to work on.  Jagged pieces of metal can easily snag divers.   John Broadwater has enlisted the services of the U.S. Navy's Mobile Diving and Salvage Unit 2.  For these divers, precision archaeology is a completely new line of work. Chris Murray commands this elite Navy dive team.  They brought up the gruesome fragments of TWA flight 800 when it crashed off Long Island.  But conditions there were mild compared to what they now face. Commander Murray knows that at 230 feet his divers are pushing the limits for safety and depth.  The man he places in charge of this difficult operation is Master Diver Donny Denis. Hard-hat diving is as old as diving itself.  There's still no better way to get heavy objects off the bottom. Snaking behind each diver is an umbilical - yellow, green, red.  Red and green diver will go into the water.  Yellow will remain on deck, ready to dive in an emergency.   The umbilical delivers the divers' breathing mix, hot water to keep him warm and a communications link.  Even with all the careful preparation, getting divers over the side is a tense procedure. Once in the water the divers are switched from air to mixed gas. Husky Navy baritones are transformed by helium into Alvin and the Chipmunks. This time conditions don't let up.  Divers are in danger of being swept off the wreck.  Master Diver Denis decides to bring the team up. It takes five men hauling on each umbilical to stop the divers from being swept away by the current. At this depth, the divers can't come straight to the surface.  They must make a series of decompression stops.   The surface team has just minutes to get them into an on-board chamber where they will complete their decompression. It will take an hour and a half to return their bodies to surface pressure. The divers must wait for conditions to improve before they can risk another dive and finally start exploring the Monitor.  Ericsson's drawings translate into a wide variety of projects - canals in his native Sweden, locomotives in Britain. The steam engine developed by the Englishman James Watt achieves the ingenious breakthrough of rotary motion.  The task that John Ericsson sets himself is to harness this power to drive a warship. Angry and maligned, John Ericsson retreats to the sanctuary of his drafting office. A genius to some, a pigheaded purist to others, Ericsson refuses to abandon his vision of a truly modern, steam-powered warship.  The divers start by removing the marine growth from the Monitor's propeller.  But after all the delays they're in too much of a hurry. Over the course of the day, the divers successfully clean off the propeller.    The Navy team assembles a hydraulic dredge to clean out the turret, which is now filled with sand and debris. At first everything goes according to plan.  John Broadwater rendezvous with the two Navy divers.  They start the dredge. But the dredge is too powerful and could destroy whatever's inside the turret.  The divers abandon the attempt. For now the question of the Monitor's guns must remain a mystery. But it was heavy guns like these that created the need for iron warships. In 1860 the British Navy responds to this threat by building a huge new warship, the HMS Warrior.  Its hull is built entirely of iron.  And its main gun deck is further protected by 4 and a half inches of wrought iron armor.  Yet it still looks like a sailing ship.  Ericsson, true to form, takes a completely different approach. Ericsson's answer is the Monitor.  It's so unlike anything else he doesn't even call it a ship.  Instead he calls it "a sub-aquatic system of naval warfare."  It's the beginning of a new era. But the Confederates strike back, seizing the nation's most well-equipped shipyard at Norfolk, Virginia.  Retreating Union forces scuttle and burn several ships.  One of them is the steam frigate, USS Merrimac.  In the workshop of the Navy's model ship collection at the Naval Surface Warfare Center, Colan Ratliff examines plans for the Merrimac, the same plans that Confederate engineers begin pouring over in the early summer of 1861. Searching for a way to break the Northern blockade, the engineers hit upon an ingenious idea. With sloping armored sides, the Merrimack is transformed and renamed the Virginia. Scrambling for an iron ship of its own, the Navy turns to the man it has so long rejected.  John Ericsson suddenly finds himself with a contract to build the Monitor. Several of the iron plates with which Ericsson built his ship so rapidly have come loose.  When the deckplates are hoisted on board, their condition sends a chill through John Broadwater.   136 years ago these rusty remnants were state of the art technology. For the first time in naval history, the whole crew lives below the waterline.  With an eye on future Navy business, Ericsson furnishes the officers' quarters lavishly at his own expense.  He also installs more than 40 patentable devices, including a forced-air ventilation system and the first flushing toilets on a ship. William Keeler, the ship's paymaster, is immediately impressed.  To his wife, he writes "Yesterday, I saw my iron home for the first time." At times the two ships are just feet apart.  Each fires more than 20 accurate shots. But neither can pierce the other's armor.  After four hours, the two ships finally disengage, leaving no doubt that the future of war at sea belongs to iron ships. The effect on the Civil War is no less decisive. Like their predecessors who fought in the Monitor, these Navy divers sense that their moment has come.  Commander Murray prepares his team for the expedition's greatest challenge. The Navy team is now committed to a single objective
  recovering the Monitor's propeller.   The early dives go without a hitch. The first team positions a saw on the propeller's wrought-iron shaft. Another team attaches the nylon sling and liftbag that will bring the propeller to the surface.    But as they return to the ship, there's trouble.  One diver has reacted badly to the switch to pure oxygen.  Master Diver Denis orders them back onto air.  The pure oxygen used to speed up the decompression process has caused the diver's heart to race.  He could go into convulsions. Once in the chamber, both divers will go through the decompression process all over again. The incident has everyone on edge. Ninety minutes later diver Dowell emerges safely from the recompression chamber. And the incident has produced a hero. Despite near disaster, the team goes right back to work. At last the divers are blessed with near perfect conditions.  But they've never encountered 100 year-old wrought iron before.  There's no room for error. 5 dives are the most they've have done in day.  Today they've already done 6. And a half-cut shaft could jeopardize the whole propeller. It's time for a dramatic move. Running short of divers, Commander Murray takes a gamble. He decides to send 20-year veteran, Master Diver Donny Denis to the bottom.   If any one can make the cut in one dive he can. John Broadwater too heads back into the water. So the salvage veteran and the archaeologist head down together, each hoping this will be the decisive dive. They extend the dive from 30 to 40 minutes.  It's risky at this depth.  And still the work isn't done.  Commander Murray has only himself now to finish the job.  John Broadwater and Commander Murray have been planning this expedition for months.  Now everything hinges on one critical dive. Since dawn Commander Chris Murray has been sending his men over the side.  Seven sets of divers in all.  It's more than anyone can remember in a single day.  For the eighth time the stage is ready to go over the side.  Everyone prays that the notorious currents will remain slack for just one more dive. When the divers hit bottom, they find the job almost done.  A sudden surge has snapped the last few inches of the shaft. They call for the cable attached to the propeller to be raised. With just a slow tug on the winch the Monitor's historic propeller finally comes free. Darkness arrives quickly and with it a sudden storm. Meanwhile the propeller hangs in the dark ocean below.  Like some strange leviathan hooked from the deep. As preparations get underway to receive the propeller, there's still no guarantee of success.   For the first time in 136 years the Monitor's propeller breaks the surface.  But then the cable starts to swing. The newly freed propeller threatens to dash itself against the ship that has come to save it. But a sobered crew quickly attaches more tending lines.     For the entire team, it's a moment to savor. And all names are erased from the wall of shame The Monitor becomes an instant legend following its stunning success at Hampton Roads.  Would this be the fate of the original Monitor and her crew?  In December 1862, while being towed South, she runs into a storm off Cape Hatteras. In the early morning hours of December 31st, 1862, the Monitor with about a dozen men on board slips beneath the waves.  The stern weighed down by the engine and other machinery strikes the bottom first.   In the dark of night, a team of divers prepares for a dangerous expedition. Their journey will take them 60 miles offshore and a half century back in time. These divers have been exploring shipwrecks off the coast for years, but they've never heard of any submarine at this location. Not knowing how old the wreck is, or what nationality, they report it to the US Navy. What began with a fisherman's accident now starts these divers on a journey through the dark history of World War II. When they're through, part of the record of the 20th century's worst war will stand corrected, and families around the world will finally learn the truth about their lost loved ones. In December, 1941, German submarines U-boats depart on a secret mission. They cross the Atlantic undetected, and take up positions a few miles off the East Coast. Their target is the United States. Horst von Schroeter is Watch Officer on U-123.  	The German plan is code-named "Paukenschlag," or "Drumbeat." It calls for an all-out surprise attack on American merchant ships. At war for barely a month, few suspect German U-boats are lurking within sight of shore. The attack begins January 13, 1942. America is completely unprepared. January is just the beginning. The US Navy assures the public it has the U-boats under control. In 1942, at the height of Operation Drumbeat, the German U-boat seems almost unstoppable. But was this machine as effective as it seemed?  For six years, the group of divers that discovered the wreck has been trying to learn which U-boat it is. The team leader is professional diver John Chatterton. John's partners are Richard Kohler, a businessman, and John Yurga, also a professional diver. Every summer, these divers come here and search for artifacts, hoping one will identify the wreck. During the winters, they read and study blueprints, learning details about U-boats that will guide their diving. They do this work not for money, but out of stubborn curiosity. After six years, they still have no answer. The questions are simple, but finding answers means overcoming enormous obstacles. Every trip to the wreck takes eight hours. The divers leave at midnight to arrive by dawn. They average a half-dozen trips every summer. Their bodies can only tolerate two dives a day, and no more than 30 minutes on the bottom. At this depth, any mistake can be fatal.  Whitehead originally intends his torpedo to be launched from tubes on land. But this underwater guided missile turns out to be the perfect weapon for the stealthy submarine. In Germany, the commander of U-9, Otto Weddigen, becomes a new kind of hero
 the daring submariner, who can bring down the mighty British with this marvelous new machine. One of thousands of young Germans mesmerized by the exploits of Weddigen is Erich Topp. Weddigen's success is especially remarkable given the primitive nature of his vessel. U-9 is not very stealthy. Its engines emit clouds of smoke that can be seen for miles. It takes seven minutes to dive just 30 feet. But it only needs a crew of 24. And any weapon that lets 24 men take down thousands of the enemy is hard to resist. Germany quickly capitalizes on this unexpected success. By concentrating ships into a few large groups, convoys empty the oceans. Most U-boats now go days without spotting a target. If a U-boat does find a convoy, when it attacks it reveals its position to the escorts. After three years of war, the British finally adopt the convoy system. It is a smashing success. In 1917, U-boats sink 3,000 ships; in 1918, only 134 ships are lost in convoys. When Germany surrenders, the Allies confiscate all her U-boats. But as the world celebrates peace, one U-boat captain is sitting in a British prison camp, planning a response to the convoy. His name is Karl Dönitz, and he is already preparing for another submarine war. In less than twenty years the U-boat will be reborn. And once again, thousands of sailors on both sides will die in watery graves. Nor do German records mention any U-boat lost here. The identity of this boat will have to be found in the wreck itself. By the end of their first season the divers have learned little.Over the winter, they gather information to better focus their search. A U-boat veteran suggests looking for an escape lung—an emergency breathing device used to leave a sunken submarine. U-boat sailors often wrote their names on their escape lungs and a name might help identify the wreck. In dive after dive they sift through the debris and locate several escape lungs. The escape lungs prove disappointing. By now, the divers have been through most of the wreck without result. But there are two crucial areas they have yet to search. The electric motor room may hold the key. The divers have learned that boxes of spare parts stored here were often marked with tags bearing the U-boat's number. But reaching the electric motor room means passing through the diesel room. And the divers learned early on that the diesel motor room is perhaps the most dangerous place in the wreck. Having exhausted all other possibilities, the divers feel they have no choice. They will attempt the dangerous passage into the e-motor room. The plan is to enter the hatch, pass between the diesel motors, and continue into the electric motor room. At last the divers have a clue that narrows the field. For this wreck to be a Type IX is not surprising. The Type IX was a long range boat, used to patrol distant waters—off Africa or America. It is designed in the 1930s, as Germany starts to rearm. To overcome convoys Dönitz will use group attacks. Large numbers of U-boats will silently stalk convoys by day and swarm in at night for the kill. Dönitz calls this "the wolfpack." But Hitler doesn't wait for the boats to be built. On September 1, 1939, Hitler invades Poland. Two days later, England declares war on Germany. It takes a lot of nerve to attack on the surface. But Dönitz hammers home his message
 the way to win is to be daring. The U-boat men call this "the Happy Time."  A desperate Winston Churchill turns to America. The US Navy begins escorting British convoys carrying vital supplies. Six months before Pearl Harbor, America is fighting an undeclared war against the U-boats. He fires a torpedo at what he assumes to be a British destroyer. But the destroyer Topp has sunk is the USS Reuben James—technically, a neutral ship. It is a mistake Topp will never forget. Topp's tragic error might have had grave political repercussions. But five weeks later it doesn't matter. America enters the war anyway. Two days after the Japanese attack Pearl Harbor, Hitler declares war on the US without consulting his navy. Dönitz has only five U-boats available. But he wants to attack as quickly as possible, before the Americans have a chance to organize convoys. But weeks become months, and still there are no convoys. As the sinkings mount, the British press the US to protect its coastal shipping with convoys. But Navy commander Admiral Ernest King refuses. With a two-ocean war to fight and much of his fleet sunk at Pearl Harbor, King simply doesn't have enough escort ships. Defending cargo ships isn't King's only problem. He also has to worry about American troops sailing for England. Even as U-boats are sinking hundreds of merchant ships, the navy escorts over 150,000 American troops across the Atlantic. Not one is lost. By May, five months after Operation Drumbeat began, King finally has enough escort ships to begin coastal convoys. The U-boats pull back into the Atlantic. Drumbeat is the U-boats' greatest victory of the entire war, but in the end it accomplishes little. Never again will large groups of U-boats attack the US. But until the last day of the war, single boats continue to come right up to our doorstep—lone wolves on the prowl. While down at the wreck one of the divers, Steve Feldman, becomes unconscious and is swept away. Breathing air at extreme depths can cause confusion, called "narcosis," as well as seizures. There is an alternative called "trimix"—a blend of nitrogen, helium and less oxygen than air. But trimix is untested in recreational diving. For safety reasons, the divers experiment with trimix. But they quickly discover safety is not its only benefit. Better vision and longer dives make a difference. Searching the crew's quarters, John Chatterton discovers what appears to be an ordinary table knife. But on closer look, it seems he may have found exactly what they have been looking for. At last the divers have learned the identity of a crewman. Someone on the mystery U-boat was named Horenburg. Whoever Horenburg may have been, he was one of 45,000 men who served in U-boats. Allied propaganda portrayed them as fanatical Nazis, but this was more myth than reality. Most were in their teens or early twenties, and had started out full of romantic notions of adventure at sea. Not all were volunteers. But theirs was a service with a mystique. Newsreels made with actual combat footage were used to glorify the U-boats. But the newsreels never told the terrible truth about the odds of survival. Nearly 70% of the men who went to sea in U-boats died in them. Some 28,000 men shared the same fate as Horenburg. To learn more about Horenburg, John and Richie travel to Germany. They take their evidence to the U-boat Archive in Altenbruch, run by U-boat veteran Horst Bredow Bredow's archive is the most complete source of information in the world concerning Germany's U-boats and the men who sailed them. Bredow's records include a file on each boat, as well as a list of all the men who died in U-boats. Remarkably, Bredow finds there was only one man named Horenburg in the entire U-boat service. His first name was Martin. It turns out that Martin Horenburg served on several U-boats. The boat he died on was U-869. But according to Bredow 869 cannot be the mystery wreck. The record shows that U-869 was sunk off North Africa, near the entrance to the Mediterranean Sea. What seemed to be the most promising of leads has been no help at all.  The more the divers learn about this wreck, the more enigmatic it becomes. Aside from its identity, one of the most puzzling questions is how it met its end. To find out more about what might have sunk the U-boat, John Chatterton shows a videotape of the damage to US Navy underwater demolition experts. According to the Navy, depth charges would not cause damage this severe. They suggest the boat was sunk by something more powerful than a depth charge—perhaps a torpedo. But whose torpedo? If a U-boat crew suspected their own torpedo was circling back, their only hope for escape would be an emergency dive. To make an 1100-ton boat vanish, a complex series of events must unfold with precise timing. In the diesel motor room, the crew shuts off the diesels and closes the air intakes. Now the electric motors take over. For the scuba diver, submerging is also complex. As with a U-boat, diving and surfacing require careful precise timing. Inside the wreck, something goes terribly wrong. He remains trapped for nearly 30 minutes. Then his father goes in looking for him. But by now they are running out of air and they cannot locate their spare tanks. But a diver at 230 feet cannot just surface. Under pressure, his breathing forces more gas into his body than it can hold on the surface. At depth, his blood is now like the soda in an unopened bottle. In their panic the father and son come up without decompressing. Their bodies are still saturated with inert gas. No longer under pressure, this gas begins bubbling out of their blood. Three divers have now died on the U-boat. John Yurga is starting to wonder if the risk of continuing is simply too great. The following week, John and Richie go back to the wreck to shoot video and analyze what went wrong. The tragedy brings another dive season to a close. Over the winter the team will regroup. Three more years of diving and research follow. But still they are no closer to finding the answer. Each has his own reason for continuing. For Richie, it is a sense of responsibility to the families of the lost crew. But for John Chatterton, it is the challenge of solving the mystery, finishing what he has begun. Now, in the spring of 1997, John Chatterton comes up with a daring plan to get into the electric motor room, where there may be boxes of spare parts that can identify the U-boat. Tomorrow morning, John Chatterton, with thousands of hours underwater, will make the most dangerous dive of his life. If John's plan works, he will soon enter a place unseen and untouched since the day the U-boat sank. Finally, John appears. Pinned down by a piece of wreckage, John is lucky to escape with his life. The next morning, John tries again. With John past the obstruction, Richie hands him the camera. After six years, and three deaths, the divers have finally identified the mystery wreck
 U-869. One of America's most important resources is science. At universities and research centers scientific teams are developing new technologies to hunt U-boats. One focus of the scientific effort is radar. Since the 1930s, German scientists have also been working on radar. Though aware of this work, Dönitz fails to appreciate the magnitude of the threat. Beyond radar, Dönitz's greatest miscalculation is his obsessive use of radio. He sends some boats as many as 70 messages a day. The constant radio traffic exposes the U-boats to Allied high-frequency direction finding, or "huff duff." If a U-boat uses its radio, huff duff can pinpoint its position, using triangulation. Together, radar and huff duff force the U-boats to submerge. And a submerged U-boat is too slow to catch a target. It is also too slow to escape. The ships above are hunting it with sound. All the men can do is remain silent. When an escort locates a U-boat the depth-charging begins. Slowly, but inexorably, the Allies are gaining the upper hand. The turning point comes in a single month the U-boat men will forever remember as "Black May." Coming back is getting harder and harder to do. Even at night or in dense fog, an airplane with radar can detect a U-boat on the surface. Strangely, U-boat Command has long ignored a Dutch device that allows a submarine to remain submerged. The schnorkel is a mast that can be raised like a periscope. It sucks fresh air into the boat for the diesels and the crew, and vents poisonous exhaust out. A true submarine has long been the dream of Professor Hellmuth Walter. Since the 1930s, he has been working on a turbine that runs off hydrogen peroxide, H2O2. Since this fuel contains its own oxygen, the engine needs no outside air. For underwater speed, he uses a highly streamlined hull. But the Type 21s aren't ready until the last week of the war. The Type 21 U-boat will redefine the future of the submarine. But it has no effect on the outcome of the war for which it is designed. In the end, the German U-boat is decisively defeated. Still, the U-boat threat has tied down Allied resources in the Atlantic that could otherwise bring the war to Germany. To satisfy Hitler, the U-boat crews are deliberately sacrificed. In the closing months of the war, the life expectancy of a U-boat man is barely 60 days, yet Dönitz keeps sending them out. But even the most optimistic U-boat man might have hesitated to go out had he known the greatest secret of the U-boat war. The Allies have broken the German code. By decoding Dönitz's radio messages, they know where each U-boat is headed even before it gets there. Some U-boat commanders suspect the Allies are reading their messages, but they cannot convince Dönitz. The Allied codebreaking, called Ultra, is one of the greatest secrets of World War II. At the time, Ultra enabled ASW forces to track and hunt down individual U-boats. Today, Ultra can help NOVA piece together the story of U-869's last patrol. U-boat Command is now expecting 869 to arrive off Gibraltar by February 1st. But she never acknowledges her new orders. The codebreakers wonder if perhaps 869 missed the signal, and is continuing to her original assignment off New York. Bredow is not easily convinced. He has a hard time believing his records are wrong. Half a century after she vanished without a trace, the final resting place of U-869 is now a matter of record. But questions about U-869 linger. Why she missed the message redirecting her to Gibraltar and what caused her to sink will always remain mysteries. Seaman Otto Brizius would have had his twentieth birthday in February, 1945, right around the time that 869 sank. Otto is picked for the U-boats when he is barely seventeen. He never returns. The family is told only that Otto was lost off Gibraltar. That is what Barbara still believes. Out of the 57 men assigned to U-869, one was saved by a twist of fate. For most of us, World War II exists only in photographs and moving pictures, distant in time and place. But the cost of the war is still being paid today...by survivors..by relatives of those who lost their lives...by those who were only children at the time...and by some who were not even born when the storm was raging. Hidden in the mists of the South Pacific on one of the most remote islands on earth is a mystery locked in stone.  Giant human forms stand against the weathering of time.  These are the mute sentinels of Easter Island, stone statues called moai.  Roughly 900 moai were carved over a period of 500 years, hewn with stone tools from the volcanic rock of an ancient crater.  No one knows how the many ton statues came to stand at their sacred sites.  How could an isolated culture with only the simplest tools move monoliths from the quarry to sacred platform sites scattered all over the island - some of them five miles away?  Legend says the statues magically walked to their venerated platforms.  To penetrate beyond the myths, NOVA assembles a team of archaeologists, engineers, and the Easter Islanders themselves.  Together they launch a series of hands-on experiments to explore the methods used by the ancients.  But no one anticipates the events that unfold. Ideas clash. Tensions escalate as new methods are presented. Resources run out, just as they did in ancient times. This is the legacy of Easter Island, a culture that exhausted itself in moving giant stone.  How did this ancient society achieve such monolithic greatness?  And why did it fall? Around 400 AD, Polynesian voyagers set out across the open sea in search of new land.  It is believed they sailed a large double canoe made of wood and rope lashings.  Their journey took them thousands of miles across the Pacific until, by chance, they came upon the rugged coastline of a solitary, uninhabited island.  Easter Island, now known as "Rapa Nui."  Today, treeless, wind-swept land rises from an infinite sea.  Just seven miles across, Easter Island is studded with volcanic craters which provide the raw material for the stone sculptures of the past.  For 1200 years, the island culture thrived in isolation.  The population may have reached as much as 10,000.  It was a closed society.  As far as is known, nobody came to the island, and nobody ever left.  There was no recorded history, and all that remains is a thin thread of oral tradition that has passed down through generations.  We do know the ancient islanders feverishly expressed themselves in stone.  According to island folklore, the moai are the spirits of powerful ancestors.  They were raised on platforms, called "ahu," which were the centers for ancestral worship among the island's clans.  But as population grew on the tiny island, conflict erupted between the clans.  Food and timber were scarce.  The people stripped the landscape of its once abundant trees.  Today only thin soils and exposed pastures survive.  Could it be that this remote civilization ultimately destroyed itself over the moving and raising of their sacred moai?  For decades theorists have come to the island to try their hand at moving moai.  In 1955, Norwegian archaeologist Thor Heyerdahl tried to drag a nine ton moai on a small tree fork over the ground.  The pulling method worked, but dragging a heavy statue is likely to damage the carved stone.  Heyerdahl returned in 1986, inspired by Rapa Nui folklore.  Legends say that the human statues walked across the island to their ahu platforms through a spiritual power called "mana."  Heyerdahl tried walking the nine ton statue by rocking it forward like a refrigerator.  Although it works, the method is precarious on anything but level terrain.   Thousands of tourists come to gaze upon the stone giants and wonder how the Rapa Nui people moved and erected them.  Dr. Claudio Cristino has been Easter Island's resident archaeologist for the past 20 years. He takes Wyoming architect Vince Lee to the largest ahu on the island.  It was one of the ceremonial centers on the east coast.  In 1960, a tidal wave struck the ahu and washed the 15 massive moai inland.  Claudio was in charge of restoring the site. Vince's expertise is Inca stone work.  He has explored how the Incas moved heavy stones, and is intrigued by Rapa Nui ingenuity. Even Vince and Claudio have trouble imagining how an ancient culture could have carved, transported, and erected such mighty stones without the aid of modern technology. Archaeologist Jo Anne Van Tilburg is here to test her theory of how the moai were moved.  For 15 years she has searched for the cultural significance encoded in the moai. But with no written record left behind, and only limited clues from archaeology, the question of how the Easter Islanders moved their moai remains elusive. Jo Anne has measured the height, width, and estimated weight of each moai on Easter Island.  Her inventory of measurements created a digital model of a statistically average moai.  The computer data helps Jo Anne and robotics expert Zvi Shiller formulate their theory on how the ancients moved the statues.  By digitizing a topographical map of Easter Island, Zvi simulates the undulating terrain.  This virtual fly-through shows them a view of the island from the perspective of a moai in transit. From this digital model, a full scale replica will be made for experiments on the island.  Jo Anne proposes laying the statue on a triangular shaped sled and then pulling the moai and sled over logs that roll along wood tracks.  Our team of experts has gathered on the island to put their theories to the test. They will first try Jo Anne's log roller method. Claudio will be in charge of raising the moai. Vince is the only member of the group who has explored how another ancient culture, the Incas, moved heavy stone. While engineer Zvi Shiller has simulated moai transportation on his computer, he's here to see if his solutions will work in the real world. Rafael Rapu, a Rapa Nui sculptor, will be the foreman for the project.  Jo Anne's architect husband, Jan, demonstrates Jo Anne's moai moving method.  A triangular A-frame sled will be placed on logs that will roll over rails. They have their method.  Now they need a moai.  A concrete mixture of sand and stone from the island is poured into a fiberglass mold scaled up from Jo Anne's digital model.  It is as close as the team can get to using a moai without risking damage to an actual statue.  Three days later the nine and a half ton concrete moai is ready to be lifted out of its curing pit. Even with the aid of a crane, the moai is an unwieldy object. Chain saw surgery frees the moai from its fiberglass mask.  From a digital computer image to a concrete facsimile, this moai is the culmination of years of Jo Anne's research. More than half of Easter Island's moai are still at the quarry, known as Rano Raraku.  It is a mountain of hardened volcanic ash. Here, the moai lie in various stages of production
 some half carved, some on their backs, as if sliding down the quarry slope, and others buried from carving debris and erosion.  Rafael Rapu comes from a long line of Rapa Nui carvers.  He takes local sculptor Santi Hito to the high slopes of the quarry to explain the techniques used by the ancient carvers.  They sculpted moai from the bedrock using a stone tool called a "toki."  The largest moai on the island, named "El Gigante," the giant, was never finished.  Its partially-carved figure provides a glimpse into how the moai were carved. Continuing the tradition of Rapa Nui master carvers, Rafael passes on the oral history to Santi. Rafael explains that first, channels were carved around the body of a moai. The channels reached around and eventually formed a boat-like keel until the statue could be snapped off and fully extracted. At the base of the quarry slope, the moai were erected in prepared holes so the carving could be finished. The replica moai is brought in by truck and crane to the transport site.  A traditional Polynesian ceremony, called an "umu tahu," is held.  The priest's blessing acknowledges that working around a multi-ton statue can be dangerous. Jo Anne's A-frame sled is ready for the moai.  Its unique triangular shape is proportioned exactly for the statue.  The team will try to pull the entire rig 100 yards on flat terrain using Jo Anne's log roller system.  The logs should roll over this track of thin wood rails. Jo Anne confers with Niko Haoa, who is in charge of the Rapa Nui pulling team.  He rehearses his commands before they begin. Surprisingly, the logs don't roll.  They slide over the rails. The hardest part is overcoming the inertia of nine and a half tons.  Then, the sled slides easily.  This novel solution exploits rope lashings and wood crossbeams that are common in traditional Polynesian culture. The people of the Pacific are intimately tied to the ocean.  In ancient times, outrigger canoes were the vital link between islands.  The outriggers have two beams that extend from the side of the canoe to prevent it from capsizing.  The larger voyaging canoes were simply two hulls bound together by wood crossbeams and rope lashings.  Jo Anne's theory is that the same sea-going technology was used for transporting moai across land. The Polynesians made wooden ladders to aid in carrying canoes up on shore.  The crossbeams of this ladder are lashed onto long rails, just like the rollers lashed to the sled for the moai. Each group of statues was raised on a long rectangular platform - or ahu.  According to island belief, the ahu elevate the ancestral spirits part way between earth and sky.  Most ahu platforms are along the coast.  The moai face inland, their backs to the sea.  To have the moai facing inland on its ahu, the team resorts to modern machinery.  Now they have to reposition the statue face down and then rotate it 180 degrees.  Vince explains why. Now repositioned face down, the moai is rotated, but not with the tools of the ancients. Vince wonders how the islanders moved the giant statues up to the ahu platforms that line the coast.  He doubts Jo Anne's pulling method, since there is no space for long lines of people on ropes behind the high ahu platforms. Vince has been given one day, a half-carved stone of Rafael's, and a few leftover materials to put his new idea to practice.  His sled is designed for levering a moai forward when there is no room for long lines of people pulling on ropes. The crossbeams act as leverage points for the men to push against. Vince's side experiment is beginning to raise the temperature and turn the archaeologists and engineers from critics to advocates of their own theories. Could similar arguments have divided the ancient stone movers? And did the early islanders fight over the politics of moving sacred stone?  During the 1600s, life on Easter Island was in crisis.  The island had become overpopulated with thousands of people, all competing for the dwindling supply of food.  Warfare broke out.  And in the ensuing power struggle, there was growing rivalry to carve larger statues to appropriate the spiritual power of "mana." Resources were quickly disappearing.  The last precious trees were cut down, as the demand for timber to raise and transport moai escalated. Ancestral statues were knocked down by the warring factions.  In time, the population would all but disappear.  The great civilization of Easter Island had collapsed.  A fallen moai lies beside a stone ramp leading to an ahu platform.  Claudio walks along the back wall.  This ahu, abandoned in mid construction, shows how the islanders moved their moai onto the elevated platforms. Ramps were made from the limitless supply of lava rock scattered all over the island.  Ascending the stone incline, a moai would finally arrive at its high pedestal stone, which often overlooked the sea. At the beginning of another day of testing Jo Anne's moai transport theories, Vince surveys the ramp that was made for the experiments. Today's goal will be to transport the moai up the ramp which is paved with laterally placed logs.  They start on flat terrain in front of the ramp.  More logs are brought in and placed in position like the ties of a trackless railroad bed.  It takes a lot of trees to make a wood road just 30 yards in length.  It seems plausible that the trees of the island could disappear altogether in the act of moving sacred stone.  Thick palm forests blanketed the island when the first settlers arrived.  Pollen analysis shows that a species of palm, strong enough to move moai, called jubea chilensis, once flourished here.  In their escalating efforts to move and raise giant statues, the islanders cut down the last of their trees.  Long before the first Europeans arrived in 1726, the island had been stripped bare. Not one jubea chilensis palm tree remains today.  Could it have been the obsession with erecting giant statues that led to Easter Island's ecological and social catastrophe?   The next day the team faces the challenge of moving the moai the last six feet to the pedestal stone.  Jo Anne's team will now test a different method that gives extra mechanical advantage to the moai movers. The team has been reduced to 20 people. With a smaller workforce, it has taken an entire day to move the final six feet.  The last few days of experiments have led Jo Anne to conclude that there may have been more than one method for moving moai. Many moai on Easter Island had top knots, known as "pukao," placed on their heads.  They are thought to signify the headdresses that Rapa Nui chiefs wore.  Red cylindrical pukao lie near the fallen moai all over the island, and they were carved from this ancient quarry of red scoria stone. Rafael carves an authentic pukao for the replica moai.  He uses a basalt toki, the tool used by the ancient sculptors to carve island stone.  Rafael passes on the age-old technique to Santi. Rapa Nui society supported specialist craftsmen.  The master carvers held an elevated status in the community. The team must now figure out how to raise the moai.  They use levers to lift the load inch by inch while stones are carefully placed underneath.  Slowly the moai will be jacked up to a vertical position.  The pukao is now ready to be added to the load.  Not all moai had pukao, and we don't know how the islanders raised them onto the statues.  The Rapa Nui men devise a simple pulley system for rolling the one ton pukao up the short ramp. Pukao and moai will now be joined together by rope and secured for the raising. Claudio is the archaeologist in charge of the raising.  He hopes the moai will be raised in one day. The work takes on its own rhythm.  And a steady stream of ideas come from the onlooking experts.  The pile of rocks jacking up the moai gradually grows higher.  Zvi measures the team's progress by calculating the moai's angle of incline. They are using the same instrument, but somehow cannot agree on the angle. With a growing rock pile to clamber over, the men find the work tricky and the moai unstable.  Zvi becomes even more interested in their rate of progress. There are now fewer levering positions on the 12-foot pile of rocks for the 20-man workforce.  They must all find a place on just three levers.  And with the daylight fading, the work will have to continue in the morning. The work is soon stopped.  Zvi's obsession with the angle gets beyond Claudio's patience.  It is a simple misunderstanding.  Great efforts will often bring out great passions.  Time, effort, and resources are all at play in this arena of larger-than-life stone-moving.  It is a delicate moment that must be played out with brute force.  Claudio and Rafael watch for signs of twisting. We may never know how the moai were moved or raised, but by a revealing stroke of fate the methods tested here have taught us as much about ourselves as about the ancient Rapa Nui. For millennia, China marched to a different drummer from the rest of the world.  Often reaching its own solution to a common problem - using chopsticks for eating, and simplified pictures for writing.  Bridge building is yet another example.  The Chinese invented suspension bridges using iron chains 1400 years before the Europeans. Until the experts can get inside the heads of the ancient builders, all that's coming out of theirs is hot air. In a land laced with waterways, China's bridges were created out of necessity.  But they grew into a glorious union of engineering and art with the power to still stir the emotions. Surrounded by mountains, oceans and deserts, China's vast empire was separated from the rest of the world throughout much of her history.  The Italian merchant Marco Polo was the first foreigner to leave a record of his experiences in China.  He arrived in1275, at the end of a dynamic era called the Song dynasty.  China's economy was booming and the population was growing rapidly.  Marco Polo was flabbergasted by the size and wealth of Song dynasty cities, with populations approaching a million people or more.  This far exceeded anything he had experienced back home, where Europe was just emerging from the Dark Ages. China's fortunes have always been linked to its rivers, the Yangtze and the Yellow, which bisect the empire.  To connect these great rivers, an elaborate system of canals was constructed from north to south.  Historian Robin Yates. Although they improved the flow of goods, all these waterways were a huge impediment to foot traffic.  To solve this problem, the Song government needed to find a way to quickly build hundreds of bridges.  To permit boat traffic to flow freely, a single span was required.  Arches had always been constructed from stone, which is durable, but  expensive and time consuming. Most buildings in China were made of timber, so wood was clearly an alternative for mass producing bridges.  But wooden beams are straight, and arches are curved.  Chinese carpenters had already solved the puzzle of using timber beams to form elegantly curved roofs and Professor Tang believes Song engineers possessed similar ingenuity.  The scroll of the famous Rainbow Bridge was painted during the Song dynasty, so perhaps this was when the problem of creating arched bridges from straight timbers was also solved.  Professor Tang is both an engineer and a bridge historian.  He dismisses any thought that the bridge was just an artist's fanciful idea. After years of trying to figure out how it was designed and constructed, finally, with NOVA's help, Professor Tang will have the opportunity to bring the Rainbow Bridge back to life in the town of Jinze, just outside of Shanghai.  Jinze already has a Song dynasty bridge - it's made of stone.  Professor Tang thinks perhaps a Rainbow Bridge once stood in its place. But like the hundreds of wooden bridges built by the Song engineers, it was eventually replaced by arches of stone.  Halfway around the globe, Professor Tang's Rainbow Bridge is beginning to intrigue another bridge builder.  Bashar Altabba is a structural engineer working on Boston's Big Dig.  NOVA has asked Bashar to help build the Rainbow Bridge in China. In his course on bridge structures at MIT, he now includes analysis of the Rainbow Bridge. Is it a beam structure or is it an arch?  The problem of how to categorize the Rainbow Bridge is very confusing. This is not just an academic question.  The foundations needed to support an arched bridge are quite different from those of a beam bridge.  The job of a bridge is to transmit the weight of its load, be it pedestrians or vehicles, to the foundations on either bank.  Beams bend under tension, and arches are compressed.  While compression is a more efficient method for transmitting a load, arch bridges require very substantial foundations.  The puzzle facing Bashar is that the Rainbow Bridge is made of beams, but has the form of an arch, so what kind of foundations will it need?  With Bashar about to leave for China, a more pressing problem is coming up with a method to erect the bridge. Also traveling to China is Marcus Brandt, a timber framer from Pennsylvania.  Marcus is an expert in using traditional techniques for building large wooden structures. Marcus and Bashar are meeting today in order to finalize a construction plan that meets the requirements of the bridge site in China. The solution is to preassemble the bridge in two halves on the riverbank. Leonardo da Vinci once said that an arch consists of two weaknesses which, leaning on each other, become a strength. The town of Jinze is enjoying a major Buddhist festival hosted by the local monastery.  The first member of the bridge building team to arrive here is Robin Yates. The festival also celebrates the restoration of the oldest bridge in the town. Marcus and Bashar arrive in Jinze with the town in a party mood.  But Bashar is anxious to get started, and he quickly puts together a model to demonstrate the plan for deploying the bridge from the banks. Chen Fu Xiang is in charge of the construction crew, and neither he nor Professor Tang believes there's enough room on the banks to prefabricate the bridge in two halves.  This is disappointing news to Marcus and Bashar, who want their role to be more than back seat driving. Robin is also disappointed with the site of the Rainbow Bridge, because he thinks it has not been aligned in accordance with the ancient Chinese principles of fengshui.  To check if his suspicions are correct, Robin employs another Song dynasty invention. In addition to having bad fengshui, Bashar is worried that the bridge may also have bad foundations because the workers are not building them according to plan. Work on the foundation begins when wooden pilings are driven into the subsoil.  Granite blocks are then placed on the pilings.  The abutments require several layers of stone, each tied into the layer above by vertical blocks to make one interlocking mass of masonry.  But in order to speed up work, the stone masons simply laid the top layer on the one below, omitting a critical step
 cutting a row of L-shaped blocks to lock together the top two layers. Without L-shaped stones locking the top layer to the masonry below, Bashar worries that the bridge could do the splits. Bashar is so agitated because computer modeling of the Rainbow Bridge performed just before he left Boston convinced him that the structure has all the characteristics of an arch. If this is correct, strong abutments are needed to counteract the outward push of the arch when it's loaded. While Bashar frets over the problem of fixing the abutments, Professor Tang has come up with a new idea for erecting the bridge.  He'll assemble it piece by piece over the river.  Two boats will act as platforms for workers connecting the beams over water. Scaffolding and an ancient lifting device known as an A-frame, or sheer legs, are put in position. Marcus, an expert rigger, is extremely concerned about the security of the stakes and rope that will anchor the A-frames. Once in position, the A-frame will support the beams cantilevering out from either bank.  The first arch of the Rainbow Bridge consists of three sets of beams. The horizontal beams in the middle lock the arch in place. Interwoven with the blue three-sided arch is the red four-sided arch. Combined, the two arches should make a very strong bridge.  At least that's Professor Tang's theory.  As part of his plan to build the bridge one beam at a time, Professor Tang has come up with an ingenious idea.  Like a tailor pinning his cloth before he sews the seam, Professor Tang will use iron nails for holding the beams in place. Everyone agrees that for safety, the iron clinch nails are essential to stabilize the emerging structure. But with the first beams in place, Professor Tang points out a detail in the scroll which appears to show that the timbers were also lashed together. A thousand years ago, the lashing materials could have been hemp rope, or something that's very widely used in China
 bamboo. The problem with the strips of bamboo on hand is that they are too short for making a good lashing. In order to learn more about how to make bamboo rope, Marcus and Robin travel to the Yellow Mountains, 200 miles away.  Bamboo is actually a grass, and no other living plant grows as fast.  It can reach its full height in just 60 to 90 days.  And the Chinese use bamboo for everything, from musical instruments to scaffolding to food. In a neighboring village, these strips are turned into samples of thick bamboo rope.  Joining Marcus and Bashar is Andrew Li, an expert in Song dynasty building techniques from The Chinese University of Hong Kong. The cable consists of two parts.  The core is made of strips from the tougher outer part of the bamboo plant, while the more pliable strips from the inner layers are woven into a sheath which surrounds the core.  As Professor Tang remembers, before being replaced by steel 25 years ago, all the cables in the An Lan suspension bridge were made from bamboo. More primitive suspension bridges also employed bamboo rope.  From the braided main cables hung a thinner variety of rope for carrying the walkway.  And it is this small diameter rope that interests Marcus and Bashar, because it looks suitable for lashing together the beams of the Rainbow Bridge. It is made by spinning fine strips of bamboo and then plying together two strands of it.  To test out the strength of this bamboo rope, Marcus and Bashar will build a primitive suspension bridge.  Its design is based on a bridge Professor Tang saw in the Himalayas as a young man.  Because the bridge must span a 60-foot wide river, Bashar wants the thin ropes for the walkway to be attached to the main suspension cables on dry land. Although prefabricating the bridge seemed like a good idea, somewhere in the process of manhandling the two main cables, the multitude of smaller connecting ropes have gotten hopelessly entangled. In the confusion, Professor Tang keels over.  But fortunately nothing is damaged, except Bashar's pride. As tempers fray, Bashar suspects that some of his instructions are getting lost in translation. So he insists that Andrew be replaced by a local translator. Three hours later the faulty rolling and wrapping problem is finally untangled.  But before work can proceed, Marcus calls for time out. With the suspension cables anchored at both ends, Marcus uses a device called a Spanish windlass to start raising them. Wooden piers hold the main suspension cables high above the river, enabling Marcus to get a sense of how strong bamboo rope can be. The suspension bridge managed to support 12 people, convincing Marcus that bamboo rope was strong enough for lashing together the heavy beams of the Rainbow Bridge. But then an unexpected problem arises. A leak in one of the boats that supports the scaffolding threatens to bring production to a halt.  They bale furiously, and despite having to manhandle 200 pound beams on top of a listing platform, the builders push forward with erecting the arch. The firecrackers appear to be doing their job, because Professor Tang and the bridge builders successfully conclude the first phase of construction - erecting the skeleton of the three-sided arch. To celebrate, the team does something the Song builders might have done a millennium ago. What was fueling the growth of lively restaurant-filled cities during the Song dynasty?  Robin believes it had a lot to do with rice. The thriving economy enabled the Song government to embark on ambitious improvements to the transportation system.  Bashar visits one of the best surviving examples
 the almost mile and a half long An Ping bridge.  It was built from massive granite beams to permit travel across a tidal estuary in Fujian province. As in the piers of the bridge, granite works best in compression, so Song engineers were really pushing the envelope when they used it in tension for the beams.  To demonstrate the risk of using stone beams in bridges, Bashar compares how wood and stone behave when put under tension.  While wooden beams bend when overloaded, stone gives no warning when it's about to fail. It also limited river traffic.  In order to create longer spans and allow larger boats to pass through, Chinese engineers had to master the art of a more sophisticated structure
 the arch.  The trouble with semicircular arch bridges is the hump, which makes it awkward for all but pedestrians to cross. In 600 AD, Chinese engineers solved this problem by flattening out the hump and coming up with a radical new concept for an arch.  When constructed, the Anji bridge had the longest span of any arch in the world. And it would take another eight centuries before such a daring design was attempted in the west. To demonstrate the need for strong abutments at either end of the arch, Bashar and Marcus have set up an experiment. A car jack is placed between the arch and the abutment. As the jack is released, the powerful outward thrust produced by the two sides of the arch is clearly demonstrated. Despite the strong forces to self-destruct generated by this type of arch, the Anji is China's oldest standing bridge.  Back on the construction site, the Rainbow Bridge is beginning to take shape.  In order to continue its metamorphosis from beam to arch, the poles of the four-sided arch must be interlaced with those of the three-sided arch. Tom Peters is head of the department of architecture at The Chinese University of Hong Kong, and an old friend of Professor Tang.  He's never seen this kind of construction before. Professor Tang's technique to get the beams kissing is to force them together with a steel bolt.  A modern shortcut, it upsets Bashar, because he feels that bending the beam in that way could weaken the wood. Marcus, with his hands-on knowledge of timber framing, has always argued that some of the beams in the arch still behave like beams
 that is, they bend. As always, Professor Tang has a surprise up his sleeve.  He takes Robin deep in the mountains southwest of Shanghai to see a bridge.  From a distance, it bears no resemblance to the Rainbow Arch in the scroll.  But from underneath, it has an uncanny similarity to the structure that is taking shape in Jinze. Professor Tang tells Robin that although many details of the design are different, he's convinced that this isolated bridge is a later, improved version of the Rainbow Arch portrayed in the Song dynasty painting.  In fact, up until the 20th century, Chinese architecture changed very little. This is because the Song government produced a building code that standardized the design of all official buildings - a subject of special interest to Andrew Li. A system that also solved the problem of creating curved structures from straight beams.  While a triangular truss dictates the straight pitch of roofs in the west, Chinese roofs are curved because of the arrangement of columns and beams which support it.  Chinese carpenters could produce a roof of any size or curvature simply by adjusting the lengths and widths of these posts and crossbeams. Back in Jinze, the rainbow curve is beginning to emerge from interweaving the beams of the three- and four-sided arches. Next the decking will be nailed to the curved timbers that reduce the steep incline at either end of the arch.  The approach ramps create what is called a reverse curve, an architectural form that is particularly pleasing to Professor Tang. Before the bridge is open to the public, Professor Tang organizes a demonstration to show his confidence in the strength of the design. Four tons of water buffalo have no perceptible effect, and the bridge is declared ready for the masses. Knights in shining armor charging each other in great pitched battles - that is the popular view of warfare in the Middle Ages.  In reality, most medieval conflict involved the attacking of castles, and mounted knights were not much use against stone walls.  A siege against a castle could take weeks, even months - the attacking army pitted against a well-defended garrison within.  By the end of the 13th century, the science of defensive architecture had reached a peak.  Stone walls were built thicker and taller than ever before.  And archers could easily pick off advancing attackers.  To further frustrate attempts at breaching the walls, castles were situated on rocky crags, or surrounded by water.  But every advance in castle defense drove attackers to devise better siege weapons. 200 years before cannon appeared in Europe, chroniclers make reference to what appears to be the ultimate 13th century siege weapon - an ingenious new form of heavy artillery that flung huge stone balls with such destructive power that castle walls were reduced to rubble.  But no ancient weapon of this type has survived.  Were such claims gross exaggerations, or did such a weapon really exist?  To answer these questions, NOVA brings together a team of experts in medieval warfare who believe they know the secret. Their task - to build siege machines capable of destroying a castle wall at a range of about 200 yards. With just two weeks to meet the challenge, a siege mentality quickly sets in.  No modern builders have ever managed to do this before. In the year 1304, Edward Longshanks, more formally known as King Edward I of England, mounted the greatest siege of his reign against the Scots and their castle at Stirling.  The attack dragged on.  Impatient for victory, Edward ordered 50 carpenters to immediately begin building a monstrous new weapon - so powerful it would breach the strong walls of Stirling Castle. Details about the weapon design are tantalizingly vague, except that it was nicknamed Warwolf, and its appearance outside the walls terrified the garrison. Was it the atomic bomb of the Middle Ages?  With one blow, Warwolf leveled a section of wall, successfully concluding the siege of Stirling Castle.  What kind of a weapon was Warwolf?  Hew Kennedy is a Shropshire landowner and medieval armor expert.  10 years ago, he became intrigued by a picture of a machine drawn by Leonardo da Vinci.  It appeared to be a device for throwing dead horses, called a trebuchet.  Inspired by the power of a machine that could hurl such heavy missiles, Hew decided to try building one himself—a quest which eventually led to this piano-flinging contraption, a mechanized catapult made from a laminated beam, scrap metal, telephone poles and steel cable.  In essence, a trebuchet is a giant seesaw with a very heavy weight at one end and a much lighter missile attached to the other.  As the heavier weight drops, the lighter projectile is whipped by its sling towards the enemy.  Hew is convinced that Warwolf, Edward's great wall busting siege engine, must have been a trebuchet. To test out Hew's confidence in the destructive capability of a medieval trebuchet, NOVA is preparing some hard sandstone balls weighing 250 pounds - and a wall.  It's made of sandstone and lime mortar.  In construction and design, it is based on the upper section of a typical castle wall of the 13th century.  Hew wants to build a trebuchet capable of knocking it down, but at a range of 200 yards, it will require precision as well as brute force.  Michael Prestwich, a medieval historian, will ensure that Hew's next trebuchet will be based on an authentic 13th century design. Some of the best military engineers were employed by Edward I - a master of military tactics.  He was one of the most vicious and single-minded rulers of his time.  Soon after ascending the throne in 1274, Edward decided to squash Welsh independence and bring Wales under his personal rule. Edward's strategy was to ring the mountain stronghold of the Welsh prince with a chain of powerful castles.  Richard Holmes is an historian of military tactics. Edward and other English lords designed their Welsh strongholds with the trebuchet in mind.  For example, Caerphilly Castle was surrounded by manmade lakes which kept a besieging army and their siege weapons at a distance. At the end of the 13th century, what was the effective range of an archer?  And what was the effective range of a trebuchet?  The historical reports differ. At 200 yards, is Hew's trebuchet out of range of archers defending the castle?  To find out, a dummy representing the trebuchet's chief operator is placed at that distance. Edward's castle-building campaign in Wales had taught him how to design well defended fortresses.  Turning his attention to conquering Scotland, did Edward also have the ability to successfully attack them?  As the king marched northwards to take the castles that guarded Scotland, he brought with him some of the biggest siege engines, or trebuchets, ever built. Joining Hew Kennedy in his quest to build a trebuchet is mechanical engineer Wayne Neel, a professor from Virginia Military Institute. Wayne will design the trebuchet.  He is basing it on a picture he found in a 13th century Spanish manuscript.  The illustration gives no idea of the true scale of the trebuchet because the artist has made the machine smaller than the soldiers standing next to it. With the manuscript as a starting point, Wayne uses a combination of engineering theory and trial and error to come up with a working model.  The prototype looks promising to Marcus Brandt, a carpenter who will help Wayne build the trebuchet. To resolve the problem, Wayne re-examines the medieval illustrations of this type of trebuchet.  He's struck by the fact that many have wheels, so he decides to build a new model.  Not only do wheels eliminate the tendency for it to tip over, the movement also boosts the trebuchet's performance. Hew doubts that wheels will make a trebuchet throw farther, so he insists on a demonstration.  For the first throw, Hew holds down the model. The projectile travels 20 feet. When the trebuchet is allowed to roll, the missile goes an extra 10 feet.  Why?  The falling counterweight drives the trebuchet forward.  Like a pitcher stepping forward, this adds momentum to the throw.  The forward motion also permits the counterweight to drop further in a straighter line.  The closer the counterweight follows this optimal path, the more energy it captures for throwing. Now that Wayne has confidence in his model, the project moves to Loch Ness in the Scottish Highlands for a full-scale test.  The trials will take place in the shadow of Castle Urquhart, which may have been besieged with similar weapons during Edward I's Scottish campaigns 700 years ago.  Wayne and Hew arrive at Castle Urquhart to inspect the timber that is delivered by barge. As in the Middle Ages, heavy duty English oak is the choice for building the carriage and trestles.  But the throwing arm will be made from a more lightweight wood, Douglas fir.  Wayne calculates that a tree trunk of at least two feet in diameter is needed to withstand the stresses of hurling 250 pound balls. After it is floated across Loch Ness, the log is quickly hauled ashore. Work immediately begins on hewing it into an eight-sided throwing arm. The next job is to assemble the base.  40 carpenters, mainly from the United States, but also from Britain and Germany, have volunteered to spend their vacation here.  They're all timber framers who specialize in traditional construction techniques.  Without nails, they connect large pieces of wood using mortise and tenon joints.  While the timber framers immerse themselves in medieval methods, Wayne employs the tools of a modern engineer to check and recheck his design.  In particular, he's hoping that the wheels will give him the same boost in performance as they did on the model.  Up at the target wall, work is almost complete.  The wooden structures on top are called hoardings. They provided additional protection for defenders during the siege.   Attackers would build similar barriers to protect the trebuchet team from arrow fire. The target wall is modeled on the outer walls of Harlech and Caerphilly, two of the best defended castles in Wales.  Faced with the daunting task of taking a castle like Caerphilly, what siege tactics would an attacker adopt? Meanwhile, rotten weather has besieged Castle Urquhart.  And after a week of daily downpours, the trestles that support the throwing arm are ready to be raised.  At the top of the trestle, the throwing arm rotates on an axle that has to be both strong and exact.  Marcus Brandt has taken on the job. Marcus restores old buildings in Pennsylvania, and has enthusiastically embraced the idea of using medieval technology. Villages were often established next to the castle of a nobleman or the king. In order to position the heavy throwing arm, the timberframers place an A-frame above the trestles to support the pulley system - a standard medieval device.  A block and tackle dramatically reduces the number of people required to pull on the ropes. The next phase of construction is the most dangerous.  Without the help of a modern crane, the timber framers must trust the strength of two slender poles and the rigging of their ropes in order to raise the one ton throwing arm. With the throwing arm in position, Wayne needs to attach weights that will power the machine.  He chooses lead because he believes lead was used for the counterweight of Warwolf, the mysterious and terrifying siege engine that clinched the assault on Stirling Castle.  There is good historical evidence for this.  In a letter Edward wrote just before the siege, he demanded that lead be removed from all the churches. Wayne's calculations tell him that in order for his machine to throw a 250 pound ball, he'll need about six and a half tons of lead counterweight. It takes a week to melt down the scrap and form it into a collar that can be bolted onto the arm. A survey of medieval illustrations suggests that swinging counterweights were the more popular design.  A man who has been working with them longer than     anyone else is traditional French carpenter Renaud Beffeyte.  Renaud is convinced that Edward's great siege engine, Warwolf, had a swinging counterweight box.  The simple design of the box makes it not only cheaper, but easier to build than one with a lead counterweight.  And Renaud has found graphic accounts of the destructive power of some really big siege machines. 500 years before Newton's apple, medieval engineers had figured that trebuchets with a swinging counterweight are the most efficient at using the force of gravity.  Like adding wheels to a fixed-counterweight trebuchet, the hinge allows the swinging counterweight to descend further in a straighter line, capturing more energy for the throw.  15 years ago, Renaud came across the notebook of the 13th century French architect, Villard de Honnecourt.  In it he found the plan for the base of a trebuchet and a description of the swinging counterweight box.  Unfortunately, the page showing the rest of the trebuchet was missing.  But with his knowledge of medieval carpentry and his experience of building over 30 small trebuchets, Renaud realized that if the design were ever built, it would be monstrous - the height of a five-story building.  Ever since this discovery, Renaud has wanted to construct the full-size trebuchet.  Finally, he will get the chance at Castle Urquhart in Scotland. Renaud is left with no alternative but to hope that a couple of planks will be strong enough to splint the weakened throwing arm.  Finally, work starts on raising the great trestles.  With each passing day, the situation at Castle Urquhart more and more resembles a siege of old.  With two trebuchets to finish, there is a nagging feeling that Renaud's machine may not get done before the timberframers must return home.  Over at Wayne's trebuchet, work on attaching the lead weights is finally finished.  All that remains is to cock the arm.  Even with the help of pulleys, this requires 40 people.  With a 13,000 pound counterweight, it's a much bigger job than any one imagined.  And it will have to be repeated for each fling.  The trigger mechanism is not strong enough, and buckles alarmingly as it takes the full weight of the throwing arm. To avoid an accidental firing, they reinforce it with a length of chain. The next morning a 250 pound sandstone ball is quickly positioned in the sling for the first throw. Even with 12 timber framers pulling, the firing pin won't budge. Despite Hew's predictions that a trebuchet on wheels would shake itself to pieces, the reverse is true.  Wheels dampen the recoil.  Everything appears to be working as Wayne predicted, except the range.  The ball only traveled about 170 yards, falling short of the wall. Just like his medieval counterpart, Wayne uses a process of trial and error to alter the trebuchet's range by adjusting the length of the sling. With the first throw, a long sling resulted in a late release and a low trajectory.  By shortening the sling, Wayne believes the ball will be released earlier, resulting in a higher path.  Wayne's adjustments have the desired effect.  The second throw has perfect range, just missing the target to the right by two feet. What will be the last day for Wayne and his team dawns, with the wall still intact, but clearly under threat.  Meanwhile Renaud's trebuchet is still not finished. Still, with time so short, it's unclear that Renaud will get a chance to fire his trebuchet at all.  After last night's narrow miss, Wayne's trebuchet is repositioned to be more in line with the target. With the same 250 pound ball as yesterday, and the sling at the same length, Wayne believes he is now dead on to hit the wall with his third attempt. The third shot is identical to the second in distance.  At a range of 200 yards, adjusting the wheels one inch to the left placed the missile bang on top of the hoarding. With the trebuchet lined up on the target, Wayne only has to shorten the range by a hair to hit the stone battlements below. Worried that this may be the last attempt, Wayne makes a sudden change of plan.  He replaces the 250 pound ball that he's been using with a jumbo 300 pounder. Wayne figures that the heavier ball, clocked at a speed of 127 miles an hour, should breach the wall.  But he's wrong. Putting on their kilts for good luck, Wayne's team rushes to get in one final shot. Intoxicated with success, the timberframers bid adieu to the Highlands.  But the next morning, Renaud is heartened to find that he's not been completely abandoned.  Ed Levin and a handful of the Americans have decided to stay on in Scotland to help finish the job.  The biggest concern is whether the throwing arm has been fatally weakened at the point where the main axle passes through it.  To avoid stressing the arm, Renaud decides to only partially load his counterweight, using four tons of sand in the 12 ton capacity box.  But there are risks to this approach. The heavy ball and relatively light counterweight result in the missile landing dangerously close to the trebuchet. Two more tons of sand are added. Renaud's optimism is justified.  The missile falls just a few yards short of the wall and a bit to the right.  The team decides to give it one more day.   But the next morning starts with snow, followed by a heavy downpour. Last night's final shot was short of the wall because it was thrown too high.  Renaud believes the sling is slipping off its prong too soon.  So to delay release and lower the trajectory, the prong is bent forward. For days, Renaud has suspected that his trebuchet is pointing just to the right of the wall.  But the loaded machine is too heavy to shift, and he faces thepossibility that he may have to go home having achieved only a near miss.  At the last minute, Marcus offers a solution. By shifting the channel that holds the ball slightly to the left, they hope to redirect the missile.  It works - almost.  Another three feet and Renaud would've had a direct hit.  Unless shifting the channel was just a fluke, one more nudge to the left should bring the trebuchet right on target. After two throws which are slightly high of the wall itself, Renaud orders a minute adjustment of the prong in order to lower the trajectory.  With frayed ropes and a storm threatening to close down the siege, everything now hangs on Renaud's ability to quickly get on target - and he does.  A bull's eye on the battlements. In a real siege it would only be a matter of time before the wall is reduced to smithereens. It is clear from the experiment that both types of trebuchets work. Because it could so easily be increased in weight, the swinging box design was the improvement that tipped the balance in favor of attack.  So the great wall-busting siege engine Edward employed at Stirling Castle was almost certainly a trebuchet with a giant swinging counterweight.  The weapon that dominated siege warfare for 200 years.  It was not until the late 15th century, the end of the Middle Ages, that the superiority of cannon clearly emerged, and the trebuchet vanished into the mists of time. Egypt is littered with fantastic ruins, all created to preserve Pharaoh's name and glorify the ancient gods.  For nearly 2,000 years, ancient builders were pushed to their limits to create the most dramatic, the most impressive temples and palaces ever known.  Perhaps the most difficult challenge of all was to raise an obelisk.  Carved from a single piece of granite, an obelisk could rise over 100 feet, and weigh up to 500 tons.  How did they do it?  In 1994, a team of experts traveled to Egypt to tackle the problem.  But their attempt to erect an obelisk - just a fraction of the size of the ancient ones - fell short.  Tonight, NOVA returns to the land of the pharaohs.  Modern engineers take another look at the evidence, and try out a radical new solution to an age-old mystery.  Ropes and nerves will be strained as another team struggles to recreate the amazing deeds of an ancient empire. 4,500 years ago, when Egypt's Old Kingdom was in its first bloom, Pharaoh was God.  All the country's riches were piled into his tomb - a man-made mountain for an immortal king.  But 1,000 years later, times had changed.  A new god ruled the land
 His name was Amun.  New Kingdom pharaohs like Ramses, Thutmose and Tutankhamun still proclaimed their own divinity, yet they were all beholden to the king of gods.  So they built magnificent temples to him, filled with colossal statues and giant needles of stone - the obelisks.  Hieroglyphs proclaimed the pharaoh's loyalty.  At the pinnacle was a small pyramid - sheathed in silver and gold.  Dedicated to Amun-Ra, the sun god, the obelisks were sparkling shafts of sunlight, rendered in stone.  For the pharaoh's subjects, the effect was awesome. For over 25 years, archeologist Mark Lehner has been probing the meaning of Egypt's monuments.  He believes that colossal statues and obelisks helped pharaoh maintain his power over the Egyptian people. 3,500 years ago, along the banks of the Nile, monumental construction was routine.  But now it seems incredible.  How did Egypt manage to build so much on such a colossal scale?  How could pharaoh's builders transport and erect stones weighing hundreds of tons - in an age without cranes or steel cables?  A team of experts will try to solve the mystery.  They have three weeks to look at the evidence and recreate the Egyptians' remarkable achievements.  The first major challenge our team will face is how the ancient builders moved giant multi-ton blocks of granite.  One of the most important clues was found in the tomb of an official who lived almost 4,000 years ago. To bring the ancient scene to life, stonemason Roger Hopkins joins Mark Lehner and a large Egyptian crew in an attempt to drag a 25 ton block, set on a wooden sled.  Directing the effort will be Rais Abdel Aleem.  The Egyptian foreman has built a roadbed with wooden timbers set into the earth.  To reduce friction, the wood is smeared with animal fat.  Abdel Aleem has a lot of experience moving heavy weights.  But he usually relies on cranes and flatbed trucks - not dozens of men.  The stone should move easily with less than 100 pullers.  At least, that's what Roger hopes. To break the static friction, Abdel Aleem orders the teams of men to bounce the stone with large levers.  But with more than 100 pullers, the only thing moving seems to be the rope - which stretches more than anyone expected. Part of the problem is that the men on the ropes are not pulling together. Roger decides that the men need a little extra motivation.  Finally, with Roger shouting, "God is great!" in Arabic, the stone lurches forward. According to ancient accounts, the pharaohs had no problem gathering workforces that numbered in the thousands.  Some were slaves, others, prisoners of war. But many were Egyptian soldiers, fulfilling their duty to their king and their god.  Our crew remained enthusiastic, even though after several hours of hard work, they moved the stone only about 20 feet. Thanks to the Nile, the Egyptians were early pioneers of boat construction and design.  But was their nautical expertise so great that they could produce vessels strong enough to carry obelisks weighing hundreds of tons?  One pharaoh left compelling evidence that they could.  Her name was Hatshepsut, and she seized the throne from her young stepson around 1470 BC. One of the few women ever to rule Egypt, Hatshepsut displayed a pharaonic beard, and celebrated her reign by raising four gigantic obelisks at the Great House of Amun in Thebes.  Across the Nile, at her mortuary temple, Hatshepsut bragged of transporting two of these monoliths down the river from Aswan.  To help interpret the evidence, Mark welcomes on board nautical expert Owain Roberts.  A lifelong sailor and boat-builder, Owain specializes in reconstructing ancient vessels. On the wall of Hatshepsut's temple is a carved relief. Although much of the wall is damaged after 3,500 years, Mark and Owain can just make out an image
 two obelisks lying on the deck of a boat. But how was such a vessel constructed?  The Egyptians left behind some intriguing clues.  Tomb and temple walls are covered with images of boats. Noblemen and kings were buried with miniature replicas of the fleets they captained in life.  But perhaps the most amazing evidence was found here, at the foot of the Great Pyramid of Khufu.  Zahi Hawass, Director of Giza, now oversees all excavations on the famous pyramid plateau. In 1954, one of Zahi's predecessors, Kamal el Malach, was in charge of the site. The smell came from hundreds of planks of cedar wood, lying at the bottom of a limestone pit.  The pieces fit together like a giant jigsaw puzzle. When the puzzle was complete, it looked like this.  This is one of the oldest boats in the world. Built for the Pharaoh Khufu 4,500 years ago, it was carefully dismantled and buried next to his pyramid tomb, so he could use it in the afterlife.  For a boat lover like Owain Roberts, it's an inspiration. Today, builders rely on nails.  And modern boats are almost always constructed around a skeletal framework.  But ancient boats like Khufu's were built skin first - by weaving together thick outer planks. This is a replica of an ancient plank from Khufu's boat. The holes along the edge were made for mortise and tenon joints. Additional holes allowed the Egyptians to weave the planks together. As an extra precaution, reeds were stuffed into the seams. Finally, crossbeams were added, to provide internal support. With just wood and rope, the Egyptians created sea-going ships and barges big and strong enough to carry obelisks.  But how was such a tremendous weight loaded onto a boat without tipping it over?  Owain Roberts has come up with a boat design that would make the job easier. To prevent capsizing, a barge capable of carrying Hatshepsut's obelisks had to be extremely wide - with a length to width ratio of perhaps two to one. Owain will try out his idea on a scale model.  He beaches the front end, securing it to a ramp that leads smoothly up to the deck.  Ropes run from the obelisk up the ramp, across the deck and through two wooden blocks, which turn the ropes back toward the bank.  In this way, the pullers can stay high and dry on the beach and don't have to wade out into the river. After her obelisks were loaded, Hatshepsut's barge was towed downstream to Thebes and the great House of Amun, now known as Karnak Temple. Sprawling across hundreds of acres, the vast complex was expanded by a succession of pharaohs, over the course of several centuries.  The god himself was believed to reside in a statue - kept under lock and key in the dark heart of the temple - the holy of holies.  The statue is now gone, but ancient inscriptions describe the ritual that Amun's priests enacted within these walls. Sometimes, the priest would take the statue of Amun across the Nile to the west bank of Thebes, to visit the tombs of kings and nobles. As time went on, the quest to please and impress Amun drove pharaohs to erect bigger and bigger obelisks.  Weighing up to 500 tons, these were some of the largest single stones ever quarried anywhere in the world.  They were carved by hand and adorned with intricate hieroglyphs.  Somehow, the Egyptians managed to stand them on end - without breaking them.  Each balanced upon a small stone pedestal, with no support other than its own enormous weight.  Only a handful of ancient obelisks survive intact in their original positions.  All physical evidence of how they were raised has disappeared, except for one tantalizing clue. On every pedestal stone, a deep groove is carved in one side. Without this groove, the obelisk might slip across its base.  But the groove acts as a brake, and it helps keep the obelisk aligned when it's pulled to vertical.  The trick is getting one edge of a stone weighing hundreds of tons safely into the turning groove. Mark Whitby is one of Britain's leading engineers. He's devised a unique theory of how the ancient Egyptians might have raised their obelisks.  Inspired by the complex wood and rope-work on Egyptian ships, Mark has designed an elaborate system to rotate the obelisk slowly down onto its pedestal stone. He hopes to try out his idea in a quarry in Aswan.  A 30 ton granite obelisk has been placed atop an earthen ramp, and preparations are underway to lower it 12 feet into a turning groove.  The first task is to assemble a large wooden framework that will provide the mechanical advantage to rotate the obelisk safely.  In this supporting role is Rick Brown, a sculptor and timber framer from Massachusetts.  At the moment, he has no idea that events will soon propel him to center stage in the obelisk drama.  Meanwhile, Owain Roberts and his son Iolo are in charge of rigging nearly a mile's worth of rope.  With all this rope and wood, Mark Whitby hopes to harness the giant stone, and carefully control its descent.  While the engineer and his small army of assistants scramble to build their complicated contraption, Roger Hopkins is pursuing a completely different approach.  With the large-scale obelisk already spoken for, Roger is left to experiment with a mini two ton block.  And he's not happy about it. Even though his obelisk is small, Roger still has to lower it with care.  But instead of relying on ropes, he prefers a method that is more low-tech. Buried under 21 tons of sand is Roger's miniature pedestal stone, complete with turning groove. Roger's homespun technique doesn't impress Mark Whitby. In spite of Mark's criticisms, Roger is not alone in his support for the sandpit method. The 3,000 year old document reads, "Empty the space that has been filled with sand beneath the monument of thy lord... so that the monument may be established in its place."  Many scholars believe the Egyptians used sand. But others argue that it's difficult to control.  Removing it from around the base of a 300 or 400 ton obelisk could be dangerous. After a couple of hours, the obelisk is reaching the bottom of the sandpit.  And Roger is now removing the sand with his bare hands. Millimeter by millimeter, the obelisk sinks lower. Roger's obelisk came to rest at an angle of about 60 degrees. Weighing only two tons, it's not difficult to pull the stone to vertical.  But the ancient obelisks were up to 500 tons, and pulling them upright was not so simple.  To make the job easier, Mark Whitby thinks the Egyptians would have lowered their obelisks to a much steeper angle - like 80 degrees. To make the obelisk go forward, gangs of men will pull on ropes suspended from the wooden frame.  Mark hopes that as these ropes tighten, the obelisk will tilt downwards, and eventually rotate around the large pivot log. 60 men are brought in to pull on the ropes attached to the giant wooden frame.  The time has come to test Mark Whitby's method, and see how well he can control the obelisk.  Everyone is warned to stand back, just in case the 30 ton obelisk tilts too far, and topples off the platform.  With each tug, the giant stone teeters precariously. Rick Brown places wooden chocks beneath the rising obelisk. Mark's first goal is to tilt the obelisk down so that the pivot log makes secure contact with the top of the platform.  This log is then supposed to rotate right up to the edge - guiding the obelisk precisely toward its pedestal, 12 feet below.  But the jerky rocking of the obelisk creates a problem that Mark did not anticipate
 the giant log has slipped out of its intended position, and is moving dangerously close to the edge. The rigging team struggles to pound the log back into place.  Fearing that the human pullers may jerk the obelisk off the ledge, Mark decides to supplement the pull with a counterweight - a three-and-a-half-ton block of stone.  When its timber supports are removed, Mark hopes the weight of the stone will apply a steady downward pressure on the ropes, doing the work of 100 men.  But as the stone is lowered to the ground, Mark finds that the ropes holding the counterweight have simply stretched.  And the obelisk hasn't moved an inch. In spite of all his plans and calculations, Mark's method is not working.  Desperate to make some progress, Mark decides to take a modern shortcut - suspending the counterweight in midair with a crane.  But this risky move just causes more problems.  Mark's quickly changing plans are taking their toll on the rigging crew. With morale plummeting, Mark Whitby must give up on the counterweight. Over 200 men are put on the ropes.  Everyone senses this is Mark's last chance to make his method work. Mark's old problem with the pivot log has returned to haunt him. Once again, the giant log has crept forward.  And this time, it has gone too far. The pivot log has slid right up to the edge of the ramp, and now the chances of the obelisk crashing down have become too great.  Defeated, Mark is forced to admit the situation is too dangerous, and decides to abandon the attempt. Another obelisk raising attempt has ended in failure.  Most of the team is completely demoralized.  Timber framer Rick Brown is the exception. But unfortunately, NOVA's time in Egypt has come to an end. Back at home, jobs and families beckon.  The search for answers will have to continue somewhere else.  6,000 miles from Aswan, at a granite quarry in Massachusetts, a new plan is being hatched that may solve the obelisk puzzle, once and for all.  Rick Brown is the one member of the team who couldn't give up. In Egypt, Rick was enthusiastic about Mark Whitby's plan, but now he decides to take another look at the sandpit.  Rick liked the simplicity of Roger's method, but one thing worried him.  Roger used sand that was slightly damp - it didn't flow well, and had to be dug out from directly under the obelisk - potentially very dangerous.  Rick decides to use dry sand - abundant in Egypt's arid climate.  With the help of his wife and fellow sculptor Laura, Rick begins planning a new kind of sandbox. The main force at work in the sandpit is gravity - the obelisk sinks under its own weight.  But how is it steered into the turning groove?  Rick will try to control the stone with several brake ropes.  In addition, the back wall of the box is a series of steps - carefully aligned with the turning groove.  After perfecting his method with scale models, Rick is about to get his turn with a 36 foot obelisk. All the details of Rick's model have been scaled up for the 25 ton stone, including three gigantic ropes that run the length of the obelisk and are secured to two large brake logs.  Assisting Rick are friends from the Timber Framers' Guild - a group dedicated to traditional building techniques.  With everything in place, the team is ready to begin. At first, the movement of the obelisk is almost imperceptible.  But slowly, the point of the stone begins to rise. The approach takes time.  After half a day of digging, the obelisk has only rotated a third of the way toward the turning groove.  As the hours pass, and the obelisk sinks deeper into the pit, Rick's method is truly put to the test - when more and more pressure falls on the brake ropes. Rick's team predicted a certain amount of stretch in the ropes.  But if their estimates are wrong, the obelisk could overshoot the turning groove. Tension mounts as the stone approaches the critical angle of 75 degrees.  With the obelisk nearing the back of the sandpit, Rick can't resist the temptation to jump in and dig for himself.  The obelisk is now leaning against the wall of the sandpit and is directly in line with the turning groove. Now, it's a matter of gradually releasing the brake ropes - and removing the last bits of sand.  For three more hours the work goes on. Finally, in the dark of night, and without a sound, the 25 ton obelisk nestles into its groove.  When the sun returns, and the sandbox is removed, Rick can appreciate how far he's come. Leading the pullers is Rick's colleague, engineer Grigg Mullen. Grigg's job is to scare the undisciplined volunteers into pulling slowly and gently. If they pull too hard, the fragile obelisk could topple over and crash to the ground.  To prevent this kind of disaster, Rick's team is once again using brake ropes.  While the gang below pulls the obelisk toward vertical, the brake crew holds it back, letting the ropes out slowly, so the obelisk can't work up any momentum. When the great obelisks of Egypt were pointed to the sky, the engineers in charge of the raising would have done all they could to protect the pharaoh's monument.  Most likely, the process was slow and painstaking, relying on human sweat and the gentle force of sand.  The method may have been simple, but the result was spectacular. Mist rises off these waters as it has for centuries.  Hot springs bubble into a lead lined pool.  Against this ancient backdrop, an unusual gathering is taking place.  Although most of these people have never met, together they will take a journey into history, when the public bath was one of the most important buildings in the Roman empire.  2,000 years ago, the bath was not just a place for the highborn.  It was a community center and a daily ritual that defined what it meant to be Roman. Underlying all the luxury were advanced technologies - copious supplies of hot and cold water piped in from miles away, rooms of intoxicating warmth made possible by sophisticated heating systems.  But when the Roman empire collapsed, the world fell into darkness - and the art and science of the baths was lost.  Until now.  After 2,000 years, NOVA will build a Roman bath and strive to uncover the secrets of the most technologically advanced building of the ancient world. The Roman bath was once a technological marvel.  Today, it's a technological mystery.  A mystery that this group of engineers, archeologists and historians are hoping to solve as they journey into the mind of the ancient builders. Fikret Yegül is an architect and expert on ancient baths. After a lifetime of study, he is designing his first Roman bath - with help from Teoman Yalçinkaya, an engineer, who will build it.  But the Romans left no blueprints, no technical specifications.  All they have to go on are the ruins that remain after 2,000 years.  Crumbling evidence of heating systems that reveal little of how they worked - remnants of pipe that suggest complex plumbing.  Even the pools where the Romans bathed have fallen into ruin. Among his colleagues here, Fikret's design is problematic.   Most of them think it won't work. Who were these Roman builders?  Emanating from the city of Rome, their empire spanned more than 3,000 miles, from Syria to Scotland, and reigned supreme for 1,000 years.  Few civilizations, before or since, have built with such intensity - spectacular feats of engineering and magnificent monuments. Building was ingrained in the Roman character. But the real genius of the Roman engineers was exploiting what they learned from other cultures. With ideas, money, and slave labor appropriated from conquered nations, the emperors of Rome built increasingly complex structures - among them, the baths. The Romans built so many of them, the baths became an experimental laboratory to test out new concepts. In modern day Turkey lies an ancient Roman city called Sardis.  It's here, in the shadow of the bath at Sardis, that NOVA will try to uncover the secrets that have been lost for centuries.  Building a Roman bath begins the same way it did 2,000 years ago - with a good piece of land.  Fikret Yegül has arrived with Teoman Yalçinkaya, an engineer with an interesting sideline. For 30 years, Teoman has also been a member of the Sardis excavation team. The Romans understood solar heating and made best use of the sun's warmth by orienting the windows of the hottest room toward the south. The next step is to mark the footprint of the building in the ground. This bath will be small - like the private baths attached to the homes of very rich Romans.  The sheep are about to lose their favorite grazing area to an experiment in history.  It will take all day just to mark and prepare the foundation.  In the meantime, Garrett Fagan has also arrived in Turkey.  An expert in Roman culture, he is here to experience a Turkish hamam, a direct descendant of the Roman bath. The exercise wasn't strenuous, it was just meant to work up a sweat. Romans did not have soap.  They just scraped off the dirt and oil. Unaware of germs, Roman doctors collected the gloios from the floor and mixed it into medicinal ointments.  After sponging down, the next step was decidedly less pleasant.  Body hair was not fashionable in ancient Rome - so the bather could hire a depilator, a hair plucker. After a gentle soaping, Garrett's hamam will be over.  But a Roman bath lasted several hours, culminating in the caldarium, where the floor was so hot, wooden sandals were an absolute necessity.  The rest of the afternoon was spent socializing and arranging the evening's activity.  Garrett also hopes to experience a Roman bath - but he'll have to wait until it's built.  As groundbreaking begins, Teoman has a tough job ahead of him.  Limited to the tools and techniques known in ancient times, he has agreed to build the bath in seven weeks.  For the Romans, it might have taken months.  NOVA set up a time-lapse camera to capture every minute of the action.  The stones have been delivered and the foundation begins to take shape.  There will be three rooms, the bare necessity for a proper Roman bath.  The frigidarium, or cold room, will have a round cold pool in the apse.  The tepidarium, or warm room, is where the bathers will change their clothes and have a massage.  And in the caldarium, or hot room, there is a heated pool toward the back.  From cold to warm to hot, it's all a product of the heating system.  Below the hot pool, a fireplace, or furnace, will heat the floor, three walls of the caldarium, and one wall of the tepidarium.  Whether the heating system will work or not remains to be seen.  But first things first.  The walls must go up.  Two weeks of work is collapsed into 20 seconds.  Here, one of Rome's greatest engineering achievements is beginning to take shape.  The vaulted or domed roof was a technological leap forward in architecture.  Before the Romans, the Greeks also built large buildings.  The interiors  were filled with columns to support the heavy flat roof above.  But the Romans perfected a better idea.  They built the roof in sections, forming a curve.  At the top, a keystone is dropped in.  The downward thrust of the keystone pushes the sections outward, creating a pressure that holds the entire roof together.  With the curved roof, the columns are unnecessary.  The roof supports itself - freeing an enormous amount of interior space.  By the second century AD, the Romans had engineered the ultimate dome - the Pantheon, a temple to all the gods.  For 1500 years it stood as the largest open interior space in the world.  This remarkable building owes its existence to the thousands of baths built before it.  With each one, the Romans perfected the art and science of the dome. Our vaulted roof is made of brick.  The wood forms maintain the domed shape and hold the bricks in place until the roof is finished.   A thin piece of wood ensures the correct distance and angle between the bricks.  It will take several days to complete the roof.  Meanwhile, Tony Rook and his colleague Bryan Scott have arrived. At their first meeting, Tony was skeptical of Fikret's design, especially of the heating system. Tony thought it would never heat up properly, and soon enough he will find out if he was right.  Before he studied archeology, Tony was a building materials specialist. And one material in particular, now going on the vaulted roof, is considered by many to be Rome's greatest contribution to engineering.  Cheap, durable, versatile concrete.  Concrete enabled the Romans to become spectacular builders.  Without it, the Colosseum would not exist, nor would the Pantheon. The recipe for concrete was written down by the Roman architect Vitruvius in the first century BC.  The main ingredient comes from one of the most common materials in the world, limestone. Quicklime is chemically very different from limestone.  All the carbon dioxide has been burned off.  Then, when water is added, something strange starts to happen. As more water is added, the powder turns into a putty adhesive enough to bond the coarse materials that make up concrete. Added to the lime - sand and an aggregate of rock.  To make the concrete waterproof, the Romans also mixed in crushed tile.  They preferred volcanic ash, but it wasn't available in most places. Almost four weeks - more than half the time has passed and Teoman is anxious to move on.  With the exterior work mostly done, it is time to tackle the hardest part - the heating system inside.  The roof forms over the frigidarium will stay up a little while longer.  But the heating system goes in the tepidarium and caldarium - so there the scaffolding must come down. Tearing down the vault planking is a nerve-wracking process.  If the roof wasn't built right, it might not hold together.  Everyone is relieved when the roof stays up.  The heart of the heating system is the fireplace or furnace, as they call it.  Fikret is putting on the final touches. Max Fordham and his colleague Tristan Couch are heating engineers. Max has designed some of the most complex climate control systems in the world, including Britain's Tate Gallery and the Savoy Theatre. These ruins from Bath, England show that the heating system was a tour de force of Roman engineering.  They even had a name for it
 hypocaust, which means "fire underneath."  A Roman writer credited the invention of the hypocaust to an entrepreneur named Sergius Orata and his love for oysters. Orata wanted to cultivate and sell oysters, but he needed a constant supply of warm water to breed them.  So he mounted oyster pans on pillars and lit a fire underneath.  The hot air circulated beneath the oyster beds, heating the water inside.  The best temperature for breeding was achieved by adjusting the size of the fire.  It's a good story, but most historians don't buy it. There's nothing in the record about how well Orata's oyster business did, but there's a great deal of evidence that hypocausts eventually heated every Roman bath built.  The hypocaust starts in the furnace which connects to the caldarium, the hottest room.  There is an opening on the right to the tepidarium, the warm room.  Pillars, called pilae, will raise the floor about three feet.  On top of the pilae, large floor tiles, called bipedalis, will be installed.  A layer of concrete goes on top and then another layer of marble. For the system to work, the hot gases are drawn from the furnace through the rooms, where they rise and spread out, heating the floor as they go.  There are four flues, or chimneys, to draw the hot gases toward them, promoting the circulation of the heat and providing a way out for the smoke.  Part of Max's role is to assess whether the gases will flow properly.  If the system isn't pulling a draft, it will never heat up the bath. This is a good sign that the system might be working properly, taking air from the outside and drawing it in.  But will the chimneys draw air as well?  Max steps inside the caldarium to check. His method is decidedly low tech, but it may well have been how the Romans tested it too. Next, Max goes to the furnace to see if the heat of the fire will be drawn into the room as it should. This might look like a good sign, but the room is wide open.  If the raised floor isn't designed and installed properly, the gas flow could be blocked and the room won't heat. The men start building the pilae. After the mortar sets, Max tries to crawl through.  The Romans would have built the heating system large enough for a slave to fit under for cleaning or repair. The pilae in this bath are several centimeters closer together than the Romans usually built them.  Max worries it will impede the flow of hot gases. But the spacing of the pilae was limited by the size of the tiles that will go on top. Making those tiles was a frustrating and expensive lesson for Teoman. And now he has to face the criticism of Tony Rook. The clay tiles kept cracking, some even exploded inside the kiln. The Romans would have let them dry for months, even years.  But Teoman only had a few weeks.  The final solution was decidedly un-Roman. The floor tiles, each in a steel frame, are carefully placed a few inches away from the wall.  The reason will soon be apparent.  For centuries, the Romans only used under floor heating.  Then, around the first century AD, archeological evidence revealed something new.  This is Ephesus, Turkey, a nearby Roman city with several baths.  And each one reveals a surprising new addition - hollow clay boxes, called tubuli, lining the walls of the heated rooms.  The Romans had introduced radiant wall heating, which made the system much more complex.  The tubuli are placed over the hole between the ledge and the floor tile.  When stacked on top of each other, a vertical channel is formed for hot gases to rise.  The round holes, placed side by side, create a horizontal path so the gases can also circulate across the wall.  But what to do when they get to the top is a mystery.  This ancient bath at Ephesus has no roof.  The grand imperial baths of Caracalla in Rome have no roof.  And neither does the bath at Sardis.  There are so few archeological remains that our team differed widely about how the hot gases might flow through the tubuli and vent out. The system they settled on works like this.  Along the open edges of the floor, the hot gases rise up the vertical channels and flow horizontally through the holes.  When they get to the top, they meet up with a horizontal channel connected to the chimney flue.  The draft from the chimney draws the hot gases and keeps the circulation going so that a continuous stream of heated air cycles through.  Ibrahim Akyar is building the horizontal channel.  First, he cuts the hole in the chimney.  Then he carefully matches the openings.  The tubuli are bonded to the wall by mortar.  It's similar to concrete, but without the coarse ingredients.  Tons of mortar have been used in this small bath.  And giving it all time to dry will become a serious problem.  The Romans would have allowed weeks, even months, for the building to dry.  But Teoman has only 10 days to complete construction and three days to heat up the building.  Such a tight schedule could be a recipe for disaster. Teoman is well aware of the problem, but there's still so much to do. The hypocaust floors need a layer of concrete.  Four to five inches thick, it will take several days to dry.  Only Teoman will wait it out.  Everyone else has jobs and things to do back home.  They'll return in 10 days to light the furnace.  As plastering begins on the ceiling, their problems are about to multiply.  Rain not only slows down Teoman's schedule, it also soaks an already wet building.  Even the stray puppy that adopted the bath as her new home gets drenched.  Of all the engineering achievements of the Roman empire, one stands above all others.  Without it, there would have been no baths.  Without it, there would have been no Rome.  The Roman aqueduct, the single greatest system for the transport of water known to the world until this century.  Even today, the water of Rome's Trevi fountain comes from an ancient aqueduct. The source of Rome's water lay 50 miles outside the city, in the foothills of the Apennines, where the Anio River flows.  But the best drinking water in all of Rome came from nearby mountain springs.  This is where the Aqua Claudia aqueduct was built starting in 38 AD.  But there's nothing to see because it's all underground.  The Aqua Claudia began with a large, deep basin that collected cold spring water.  An underground aqueduct directed it toward Rome, following the contours of the land, sometimes boring deep under the mountains.  There were no pumps to move the water along.  The system worked solely on gravity - a small, gentle slope for about 50 miles. Much of the Aqua Claudia is still there, buried beneath the surface.  Peter Aicher is about to show Garrett Fagan something few people have ever seen. The front face of this mountain cliff has broken off, revealing the Aqua Claudia tunnel hidden inside. They're walking in the opposite direction the water flowed.  As they move deeper into the channel, they find along the wall, remnants of Roman waterproof concrete. They also find a buildup of hard water mineral deposits, centuries old. There was a surprising benefit to these mineral deposits. They would coat the lead pipes used throughout the city, preventing lead poisons from leaching into the water supply. The Aqua Claudia tunnels underground for more than 40 miles.  But eventually, mountains come to an end.  That's when aqueducts emerge, in a spectacular display of Roman engineering.  Graceful arcades of arches, 60 feet high, carrying water in channels along the top.  This bridge carried two aqueducts, the Aqua Claudia on the bottom and the mostly missing channel of the Anio Novis aqueduct on top.  At Porte Maggiore, one of the highest spots in the city, the Aqua Claudia, along with seven other aqueducts, finally reaches Rome. At this point, the system switched to closed, pressurized pipes which delivered the water all over town. Aqueducts were built throughout the Roman empire.  Almost 2,000 years ago, an aqueduct sloped down the Tmolos Mountains to supply the bath at Sardis. It used thousands of gallons of water every day.  But it never went to waste. After the water was drained from the baths, it was channeled through this multi-seat latrine as a flushing system.  With seats lining all the walls, this latrine accommodated two dozen people.  It offers a revealing look at Roman culture, where personal habits were surprisingly public. With the rain, the marbling inside the bath house is going very slowly.  As they put mortar on one side of the frigidarium wall, the marble on the other side buckles.  The mortar is so wet, it settled to the bottom and pushed the marble out. Sections of this wall will have to be redone.  For Teoman, this is the last straw.  Even though the sky is beginning to clear, he's worried the building won't dry or heat up properly.  He needs some advice. But without Max or Tony at hand, Teoman drives down to the village for help. There's no heating engineer here.  But there is a baker - who fires his oven every day.  He agrees to come up to the site.  In the meantime, the wood fuel that Teoman ordered has arrived, at least a week's worth of it. The whole team was looking forward to lighting the fire.  But Teoman has made a risky decision - to light it early in the hopes of drying the building.  It's a tense time.  Will the furnace draw properly?  Will the chimneys vent?  Will the rooms heat up?  And most important, will the building crack?  After a half hour, things aren't looking so good.  Most of the heat is heading the wrong direction - out of the furnace. The baker will push the fire deep under the caldarium, closer to the chimneys.  And a couple of hours later, it's a sight to behold.  Not only is smoke pouring out of the chimney, but inside it's even seeping out of the unfinished parts of the doorway between the seams of the tubuli. Four more nights and the others will arrive to see it. Fikret couldn't resist a little jab at those who had doubted his design.  Inside, they start feeling the walls to see if the tubuli are heating up evenly. But Max has brought some equipment that can see right through the walls - an infrared camera that shows heat ranges by color.  White is off the charts, red is about 250 degrees Fahrenheit, then the temperature descends from yellow, to green, to blue, and so on.  The black areas are where the tubuli stop.  It's telling everyone where the gases are flowing inside. With the construction almost done and the building heating up, it's time for the final act - heating up the bath water.  No one knows what the temperature of the water actually was, but there are hints.  Ancient stories of water so hot that heavy drinkers would have to be carried out, unconscious. The system they used to heat the water was surprisingly similar to ours today - a hot water boiler.  Modeled after a boiler found in the ruins of a Roman bath in Algeria, this one will be installed in the morning.  A simple task that will stir up some simmering tensions. As the day begins, Tony and Bryan suggest a change in the plumbing connections to the boiler. The tank is designed to have the hot water come out of one of these side connections.  But Tony and Bryan believe that if it came out the top, the boiler would be more efficient.  They might be right, but it is, perhaps, one criticism too many.  The atmosphere becomes charged. Max, the engineer, wants to test the heating system to its engineering limit.  Fikret, the historian, wants only to heat it to the limit of a Turkish bath.  It becomes a clash of professional disciplines. The argument goes on until they reach a compromise.  The bath will only be heated to 40 degrees centigrade, but the changes will be made to the boiler.  The hot water connections are quickly reconfigured.  The boiler is moved into place and attached. With the building heated, they can pull the fire back from the middle of the caldarium to where it belongs - under the boiler. It will take all day for the water to heat up.  In the meantime, a few finishing touches are left inside.  A marble mosaic for the floor, and a fresco for the wall, copied from a Roman house in Ephesus, Turkey.  At the end of the day, Tony and Bryan turn on the water.  It takes several hours to fill the pool.  Tomorrow is bath time. The team has waited seven weeks and a lifetime for this experience. But while everyone sleeps, something goes terribly wrong. Teoman believes the problem stems from heating the bath early, before the marble walls were completely dry.  The mortar at the joints didn't have the proper setting time, and it cracked. There is a quick solution - silicon sealant.  It's not Roman, but time has run out and everyone is anxious to take their bath. With some lingering doubts, everyone gathers for a final lunch, a very lengthy lunch, while the pool slowly fills.  Few people have waited so long to take a bath. As they file out of the hot bath, Garrett is reminded where the heat is coming from. Like good Romans, they head for the cold room.  The frigidarium pool has leaked as well.  It makes the act of submerging a bit undignified, but it's a required part of the full experiment. Today the little bath still stands in an olive grove in Sart, Turkey. Teoman still lives and works nearby.  It will be safe in his hands. In the Spring of 1945, Hitler's armies were all but defeated. On the 12th of April, a detachment from the U.S. 9th Infantry was sent to capture a small town in the southeast of Germany called Colditz. Perched on the top of a hill in front of them was an imposing medieval fortress, Colditz Castle. A prisoner of war camp, although the U.S. troops didn't know it. Colditz Castle was the Nazis' top security prison. Here they kept under close guard habitual escapers,allied officers who had already made several bids for freedom.	Allen's failed escape was just the beginning. Undaunted, his comrades were desperate to rejoin the struggle against Hitler. Their lives were on the line. No risk was too great if it meant freedom. Located in the former East Germany, near the border with Czechoslovakia, Colditz was supposed to be the Nazis' highest security camp.  Over that first winter, allied officers who kept trying to escape began to arrive at Colditz. Within a year, there would be 40 Poles, another 50 British, 12 Serbs, 60 Dutch, eight Belgians and over 60 French. All these officers had one thing in common-a fundamental part of their training was the duty to escape the enemy. At the center of the castle was the medieval inner courtyard in which the prisoners were confined. Its walls were up to 12 feet thick, a challenge to any tunneler. Outside this were the battlements, rising up to 75 feet of solid rock. Below these was a double fence of barbed wire. Armed sentries patrolled the wire, night and day.Below the wire, the ground fell away in a sheer drop for 150 feet to the valley floor. At night machine gun nests and searchlights covered the exterior. An escape committee was formed. To head it, they selected thirty-one-year old Pat Reed. With his engineer's eye, Reed could see beyond the skin of the building to its vents, ducts, drains, its ready-made escape routes. In the early days, prisoners tried anything—jumping fences, risking being shot. It was considered an officer's duty to escape. Soon, finding a way out of Colditz became part of everyday life.  One of MI9's most ingenious schemes involved the record company HMV. Only a few maps made it into the camp from London, but every potential escaper would need one. Kenneth Lockwood came up with a novel idea of how to duplicate them. Provoking the German guards was a favorite past time—usually a decoy for escapes. Sinclair devoted every waking hour to escape—a single-minded battle between himself and his German guards. Sinclair was the central player in the most audacious attempt to break out of Colditz. The escape industry went into overdrive. Cardboard and boot polish became a leather holster. Franz Josef's hat was meticulously copied. And ropes to carry 30 escaping prisoners from the windows to the ground were prepared. Each of the 30 escapers would need a forged pass to travel around Germany. This was called an Auschweiss.  Their papers complete, the escapers now needed to hide these precious documents. On the night of September 2nd 1943, the plan went into action. Mike Sinclair and his two guards broke out onto the terrace. Disguised as Franz Josef, Sinclair approached the next sentry who was also fooled. All that remained now was the guard at the main terrace gate. The guard became suspicious because Sinclair's pass was the wrong color. He raised the alarm. German guard Peter Hofmann rushed out. The bullet missed Sinclair's heart by an inch, but he was taken to the Colditz hospital and lived to try again. Bill Goldfinch's idea was to build a glider and launch it from the top of the castle. Neither one of them had an idea of how to build a glider. But they found a textbook in the prison library. With this information, Bill went to the drawing board and produced the first plan. The design developed to carry two people, but if they continued making the parts in their quarters, it couldn't be kept secret for long. The prisoners would need a permanent workspace. Hugo Ironside and Pat Ferguson were brought in to work on the glider. They haven't been back to Colditz since the war. And little has changed to the prisoners' courtyard. But they are eager to find the secret glider workshop high up in one of the attics. The location was chosen because it was just above the roof picked out for the launching. Back then the staircase only gained them access to the lower attic. From here they had to go up through the ceiling. Today, the climb is a lot easier.The wall which they built back then to seal them into their hideaway has been removed. The main gate was the only way into the prisoners' courtyard. Through here came special guards called ferrets to search the building for anything out of the ordinary. To keep the workshop secure, the POWs used an elaborate lookout system. The false wall was so convincing that the Germans didn't notice that the top attic was shorter by eight feet. But this glider uses modern technology. Electric saws and planes do the work in seconds that took Jack, Bill and the others weeks. The replica is following Bill's plan to the inch. Within nine days the shape of the aircraft is emerging. It took the prisoners nine months to get to this stage. It appeared that the tide was turning. But there was still no hope of immediate release. Many of the inmates at Colditz Castle were now spending their fourth year in captivity. As work on the glider continued,rumors spread through Colditz of an allied invasion. As soon as the news was delivered round the world, so it was around the prison camp. The gamblers started laying bets on when the war would end. Suddenly the cry "home by Christmas" didn't sound so hollow. They contain over 6000 hand-shaped components. Once assembled, the new glider will be virtually identical to the original. They were U.S. tanks with their guns aimed right at the castle.  The shelling from the approaching U.S. tanks was quickly directed away from the castle, and it was turned on the Germans. The order was given to attack the town. Twenty-two riflemen approached through the woods, supported by more troops with heavy machine guns. Crack SS troops supplemented by a ragged army of old men and Hitler Youth were no match for the U.S. troops. After a night of heavy shelling the SS has withdrawn, leaving Colditz undefended. The U.S. liberators found another more sinister camp in Colditz, a slave labor camp run by the SS. Hundreds of Hungarian Jewish men and women had been marched there from Auschwitz in November 1944. The U.S. troops found a mass grave for over 400 men and women who had been shot, but there were a few survivors among the bodies. But the prisoners and their U.S. liberators weren't ready to go home just yet. High up in the roof of the chapel lay the completed parts of an aircraft, waiting to be put together. This is the only known photograph of what was christened "The Colditz Cock," taken that day by an unknown GI. Jack and Bill proudly displayed the glider to their German guards and their U.S. liberators. More than 50 years later The Colditz Cock will be reborn, witnessed by the prisoners who secretly and carefully crafted the original. It was left behind in Colditz when the prisoners were evacuated back to Britain. They never saw it again. But rumor is that is was burned after the war. And finally the question of whether it would have flown can be answered. It's a ritual practiced almost everywhere—every aspect designed to engage and satisfy the senses. Each day 15 billion cigarettes are consumed around the world—more than two for every human being alive. With cigarette companies under fire and millions of lives at risk, the stakes are high as the tobacco industry pursues the elusive goal of a safer cigarette. Tobacco has been part of the American scene since long before Columbus reached these shores. It became one of the most profitable of all agricultural products. Tobacco put a struggling colony on the map, and helped finance the revolution. Cigarette makers were forced to pay hundreds of billions of dollars in settlements. Then, to the surprise of many, they staged a dramatic turnaround. Part of the solution was replacing American tobacco with cheaper product from abroad. This, along with hefty price hikes, paid off the liabilities. Tobacco company profits are now at an all time high. Although smoking rates in the U.S. have been gradually declining for years, one in four adults still smokes, and throughout the developing world, cigarettes are a growth industry. For the past forty years anti-smoking forces have lobbied without success for government control of what they say is the most dangerous and least regulated consumer product on the market. Now there's a new factor to consider. Across the industry, manufacturers large and small are preparing a new generation of what they call "reduced risk" products. The facility was aging, and there was no lab, but the new owners were looking for a competitive edge. They decided to try to create a safer cigarette. Eventually the brain adapts to the elevated level of activity. Any shortage of nicotine creates the discomfort and craving of addiction.  Jonnie Williams found out that tobacco in the field has few toxins, but by the time of sale, it contains a deadly group of carcinogens called Tobacco Specific nitrosamines or TSNA's. Tests carried out at the University of Kentucky found the microwave-cured tobacco to be significantly lower in nitrosamines than tobacco cured in a barn. Then, looking to the future, he commissioned a custom-built oven that filled a room. After curing in the giant microwave began, he received devastating news. The machine was in flames. He had already tested a variety of other curing techniques and found the forced hot air of a convection oven to be slow, but effective. Now he needed a larger test. Williams conceived a grand plan to change the way Virginia tobacco was cured. He built high-tech curing barns that worked much like giant convection ovens, forcing clean, heated air through the tobacco.  One company did come forward. In April of 1999, Brown & Williamson, makers of Lucky Strikes and Kools, offered to buy 1.2 million pounds of Star's low nitrosamine tobacco. But the good news was only good for a day. The giant R.J. Reynolds tobacco company said that nitrosamines were not the result of an anaerobic environment, but rather were formed from compounds in the propane gas exhaust used to heat the barns. Whether the Star patent was violated is yet to be legally determined. The reason cigarettes have so many toxins is that they burn. Any organic material like tobacco is chemically complex. Combustion increases that complexity enormously. With heat peaking at 1000 degrees centigrade, the 300 or so compounds that make up tobacco explode into over five thousand. Tobacco behind the burning cone heats up and releases gases, including carbon monoxide, one of the deadliest components of automobile exhaust. The relationship between smoking and health did not become clear until the early 1950s. Smoking had been suspect for years, but new studies revealed a statistical correlation between smoking and lung cancer. Then it was found that mice painted with cigarette tar developed tumors. The tobacco industry was caught off guard. A massive public relations campaign was launched to raise questions about the validity of the scientific studies and to promote positive notions about smoking.  While scientists at the major tobacco companies struggled to identify and remove carcinogens, the small and struggling Lorillard Tobacco Company found a quick and marketable approach to the problem. In 1952, Lorillard launched Kents, featuring a rarity in those days, a filter tip. By capturing tar particles before they reached the lungs, the filter would seem to create a safer smoke. Fibers of a special filter material were said to be so thin they could trap tar particles as small as one micron—one two-thousandth of an inch. Unfortunately, the new filter had a unique problem of its own.  The tests were kept secret. Sales set industry records. Three years later Lorillard introduced "New Kents" with a new Micronite filter, this time asbestos-free. As Kents took off, a more sophisticated effort to selectively remove toxins was pursued by the Liggett & Myers Tobacco Company, makers of Chesterfields and L&Ms. In the early 1960s, scientists involved in a secret project, code-named "XA," reported that mixing tobacco with a combination of chemicals altered the chemistry of combustion, reducing carcinogens in the smoke. A key ingredient was palladium, a metal commonly used in automobile catalytic converters. Liggett & Myers was purchased in 1985 by the maverick financier Bennett LeBow who added it to his roster of companies, the Vector group. Interest in the abandoned XA cigarette was revived when Dr. John Bunch was hired—the company's first scientist in years.  Tar from the prototype cigarettes was collected on a smoking machine. Carcinogenic compounds were extracted and their quantities compared to normal tobacco. Working in the old Liggett lab, Dr. Bereman and a handful of energetic young scientists analyzed the original XA formula and set out to improve it. Palladium and other additives were used to alter the burn at the molecular level in a way that would trap or prevent the formation of harmful compounds. In this case, the target was a deadly group of carcinogens known as polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, or PAHs.  As it turned out, the chemicals that reduced PAHs produced an increase in nitrosamines, the carcinogens that can form during the curing of tobacco. Vector scientists went to work on a new additive to reduce these compounds. Vector's new cigarette, Omni, is scheduled to reach the market this year.  The U.S. tobacco industry is dominated by three giants
 Philip Morris, maker of the world's most popular cigarette, Marlboro; the R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company and Brown & Williamson, part of the British American Tobacco Company. It was accepted throughout the public health community that the toxicity of cigarette smoke was related to the quantity of tar and nicotine taken into the lungs. A relatively simple way to reduce the dose was to reduce the amount of tobacco in a cigarette, and to speed up the burn with chemicals. More porous paper and the addition of vent holes around the filter further thinned the smoke by mixing it with air. And so the "low tar" or "light" cigarette was born. So that brands could be compared, the Federal Trade Commission developed a standardized procedure to measure tar and nicotine. Tar is a gross measurement of everything in the smoke except nicotine and water. The results have been disastrous for public health. Today, half of Philip Morris' research and development budget is said to be focused on reduced-risk products. It's an effort that was already underway in the mid-1970s when secret work began on a radically different strategy to clean up cigarette smoke.  The toxic compounds are produced at different temperatures. Some of the worst, like PAHs and carbon monoxide, occur at the highest. Cliff Lilly's team at Philip Morris developed a variety of experimental devices to control the heat used to vaporize tobacco. But efforts to create an electrically-heated cigarette were cut back, due to technological limitations or possibly the threat of litigation. The new product, called Premier, would use a unique technology to deliver the nicotine, but it was designed to look like a traditional cigarette. One problem was that until the flavor capsule heated up, the only taste was sulfur from the match, and burning charcoal. The effort to fix Premier's taste was documented in a best-selling book and television movie.  Premier was introduced in the autumn of 1988 and came with instructions to use a butane lighter. The effort had been the most ambitious yet to create a reduced-risk product. Reynolds expected applause, but that's not what happened. Consumers were equally unenthusiastic with what was dubbed a smokeless cigarette. After only a few months, Reynolds withdrew Premier. But the story wasn't over. It took six years, and a total cost of nearly a billion dollars, but Premier was reborn as Eclipse. The new design did away with the aluminum flavor capsule. Instead the burning charcoal tip would heat a column of sheet tobacco laced with glycerin. Eclipse was presented as a smoking alternative that may present less risk for certain diseases, including cancer. The public health community was cautious. An independent study commissioned by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health showed that when Eclipse was compared to two ultra-low tar cigarettes, Eclipse had higher yields of several toxins, especially when the charcoal tip burned hot from heavy smoking. The heater's electronics would have the power of an Apple II computer, capable of sensing a puff and instantly heating a metal blade to a precise temperature for a specified duration, producing little second-hand smoke or ashes.  The new smoking system, called Accord, is now available in test markets. And although sales have been modest, Philip Morris continues its development. Determining whether Accord, or any of the other new products, actually are safer is a highly complex process. Tobacco control advocates were surprised by Philip Morris's new direction, and were wary. Before reduced-risk products appeared on the horizon, the strategy of the health community was straightforward
 to discourage smoking across the board. Now the situation is far more complex.  Abstinence will remain the only safe response to cigarettes. But if tobacco companies are to market so-called " reduced-risk" products, should their claims be verified? Frozen at minus-380 degrees Fahrenheit, a human embryo is selected to be thawed, resulting in the birth of Melina, now four years old. Her brother Luc was created in the same way. Their parents are Will, a lawyer in Los Angeles, and Marcellin who's a surgeon. Since neither Will nor Marcellin could carry their baby, they searched for a woman willing to serve as a surrogate mother.  In vitro fertilization has enabled thousands of couples to create the family they desperately want. It has also opened a gateway to a brave new world—where a child can have five parents, or be born to a mother in her sixties; where a baby can have its sex determined before conception or be created with borrowed DNA; where an embryo, no larger than a speck of dust, can have its genes scanned for diseases, or one day be designed with new strengths and talents.  A new revolution in making babies is underway, one that could allow us to influence and even shape the genetic fate of our children. One out of every six couples struggles with infertility.  For many, in vitro fertilization is their last hope for a child, despite the stark reality that it fails 70 percent of the time. The disease of infertility once seemed incurable—until the miraculous birth of Louise Brown in 1978. Her arrival marked an historic moment, for Louise was the first human baby ever conceived outside a mother's womb.  The breakthrough came when Steptoe and Edwards decided to transfer the embryo earlier, allowing it to divide only three times before placing it in the womb. Three years later, NOVA filmed the birth of America's first "test tube" baby, Elizabeth Jordan Carr.  But the terror faded quickly. As the press followed Louise Brown and Elizabeth Carr, it was clear that the girls who had made medical history were growing up to be perfectly normal. Initially, IVF could only help a small percentage of infertile couples. Today, it has become the starting point for treating almost every cause of infertility as defective eggs, weak sperm, or abnormal chromosomes—once insurmountable obstacles—are overcome. Radical new techniques have proven that life on the cellular level is easier to manipulate than ever imagined.  Infertility was often seen as a woman's curse, but in fact 40 percent of cases can be attributed to male problems like Darren's. Because Darren's sperm are too weak to reach Ilysa's eggs, her eggs must be surgically retrieved. Using a long thin needle, Rosenwaks probes her ovary. One by one the tiny eggs are sucked out into test tubes and taken to the lab. It is the quality and number of the eggs and sperm that will determine the outcome. A fertile man will produce millions of sperm. Today the doctors have found only 12 of Darren's to work with. Using a thin glass needle, one sperm is grabbed by its tail. Then Ilysa's egg is placed into position.  Palermo called his discovery "ICSI" for intracytoplasmic sperm injection. Amazingly, creating a human being through the manual injection of sperm proved to be just as effective as natural fertilization. The only known safety risk seemed to be the possibility of passing on the gene for male infertility. During Anne's first IVF cycle, her doctors retrieved 35 eggs—an astounding number. Yet once the eggs were fertilized in the lab and began dividing, embryologist Jacques Cohen noticed fragments, little pieces of cells that are left behind when embryos divide inefficiently. For decades, no one dared to invade the inner sanctum of an embryo for fear of harming it. But in 1990, Cohen began piercing the shells of fertilized eggs that appeared brittle to help them hatch. Five of the best quality embryos were transferred back to Anne. Although she became pregnant, six weeks later, she lost the baby.  Anne endured one more IVF cycle. Once again she conceived and then miscarried. Although she was only 29 years old, it seemed unlikely that she would get pregnant using her own eggs. Fortunately, Laura May delivered three healthy children. But not every family is as lucky. Most triplets and higher order multiples are born prematurely. Thirty percent will weigh less than two pounds. Given the enormous risks, why not limit the number of embryos transferred back to the mother? Because 70 percent of all embryos fail to develop, doctors transfer back several in the hope that at least one will turn into a baby. Since the early days of IVF, doctors have transferred fertilized eggs back to the mother when they reach the eight-cell stage. But recently, labs have been getting better at keeping embryos alive. By transferring back only two embryos at the blastocyst stage, doctors avoid the risks of multiples without diminishing the chance of a pregnancy. But not every embryo can make it to the fifth day.  Although more than half the couples going through IVF walk away childless, Darren and Ilysa hope that they will be the lucky ones who defy the odds.  As technology advances, the treatment of infertility has been transformed from a small medical specialty into a four-billion-dollar-a-year industry. At this trade fair, sales teams from all over the world pitch their services to doctors, hospitals and couples desperate for a baby.  Many clinics insist that egg donors remain anonymous, but Bill Handel has launched a thriving business finding applicants willing to reveal their backgrounds, and matching them with infertile couples.  Bringing a third person into the reproductive process raises many troubling questions. For an infertility patient like Anne, turning to egg donation or even adoption meant forsaking a biological tie to her child. As she grappled with this dilemma, the research team at Saint Barnabas Hospital was pushing forward a new frontier of reproductive biology involving the exchanging of parts, from one egg cell to another. They offered Anne an experimental procedure called cytoplasmic transfer, designed to help women whose eggs divide inefficiently. The procedure would preserve the nucleus of Anne's eggs that contain over 99 percent of her chromosomes, the DNA or genetic material that makes her unique.  Cohen and Willadsen experimented with animal models, mixing the cytoplasm from different mothers of the same species. As they had hoped, the babies appeared healthy and normal.  Deciding to proceed with cytoplasmic transfer, Anne and a donor had their eggs harvested. Then Cohen removed the cytoplasm from the donor's egg, carefully avoiding it's nucleus. By using the fertilization technique of ICSI, donor cytoplasm can be safely injected into Anne's eggs along with her husband's sperm. Three days later, when the developing embryos were examined, they appeared less fragmented. Four were selected for transfer. Unlike Anne, the majority of patients who turn to IVF are in their late thirties or early forties. Many find it difficult to get pregnant simply because of the age of their eggs. During a woman's childbearing years, one egg is ovulated each month. If it is fertilized, it will replicate its chromosomes and then divide, splitting them in half. To avoid the possibility of chromosomal damage, Grifo went one step further than cytoplasmic transfer. He carefully took the nucleus from an older woman's egg and injected it into a younger donor egg that had had its nucleus removed. The reconstructed egg was then fertilized and allowed to divide using the machinery in the cytoplasm of the younger donor. Criticized for unacceptable human experimentation, Grifo returned to the lab. Nuclear transfer techniques had recently been used to clone animals. And although Grifo was not trying to clone a human being, some feared his work might take us one step closer. On December 20, 1998, Anne delivered a healthy baby girl named Katie. She was the third child born using cytoplasmic transfer.  Katie has a mix of her parents' genes, as well as traces of mitochondrial DNA from the egg donor.  With each new breakthrough in making babies, the limitations and randomness of nature are slowly being overcome. One of the most intractable barriers egg donation has pushed back is the limit of age. Mrs. Keh took hormones to force the tissues lining the walls of her uterus to thicken. Within months, her womb returned to its pre-menopausal state, capable of sustaining a pregnancy. Then donated eggs, fertilized with her husband's sperm, were transferred back. 	The creation of families with borrowed eggs, sperm or wombs has raised a myriad of complex issues. One of the most difficult is explaining to children how they came to be. Will and Marcellin created a birth book to explain to Melina why she doesn't have a mother in the traditional sense. Assisted reproduction began with the idealistic goal of helping infertile couples have babies. But increasingly, it has given parents greater control over their unborn offspring. At a leading infertility clinic in Virginia, a technology called "microsort" is enhancing the ability of science to determine one of a child's most important traits—its sex. Of the 23 chromosomes carried by the sperm, only one determines gender. Sperm carrying an X chromosome will produce a girl. Sperm carrying a Y chromosome will produce a boy. For $3200, sophisticated machines can detect the minute differences in size between male and female sperm and sort them. Sex selection has already led to an imbalance in India where there are an estimated 40 million fewer women, primarily because of the routine abortion of female fetuses. In China, the desire for boys at one point changed the sex ratio to 153 Chinese males for every 100 females. In contrast to the rest of the world, American parents are using microsort to have baby girls. Choosing a baby's sex is a far cry from designing our children. But eventually, parents will have even more choices using a powerful technique called pre-implantation genetic diagnosis or PGD. From a single cell plucked from an embryo, doctors can analyze individual chromosomes and genes. At age 41, Barbara underwent IVF in order to use PGD to test her embryos. A single cell was plucked from each one and analyzed with fluorescent dyes targeted to bond with five specific chromosomes most prone to have either an extra copy or a missing one.  Barbara gave birth to healthy fraternal twins, Gabriel and Luke. Although PGD spared her repeated miscarriages, its cost, in conjunction with IVF, was almost prohibitive. But for parents who risk passing on inherited diseases like cystic fibrosis, PGD offers the hope of having a healthy baby. At the moment, scientists can look for genes related to several dozen diseases. But our ability to screen embryos will improve exponentially as a result of the decoding of the human genome. To exploit this knowledge, technology is emerging that allows DNA fragments containing thousands of genes to be analyzed with automated gene scanners. In the future, DNA computer chips may be able tell you every single form of the approximate thirty thousand genes that you've got. Hollywood has already imagined the implications of this powerful technology. The limitation to pre-implantation genetic diagnosis is that parents can only select for genes that embryos already have. But scientists have begun inserting new genes into embryos, endowing thousands of animals with unusual traits.  In many ways, the brave new world of assisted reproduction promises far more benefits than perils. In the 21st century, newborn children will be spared lethal diseases that plagued past generations. As the mysteries of reproduction give way to knowledge, even infertility might be overcome. In the shocking aftermath of the attacks on New York and Washington, even as we grapple with the war on terrorism, the nuclear nightmare is stirring once again. Some experts say the risk of an accidental launch of a nuclear missile may be even higher today than in the Cold War. Russia's nuclear missiles are deployed at some 20 sites, scattered across the country's vast spaces. Until today, the missile bases have been highly secret, sealed off from outsiders. But NOVA has gained access to Russia's largest missile base, the heart of the nation's nuclear force.  Once upon a time Russians enlisted in the armed forces because of the advantages offered over civilian life
 higher pay, more available homes, good schools and good hospital facilities. And of course the status, the respect. That is no longer the case for all of the army, with one exception, the Strategic Missile Forces. In a missile launch simulator on the base, Colonel Yuri Petrovsky is training Lieutenant Pavlov and other young Rocketchiki. Colonel Petrovsky arrived here when Lieutenant Pavlov was born, 22 years ago. Then, it seemed that nuclear war was just around the corner and the enemy was at the gates. Colonel Petrovsky and his wife Natalya, a teacher at one of the local schools, have recently moved into a bigger apartment on the base. Their daughter and her husband often come to visit them from the nearby city of Saratov, where they're studying. Both the Colonel and his wife are staunch supporters of life on the base.             Just outside Svetly base lies the village of Tatischevo. It has the same population as Svetly, but that's all they have in common. There are few jobs here and little money. Tatischevo is what the reality of post-communist Russia looks like, a country where economic woes and social disintegration have slashed the average male life expectancy to just 59 years. 	This is more than just a military base. It's a town—a town of 20,000, complete with three public schools, sports facilities, a cultural center, a hospital. It's a closed town. It's not open to anyone. It's off limits to those who don't live here. And it is privileged. The continuing faith of the people stationed here at Russia's biggest missile base has to do, in part, with the traditional privileges which almost always underlie traditional loyalties. But for Russia's elite Missileers, Svetly offers something more. General Yuri Kavelin is the base commander. He was a construction worker, then joined the army and progressed through the ranks of the Strategic Missile Forces. He now commands 6,000 Rocketchiki and 2,500 military support forces. He knows exactly how things stand with the troubled Russian military. But he has no doubt about the morale of the Rocketchiki. Russia's missiles are test fired several times a year to check their readiness. Russia's maintenance crews are fighting to keep their missiles in service. Russia's weapons are often simpler and less prone to break down than western armaments like the Kalashnikov submachine gun, which functions in any conditions. But a nuclear missile is not a Kalashnikov, and the effects of aging can be disturbing. The problems of Russia's aging missiles come to a focus here at the Command Center of the Strategic Missile Forces, just outside Moscow. I met the Commander in Chief, four-star General Vladimir Yakovlev. 	How is that? Despite General Yakovlev's confidence, all the evidence suggests that Russia's ability to monitor the planet from space is steadily deteriorating. On at least two occasions, false alarms brought the Russians to within minutes of ordering a full-scale nuclear strike.  Some experts think that the major missile base at Svetly and even Moscow itself, could be wiped out without the Russians receiving any warning. Nervous Russian military commanders have less and less information on which to base their decisions. For Colonel Petrovsky, enjoying a picnic with friends on a rare day off, there is no question that if that gun goes off, it won't be by accident. He also knows it was Anton Chekov, not Stanislavsky who said that. The Colonel told me he had never met a foreigner before our film crew, and he's never been allowed to travel outside the country. But despite these restrictions, the endless hours on duty and the problems with pay, the Colonel has no doubts about the commitment and morale of the Rocketchiki. Now Evgeny Pavlov, a child of the new Russia, is beginning his career as a Missile man with the same certainty. But today's challenge to Russia's nuclear security lies closer to home. A string of bombings in Moscow and elsewhere has shocked the public and politicians into awareness of the mounting global threat of terrorism. This training exercise, based on dealing with a terrorist attack, once seemed like something out of an action movie. In today's Russia it could actually happen. The menace of international terrorism has put the missile defense forces on high alert against possible attacks on the silos. After the terrorist actions, today's exercise has an alarming relevance. And by the way, they were using live ammunition. Before every spell of duty in the Missile Launch centers, the Rocketchiki undergo a series of psychological tests. The aim is to check their emotional state. Now it's obvious that people with a finger on the nuclear trigger should be in full control of themselves, but I found the process somewhat bewildering. The psychologist said that if the bio-rhythms were negative, whatever that means, she would use additional tests to assess a Rocketchiki's fitness for duty. I wanted to ask her if she used tarot cards, but I decided this was not the place for humor.     These may be children of the new Russia, but their indoctrination has a decidedly old-fashioned flavor. On their 40th anniversary, the Rocketchiki commemorate their Memorial Day. Colonel Petrovsky shares the story of his early years on the base with the new missileers. It's a little education in pride and honor, but for the first time in four decades there is a new ingredient
 truth. Russia's economic crisis means that the military pie has become much smaller and the fight for the biggest slice much more bitter. The Defense Minister, a former Missile Commander, who insisted that Russia must preserve its nuclear missile capability, was replaced. The Chief of the General Staff, who argued for deep nuclear funding cuts to modernize conventional forces, was not. And in this unstable climate, Russia has adopted an alarming new policy. The war memorial in the city of Saratov, not far from the base, commemorates the death of some 300,000 people who defended that city in World War II. For Lieutenant Pavlov's generation it's history. But for older Russians, the memory of nearly 30 million people killed is very real.  In 1972, both superpowers signed the ABM treaty, which severely limited the development of any defense against nuclear missiles. They put their faith in the uneasy balance of terror called "MAD," Mutually Assured Destruction.  For his work on testing the TOPOL M at Svetly, Colonel Petrovsky was given an award by Russia's Minister of Defense. For more than 30 years Russia's Rocketchiki have headed off for the missile fields without ever having to do the ultimate job of the turning the nuclear keys. But ask them if, with the passing of years and the fading of old animosities, it's all just routine and they will tell you that they are as ready as they always were—just as ready.  Svetly's 20 missile launch control centers are scattered across the barren steppes for miles around the base. Just 350 Rocketchiki have the ultimate responsibility of launching the missiles. But for all the geopolitics, the job of the Rocketchiki comes down to one act, as simple as it is unthinkable. 